      "identifier" : [
         "8_06251_276"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "3ÀZIN 25 CENTS",
         "VORY SOAP floats. I is the original, floating soap. This quality gives lvory Soap distinct advantages. lvory Soap always is at hand; one does flot have to grope for it nor is it left in the water to waste away. Ivory Soap always is in sight; there is n danger of injuring oneseif by steppin1g on the cake in the bathtub. Even if, Ivory Soap were no better thari other soaps its floating qualities would make it more desirable. 5 CENTS YSOAP.. ..99o PURE îr r hIerg Soap E, made ln the Procter 6- Gamble faciories at Hamilt\u003en, Canada.",
         "OANADIIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER i Wall.s, white or-cvered %vith foliage paper, with blue or grey predominating;, woodwork white; rugs, plain dari, blue centre withi floral border; hangings dark bine; pictures, eighteenith century sporting prÎnts or reproductions of Gainsborough, Reynolds or Romney. i~hppnd1eDining Room Suite By the Toronto Furniture Co., Limnited \"MANY A THING DIVINELY DOW. BY CHIPPENDALE AND SHERATON\"-Andrew Lane, £LL furniture, that made by Chippendale 15 .ely the most beautiful and practical, Beauti- because of its delicate carving, graceful- crfect proportions and soft, deep-toned color- .tical because ineverything pertaining to 'hippendale subordinated ail other elemrents f structural stability. Ç In our replicas of aie furniture, we have reproduced with fine tic feeling and admirable skill the beautiful ,s, simple chaste lines, perfect proportions, luminous finish that make the originals so Ç The very simplicity which you admire in this Chip.. te enables us to produce it at a price at least no higher lemanded for ordinary furniture, lacking its distinction 1 finish. We invite you to view this and other notable lur line at the leading dealers in your locality. STRUCTURAL DETAILS SideIoord - 2,5 ins. x 66 ins., five dravers anei three velvet- lined trays for table iver. May be had with or without mirror back. Ail drawra have dust..proof bottoms. Tabl - 54 ins., 8 or 10 ft. extension. China Cabinet- niay be had with or without drawers. Seiran Table - 22 ina. Y, 43 ina. Wood - Mexican mobogany, finished in antique, rubbed to a duit egg.shell glosa. )RON",
         "T he Canadian MagLazi Vol. XLVI Contents Fcbruary, 1916 TE CHATEAU ouF Axnoisp, - Drawving by Estelle Kerr - . i Nb. ROYAL OAsTLEs IN FRA-NoE -- ILLUSTRATED I3ONDSLAvk OP' THE WULDERNESS - A STUDENT DUEL IN G1RMAuNT - TE SHIADOW OF' STRIuu'. FICTION MATCIIINC COOwURS. FICTION - GEMMA'S GRIEF. 'VERSE - - - - BELGiAN REYS'vEs. A DRAWING OUR PORTION AT VERSAILLES - - WIN-,STON SPENCER CHURCHILL - LiGHT AND LIFE ------- SONGOPu TIIE SLEEPER. VERSE -- JANTuAny THAW. A PAINTING - QUP GREAT REviA IN TRADE WAYPARERS. VERSE---- -- ---- ]FRAGMENTS FROM A MODERN POrn'EI AuTUjmN SUNSET. VERSE --- THE~ REAL STRATECONA---- ---- VIII.-A PRINCE 0F BENEFACTORS WHÂT'S IN A NAME?----- -- -- CURRENT EVENTS--------- -- THE LimuiwY TABLE------ TwTn-'I'nTITý TIATAr.1-BE- - Inelu - Estelle M. Kerr----- John Beames - - - John D. Robins-- Leslie Floyd -- G. 'W. Bartlett-- Mary Linda Bradley Andre Lapine - - - E. Montizambert - - Hugli S. Eayrs - - - - Professor D. Fraser Harris Isabel Ecelestone Mackay- 'W. E. Atkinson - -- William Lewis Edmonds Mary Susanne Edgar -- Britton B. Cooke - - - - Arthur L. Phelps - - - Dr. George Bryce - - - Isabel Skelton - -- Lindsay Crawford - -- Book Reviews-- ---- Current Humour - - - and most of the Copyright, Canada, 191",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISEB o, a4*%do Sample FREE-write ti Lever Brothers Limited Toronto. Made In Canada. 2] QI of the finest soap, in flakes. Its use adds to the life of woollens, flannels, filmy laces and ail dainty f abrie s. L U\u003cX- dissolves readlly in hot water and breaks into a foamy, 'cream-like lather which cannot injue the finest garments or the sxnoothest hands. It coaxes rather than forces the dirt out of clothes and adds a new note of refinement to wash -day work. L UX softens the hardest water-makes the bath a luxury and the ahampoo a delight. Sold everywhere at 10 cents.",
         "4 CANADIAN MAGAZINE -ADVEBTISER ANNOUN C EMENlqT Ini this issue of THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE we publish actual experiences of a Canadian journalist, Mr. Britton Cooke, at the battie-front. Next inonth we shall publish the actual experiences of two Canadian lady journalists in Europe-Miss. Margaret Bell, in London, and Miss Mona Cleaver, at Paris. Both articles give intensely interesting sidelights on conditions in these two great cities. One deals with hardships endured by residents in the poorer districts of London, 'the othier with relief measures extended to refugees who have sought shelter at the Frenchi capital. q1 Then there wilI be an intimate, yet impressionistic sketch of Constantinople, the Turkish capital that the Allies failed to reach, by Miss Florence Withrow. It describes the bazaars, the Seraglio, and the colour, and movement of this great link betwe'en East and'i West. qlo take one away from the present strife, there is an excellent article on Batoche, a forgotten capital, once the headquarters of the disturbin'g forces in West- ern Canada. It is written by H. W. Hewitt, and is amply illustrated. q It is not generally known that in some parts of New Brunswick the inhuman method of dealing with poor persons by hiring them 'out publicîy, is still, or at Ieast has been quite recently, practised. We shahl publish an' article by A. M. Belding, describing this inhuman practice and giving a history of it in New Brunswick. q There will be other features in the form of readable essays and short stories, among themn \"Romance\", an extraorclinary bit of fiction, by Mazo de la Roche, with drawings by Maud McLaren. $2.50 PER ANNUM. Including Great Britain, Ireland and most of the Colonies. SINGLE COPIES, 25 CENTS. THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE 200-206 Adiaide Street West -TORONTO J WHAT RECOMMEND ITSELF 7",
         "CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Vour Banking Business Invited In Our' Savinga Department ýPaid.up Capital - Resarve Flunde - W E invite thec banking ac- counts of business people, corporations and socicties, also private and savings accounts. The Bank of Toronto provides îts cus- toiners with a modern Banking Service. In this it combines ail the advantages of sound banking exFperience with the modemn equipnient and progressive outlookt occes- sary to meet present-day requfrements. loterest la paid on aUf balances haif- y=ay Accounts may bc opened hi the name of two persons, c1t1her of whom may deposit or wlthdraw money. - 6,439,382",
         "6 CANÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVEBTIBEB ULONDON CLOVE COMPAN ___ CHEAPSIDE, LONDONo ENCLAND Direct Attention to Their Unrlvalied Varlety of British Made A I %,\u0026 à Gloves at Their Usual Moderate PricesA , Th. 41 ONNAUCHT I Lades'l Superlor quaut Pope Cloves, rits made. in Tan $bides, Spear Points, \u003cPrix scani sewn, 2 Pres. But- tons .per pair 73C Ladies' Strong GOs- ekmn Cavme 1'Ante- lope \" Finise, Pique sewn, British made, Dark Grey and Ton, 2 Pres Buttons, per pair71 ceine The - @AIIASIAU\" Ladies'f BuCeakin F1nish Cloves, excellent wea r;n g, in Tan or Grey\u003e, Prix seam , self sewn Points, 3 Buttons, per pair., 51.03 lamiles' RaI ' .erakin Bloese, Dar\u003c Tan andi Dark Gre, Pique sewn, British matie, 2 Press Buttoes per pair $1.20 Ditto, stouter quality, Prix seani sewn, Dark Tan ant Dark Grey, British made, 2 Press Buttons, per pair $1.44 Ladiesa Strong Sape Slaves, in Tan orOnk shade 6 But- ton Lengtli,,with Wide Ansý, Strap and Press Button as illustration, Spear Points, Prix .eam sewn, per pair 51.20 Ladises 110ANADIAU\"I Biuk Finish in saine stlea abova, in Tan or Dark Grey, par pair $1.44 MENS8 CLOVES fleg Soeashl, Buck Finish, in Ta r Dark Grey, British made, Prxseam sewn. 1 Press Buttoji, per pair 73 Cent The \"SANADIAN\" Buck FisSlves, in Tan or Gmv ,a splen- did G\u0026ove for wear, British made, 1 Press Button, per a ï pair $1.03 Ladies' Dark Tan Sape Sloes., Pique sewn, Wool Lining, Brown Fur Tops,. with Strap and Press Butj ton ... parpair, $1.»S Ladie' Sat Quaity Deeshin Sioes, Sax shape Strap n Press Butna ristLined wsith softr fine oL, Pique sewn, in Tan or Grey,- par pair $1.34 Deeskin, kaok Fin- ieh, Pique sewn, Wo2l Lining, Fur Tops, Wrist Lined Fur, in Dark Tan or G reY, Gusset Wrist. Strap, ad Presi Button, par pair,51.20 Ladies' Bout Qmallty Sae. sein -Bucak Flnah\"O Siaves, Lined Wool, Wrist Lineti Whl te Fur, Sax shape, with Strap Press Putton, in Dark Tan orI G.rey.-par pair S1.89 Fur' Llned Ladiee' Deaski, \" Buck Finish,\"y in Tan or Grey, Lined Fur, Pique sewn, as illustration. 2 Press Buttons, per pair 51.34 Ladies' Supermi' Quality Chevrette, Fur Lined tbroughout, dlastic Gusset Wrist, in Brown or Blackt, par pair 51.83 Fur~ Linad Ladies' \"lukei nin Tan or Grey, liet Pur throughout, Pique sewn, Gusset Wrist, Strap and Press Button. par pair $2.5o MENS OLOVES",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER SUPPORT THE \"OLD COUNTRY\"\" Durim-ns the War - And After -By purchasîng your Spring Clothing Fabrics and Suits from England you will be assistÎng to provide the necessary funds for the success- ZOTAL \u0026 IM PERIAL fui termaination of the war-a patriotic object B ApPONTMNT 4PPOI»(TmENT5 wvorthy of your consideration and support. To H. M. THE QuEExN ýan-pies representing an excellent variety of high-class Fabries for Ladies', Gentlemen's, in1d Children's Spring and Summer wear will be mailed to your address, promptly and post id, on request, by EGERTON BURNETT, LTD., whose reputation for integrity and \u0026tir dealing is unquestionable. HIGH-CLASS MADE TO MEASURE TAILORING AT ECONOMICAL PRICES Many ears orr een the serol art enables EGRONB T xct Tio orders entrusted to their care in a skilful and satisfacor mariner, and the voluntary commendations of their patrons îs incontestable evidence of their ability. -n READ THESE PROOFS Mrs. H.C.S. wrote: -ihe, twe skirts camti hand about ten daysagoamanver laewtte. W.C.. Es., Oanaan e BriishColumbia W...Eqwrote: \"I.beg t. acknowledge safe ptl of the Louinge Suit and am greatLypeased witb it.' Cranbrook, Britîsh aumbia D.A. Esq. wrote: \" The two Suits are an excellent fit and in every way satisfactory.\" Saskatoon, Sask. EGERTON BURNETT'S Pure Wool \"Royll Nail Serges and Coatiblgs are Clotbing Fabries of avrypcialhrceh ar auactured fron _eightsan texe. and aedyed al ric, pr ermar netclu b e ithe r r aie lg t t il, r vaeriy afet. Oe ot yaso etn i actut wea ba _ ôcusvl prove th. ta' ,e a arce fr 73c a $S.9Oer y arddbe nidh E. B.r yol-eane ~yl ipa~4p,. Alepti b tua id. ons reques. Laye ad,. ade-dti tWeeds fuiing 73ar fror $21.55 carardubew .nage Sendlur as illustratrd inr tE.- y dlut atidta det ation. i 18I it hlaIlo suiWinsfr ose WewgoSm e, Engl$15 and ae n",
         "S CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVEUTISER MADE IN CANADA Oakey's ACCOUNT BOOI SILVERSMITHS' SOAF COMPLUTE STOCK 0F EVERY KIND For ci.anins Plat* SPECIAL PÂTI ERNS MADE TO OP~ Oakey's EMERY CLOTU Oakey's 'WELINGTON\" [NIFE POLISH ' Boit for CJonid PIaLICudl.y LOOSE LEAF LEDGEI O ak e y s BINDERS and SPECIALTI MEMORANDUM AND PRICE BOOI \"WELLINGTON\" BLACK LWA OFFICE AND POCKET DIARJES OAE'SGOD OL VEtWH E BROWN BROIw JOHN OAKEY \u0026 SONS, LIMITED Manidacturing Stationers, TORONT\u003c W.liaaton Mille, London, FEn., S.E. Eetablished ini Toronto Seventy Years The Royal Military College ~~HERE are few national institutions of more value and interest to the country than t R Ioyal Military College of Canada. Notwithstandlng this, its object and wor't it accompllshing are not suiflcifently understood by the general public, The College fs a Government institution, designed priniarily for the purpose of jivil instruction in all branches of mllitary science to cadets and officers of the Canadian MiIit: In fact lt corresponds to Woolwioh and Sandhurst, The Commandant and military lnstructors are ail officers on the active list of the Irmperi Aruiy. lent for the purpose, and there ls In addition a complete staff of professors for t- civil subjects which form such an Important part of the Collego course. Medical attendal' 185ilst thied.leeI ognzdo a strictly mîlitary basis, the Cadets receive a pre ticl ad sienifi tainng n sbjetsessential. to a sound modern educs.tion. The course Inldsa thoroughgrounding In Mathematics, Civil Engineering, SuirveYiîl",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER t.,. -. -s m\u003e ým 4W. s.sase AliflTc CTY; N.J. iUIQUE FEATURES:' 4'.. \u0026 7bevast Marbie Exctlance- IRIT OF AMERICA qT PLAY WND CHEERrULWESS msLJ..mw.mqrTH iGale 3. N. .. _ CJITYNJ SanatorNu. ding.Âwy buoy. ~le HOT SPRINCS ARKANSAS BOT SPRINGS, ARKANSAS Grelatest heatth and pleasure resort in the wOrld. Owned and eontrolled by the 'United Stastes Goverument. Perfect li-hole Golf Course. Write for particu1ars. ARLINGTON \u0026 EASTMAN ILOTES. de-_ m nl-A ln am 1 E WA8H. JTLER reof hinga. Taxi fare 25e. h *2,lOup, ffss-»coforts ItIIRE MICHL, g. BATE CREEK A Me=a Wo heilth Besers. Os'er 1,00 différent muative baths and treatiments, re newned diet systeto, redueing and fatten. Ing ifices edentifically regud. thirty- tire speiahzing physktume; Sf0 traind nurse; retful tropical gardes . los zeoration gysnnasluc, swimnoog pools. beautiftil manrin surroundiogs, env.gorat- in e t.m d\"a Pl-a pla (o t aod hts building. $end fer fre\" bookiot -T\u0026 Si.pfo Llfe ils NotsholI\"..d illuatoatei psopect.. THE SANITARIJM, BOX fle. BMTILE CREEK. PENDENT ORDER 0F FORESTERS Policies issued by the Society are for the protect- ~ pledged. ID.nefitsI Benefits are payable to th~e Beueficiary in case or PaUid I death, or to the member in case of bis total disability, 142 Mion1 J or ta the member on attaining sevent\u003e' years of age. oa Poide s Lued from $5500 to $5000 L J1 For furth.r informnation and litorature appjY to RCH. S.S. E. G. STEVENSON, S.C.R. TEMPL.E SUILLlN@. TORONTO vuZ F m",
         "* 11 T Tis generally admitted that it is a mark of distinction to bc a readcr of THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE. But to be a regular subscriber to it is also an evidence of good judgment. Dr. G. D. Scott, of Mcrrickville, Ontario1, in renew- ing his subscription, writes: \"This is the fourteenth year I have taken it, and it is getting to be an absolute neces- Mi sity to me now.\" fi Not a very expensive nccessity, after ail, for it costs only two dollars and fifty cents for twelve months. $2.50 per Anmum. Including Great Britamn, Ireland and most of the colonies. SINGLE COPIES, 25 CENTS. THECANADIAN MAGAZINE 200-206 Adelaide St. West TORONTO, CAN.",
         "CÂNÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISEB Don't Suifer- With Stiif, Aching Limbs Don't be inconveniellced and annoyed by tired, Lfiarned muscles. Massage the parts with. .ýbsorbine, Jr., the American-made gerinicide-lini- 'lent, and rout out the trouble. Athietes do. Tliey MUQw that Absorbine, Jr., penetrates quickly and 'educes the sorcness and inflammation-that it is ý(0werless and, efflcacious, in cases of serions spraîns, ý'Tenclies, torn ligaments and painful effections. 1~W5 NAM MY . Off. ledifferent ldud of liniment. It îe a,% saf. ANTISEPTIC and GERMICIDE , Aphed to an open sore or wound, it kilîs the ' -' r61lus, makes the part aseptic and promotes rapid IIid healthy healing. That is why it is so good for ýl'ts and bruises. .AIsorbine, Jr., is non-poisonous and non-destrue- oLe f tissue-it is highly concentrated. and only a drops are required at an application. A 101%\u003c 1'lution is sufficiently strong for most uses and is 110 germicidal. This solution may be used bene- leial.ly as a spray or gargie for infeeted sore throat. HEALING-COOLING-SOOTHING .\u0026bsorbine, Jr., is also a disciltient and resolvent, effective in reducinig Bursal 11largements, Cysts, Swollen Glands or Veius. Use Absorbine, Jr., where you 'rit relief quickly and permanently. Athletes and Trainers use Absorbine, Jr., not ouly to 1~a 2 pr ent Aueua overcoine these conditions, but as a preveutive. After teo 4Ajb .' in severe exercise a rub-down with Absorbiue, Jr., diluted 411Lpecn Auceinu kii one ounce toa quart of~ water or witeh hazel, limberq, 1ent. ý Iu the stiff joints and muscles, stops inflammation, and / ft nd Ba usCl prevents sorenese. This solution is also antiseptic e * lutionkIeBelu and germicidal. .\u003c. J.0,Orce t.S lton kil , kn NAG. - ~ 0nEc.,~Absorbine, Jr., is sold by dragglste at $1.00 a bottie 2_16 - Prtbine J,., or sent direct, charges paid. Descriptive pamphlet M'4'tala Ag' .P and detailed. laboratory reports by many Amen-. F. YOUNG, \u0026,,ntwo min. can and European chemists free on requestP .F Jý~~~ ~ ~ or -net, 'I.P. rth-t. 187 Lymama ~idu.E rer Ab-TbD, r fIl e.utreai. can. -ký1 Âbgôrbi,\u003e for. maIlf A LIBERAL TRIAL BOTTLEEnledS tcnj Varc.V.. ilbsetyu address onreceipt of iOc i tmso hc ,e, lIffs; or dlluted a. lIb etyu no i t sap o bc spn IunIctod soreq. stanips. Send for trial bottie or procure sen men~ ostpad Trial from our ruggst tday.pam let A srie Jr., regular sîze frmyu rgitldy anhe Evidence ( and laMoatory reprts. Mamufactur.d only by NOUNG,............. ........... YOUNG P.D.F., 187 Lymans BIdg., Adý............... '4 wi ......s......................",
         "COLLEGE r t-I. boy udeforteen-entirelsepeate. UpprShool Prffl Theli Selicol won Univeusity Scholarthips at Matriculationm snix out of the past soeUe rinea, Ont. 1 913 and four in1914. REV J . MILLER .A.D CL Head Master: C. S. Fobery, M.A. MONTREAL SUCCESSES 1915 include:- 2 EntrancesR. M.C 4th and 6th place McGill Scienc Matriculation. ST. MARGARET'S COILLEGE 144 BLOOK ST. E., TOKONTO, ONTAPLIO A Residential and Day School for Girls te George Dikkson, M. A., former Principal of Upper Canada College, an' mre, from Preparatory to Universityr Matriculation and First lomestic Science, Physical Ediuçation-Cricket, Tenis, ximminz Bath. Pfesident. 12 CÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Trinity Co11eje 'Sch FOUNDED 1865 PORT HOPE, ONTARIO Residentia. Church School for Beautiful Uecalthy situation, overlooking Lake On ta 20 acres of Playing Fields, Gymnasium, Magnifict Covered Rink Boys preeared for the Universities, Royal Miita ry an usiness. Religions training throug hout the Special attention gîven-to younger boys. Several scholarships for young boys. NEXT TERN afCINS WEBRE8DAY, .JANUAIY For Calendar apply tu the Headmaster- RIV. F. GRANAN üRCHARD, M. A. (Garni (Late Headmaster St. Atban*s Sehool, Brockvil",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISEa 1 Çddleqtx 1=4 FORTY-NINTH YBAR A Church Residential and Day School ForiGirls kjs New Buildings-Beautiful healtby situation with 7 acres of playing fields. Junior Scho il to Matriculation Course. Househoîd Science, Music, Painting. Preaident. Thse Rigisi Reyd. Thse Lord Bishop of Toronto. Principal. Mia.WoahhM.A. Vice-Prncipal, Miss Nation, M. A. (Trioùy Colleue). (aln HeadiMtns uirSho.Ms A. M.. Ro iee Hinher Certificate National Froshal Union). Îatle of Cheltenhasu Ladien Codege. For Calendar appiy Io the Burs.r. SChristian home and an Bahoi bt ive school are conbined 1 à uDwnpmlà A env ras e rf f .gg *~ P AfP HON. PRINCIPAL: 1Miss M. T.-ScoTT PRjiCIPAL: Miss Ensrr M. REÂrs, M.A. Preparation for the University and for examinations in Music. Art andi Domnestic Science Departments. Thoroughly efficient Pctus and ternis, vrite the Prrscîpal tennis, basketball, rink. Healthful locality. Primary Scbool for Day Pupils 1. WARNER, M.A., D. D'i SPRING TERE WILL BEGIN JANUARY i ni. St., Thomas, Ontario 62 FOR PROSPECTUS APPLY TO THE PRINCIPAL P BETHUNE -COLLEGE, OSHAWA, ONT. A REsIFORNTIRLS Visitor, The Lord Bishop of Toronto. Lion for the University and for the examinations of the Tornnto Conse rvatory of Music. hildren also received.. I*ion, Outdoor gamea and physical training. elcal Department (Piano, Theory and H-armony) will be under thue direction of a Master. and of a Sister, who for taug ht in thse School with niarcec succes. Iture will bc in charge of a qualifled suistreas. IPartilauo, appir ks t6 SiSTI, IN CHAR=E or te Tla SISTEIS OF ST. J0111 THE DIVINS, Majorll St.. TOONTO. SMararet ]Baton %cboo[ of Itterature anb EWreeton Sta..t. Twont. -bar»'. Scott xRaff Piaactipal Lltera.îure, French and Germait, Ph .ysical Culture. Voice Culture, TInterpretation, Oratory and Publie Speaking. and Dram\u0026atic Art. gond for oaar [BURY COLLEGE Rockcif f Parki Ottawa RESIDENT SCHOOL FOR BOYS [Odern Fireproof Building. Pure Water Supply. Small Classes. Gymnasium. hapel. R. M. C. Entrance 1914, ail candidates passed, one first place. Pidar aPPly....Rev. Goo. P. Woolicombo, M. A. (O-xon.) Headinaster wa Ld ColegeNEW BUILDING, ABSOLUTELY FIREPROOF -w a ies Co lg Porfectly Sanitary, fitted vlth every modoern convenleuce Work up to the firat year university, music, art, domestic science, physical culture ljs one of the most up..to..date coîleges in Canada and possesses all the advantage of a. ini the Capital. For. Calendar Ap,61y to- R.'v. J. W. H. Mils., B A. D. D., Preaidant. '-Uon L. L.. D., C. M.G., Chairman of Board.",
         "14 CÂNADIÂN MAGAÀZIN ADVERTISER QUEEN'S UNI VERSITY KINGSTON, ONTARIO ARTS tEDUCATION MEDICINE SCHOOL 0F, MINING MINING CHEMICAL MECHANICAL CIVIL IELECTRICAL ENGINEERING GEO. Y. CHOWN, Registrar. A BOARDING SCHOOL FOR BOYS. ~ UIADEASTER-A. G. Mainwar- NS 'ýJgIbM. A. Tinity College, iIOUSEMASTER-J. J. Stepen, M. A., Dublin University. VISITOI- The Lord DBis.p of Ontario. Separate bouses for Senior and junior Boys. The School grounds cover 24 acres. 191 5 , lt place. to tle Readutaster. HOME STUDY Arts Courses ànly SUMMER SCHOO L. isuly anui A4Msml ONEGOUTOFI1 ;- APPLICANTS FOR INS DO NOT LET DELAY -.E IN GO Royal Naval College ofC T R nt exminaton for the entry Cadte illbe held at the -examini tres of the Civil Service Commission 1916, successful candidates joining th on or about Tht August. Applications will be received up to 15t11 April by I tary, Civil Service Commission, Otta whom. blank entry forma ean now be Candidates for the examination in must be between the«ages of fourtecen teen on the lst July, 1916. The seheme of training at the Colleg, on that in force in, the English Nava' at Osborne and Dartmouth, but i~t is pulsory for cadets to, f ollow a Navm when they have completed the coufl lasts three years. McGîlI and Toront, sities allow the College course to cou] year at the Science School. The A~dxal take a maximum of 8 cadets annually Royal Navy, where the pay and prospe be identical with that of cadets who ha0 into the Navy from Osborne and Dar' Further details can be obtained ffl tion to the undersigned. G. J. DESEARAT Deputy MUnister of the N av Departmient of the Naval Service, Ottawa, january I Ith, 1916 Unauthorized publication of this advertise!leflt paid for.-90'94",
         "CANÂDIÂN MAGÂZIN9 ÂDVERTISEB l tatéd oj bond, uhi w. offer-sent on pplication. Every- Securit» poss- gses the qualifies, eisential in a sound ivestmeni, combining SAFETY 0F 'RINCIPAL AND INTEREST lA THE MOST FA VORABLE VITEREST RETURN. Qovernmont - Municipal Oorporatlon andl Proven tindustrial B3onds. Yieidl 4%Y to 8% F', shall be pleasd Io aidy\u003ea in 1h. îcion of a deira bie imeslment. RIMIN1 SECUITfà ýRpopiMION-LIMTED) These Two Calendars Are Ready for YOU 0f ail the calendar designs submitted to us, this series excelledi by a large rnargin. They are artistically reproducei -in soft, beautiful colora, - only close observation can distinguish them front the ~ ~ water color originals. Kindly ~Zenclose 5c. to cover cost of !\"wrapping and mnailing. ~~ The Beauty Sof these subjects lies in the Ssoft reflned qkin the artist Shas given them. They re- Sfiect the results, obtainable with the-use of GOURAUD'S Oriental Cream tcsteskin adcm plexion. In uefrnal trequarters of a century. Serzd loc. for tril $£go. FR.T. HOPKINS \u0026 SON Montroal 7% nvestment Einbodying three essentials requircd by car*- fui and sbrewd invesoris, Sale\u003e', rofI( Moumey Bmclk your attention is direcied to an exceptio nal oppor- tunity for izwestiment in od$ that wilI pay you 7% interest in place of 3% that you are Setting on your money. Tlese Bonds carry absolute securiy, a guar- anteed interest of 7/ý. per annum, and the privilege of witixdrawing ail or amy part of your inventaient at amy time after one year on 60 dayà' notice. Bonds are issued in denominations of $ 1,000, $500 and $100 each, and are absolutely non- assessable, and afford an excellent opportunity fo lhe investaient of large or mnail suais of aioney. Wite*for full paiculara to Nehiaile Secoritios Coîoielion LIINIIITD CONFEOIRATION LIFE BUILDINIG TORONTO CA?\u003cADA\u0026",
         "16 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVEUTISER r.- - - The Continued Prominen( of The Great-West Life tells -its bwn'storY. For the Ninth successive year The Great-West Life in 1915 stands first of ail the Companies for new busi- ness in Canada. Investigate the Policies that can earn such persist- PamIuP Capital $ 7,0O0OO0en0f0or *esSMve Fund and ntfvo. Undtvlded Profits - 7,245,140 Rtso eus 206 Branohna In Caada. Rtso ous Extending fromn the Atlantic ta the Pacific. Savings Departucut at al Bruaches. THE GREAT-W EST LUF Depoits recevd of $1.00 and upward, and intee ASSURANCE CO. allowed at Iest current rates. General Bankins Busjiess. Head Office - Winnip, THE ROYAL RANI 0F CANADA Incorporated 1809 Ompital Authorlzed $ 25,000,000 loesve Funds - S 13,174,000 Omptal Paid Up -11,500,000 Total Assets - 185,000,000 HEAD OFFICE -MONTREAL DIRECTORS, SIR HERBERTS. HOLT, Premident E. L. PEASE, Vice-Presfdeni E. F. B.JOHNSTON, K.C,.SdFW' Wiley S.nith Hon. David Mackeen G. R. Crowe James Redtmond A. J. BrownI, e* C D. K. Elktt Hon, W. H. Thorne Hugh Paton T. J. Drummond W.. Roberftson C. S. Wilcox W. J. Sheppard A. E. Dymnent C. E. Neill Executive Officers. E. L. Peus, General Maniagr W. B. Tomrnoe, \"upt of Branches C. B. aeW adF. J. Sherman, Asit. ~Gen.-Unsger 340-13RANCIIES THROUOUT CANADA-340",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERT18ER Dividends Maintained! That sounds better than the usual story of diminished profits, reduced dividends and unsatisfactory bus- iness conditions so commonly heard at the present time. THE London -Life Insurance Company Head Office: London, Canada continues to pay profits.one-third in eXcess of the amount originally Promised under present rates. Sane management, Safe In- vesments and Solid Position enable the Company to mneet ail present emlergencies without interfering with the liberal profits paid Policyý- hlers. Why flot place your insurance iterests in the handis of a Company thtso carefully perforais the trust 'ItPosed upon it Plcies -\" Good as GoeM \"ý-Company JONMcCLARY DR. A. O. JEFFERY. K.C. PredýntVic-.president ..RICHTR F.A.S. F. E_ RE D,B.A., .IA. MangerAie Managez \u0026 Actuaiy THE SAVING HABIT It is easy to acquire the habit of saving if a deposit account be opened and depolsits made regularly. It is easy to open the account. A deposit of one dollar is ail that is required with this Corporation. Deposits of one dollar and upwards may be made at any time. Ail wilI bear compound interest at dou y) A growing balance at your credit is a great satisfaction. It is an insurance against the unforeseen emergencies that everyone has sometime to meet. If with thîs oid and strong institution it will be al- ways available when required. Open an account Coda y. Canada Permanent Mortgage Corporation Paid up Capifal and Roserve Fund $10,750,000 TORONTO STREIT9 TORONTO ESTABLISHED 1855.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE AD.VLRTISLR A Personal Matter * were going to cut you off tomorrow, would yol listen to a proposition whereby, for a moderat\u003c sum, deposited with the North American Life your wife would be assured a substan Liai annua income as long as she -should live ? 0f cours( you would. WetI you do flot know the time, but the callis certain. Stili we make you tha proposiion-an income absolutely guaranteed *your widow tvery year as loni as she shail lîve. It will save you worry while you live; it wl1 save the home when you die Gel thec li/lie bookiet \"The Real Service \" which explains il fully. You have but toaQ NORTHI AMERICAN LIFE -ASSURANCE Co- Hfead Office TORONT04 CAN. HEAD OFFICE HAMILTON CAPITAL AUTHORIZED $5,000,000I CAPITAL PAID UP ....... $3,000,000 SAVNGSBANK DEPARTMENT AT ALL SAVINGS BRANCHES",
         "y",
         "THIE CHATEAU OF AMBOISE From a pen and wash drawing bv% E-,tele NI Kerr",
         "THE NADIAN MAGAZINE TORONTO, FEBRUARY, 1916 No. 4 .OYAL CASTLES IN FRANCE BY ESTELLJE M. KERR 7 ITAT have become of the ~casties iu France, the pie~- turesque piles that serve to ve ita history? Are they hos- barracks, or military Prisons? .dly they have given themn- to the service o! their eounii- sorne formi or other, niow that mny o! defenc(,e hias routed the ,olitan hordes who, armned with tund guiide-books o! Gerinati uged te visit them daily and open-mnouthed, while aged re- p, ingling keys, recited in r\u003eMOUS tones the thrillmng tales ps long dead. ory lias avquired a L signi- Sfortrelsses. duingeons, aud are w\u003eo longer elassed with en- d princse and dragons, but ay old-towu o! Loches, with its turreted castie set on a hiIl lik» a pictuire fromn a book of ales. 'Modern siège gung would short work of the fortifications centuries ago wvere deemed ima- ible, and the inhbabitants of the val town may live to 'regret their bouses are hiuddled se , round the ehateaui wvhich cov- crs the hiLUI on whiieh it stands withi a confusion e!of ls roofs, towers and Loches lias changed but little sincve the day' s whien Richard Coeur de Lion ,-tay-ed the(re, on hiq wvay home fromn the Cmusades. thoughi 1ma11y royal personages have Ieft their ixnprin lt,. withrm its gray stonie wals hale VIT. of France with his levey ns- tress, Agnes Sorel. Iived there whien the country was devastatedl by the hunidred years war, and iu the round tower is the tomb of the lovely Agnes sinmeunted( by a statue wvhieh repre- senta lier Iying with hanid.s fololedg on hiem hreast and a laxnb nt hier fret. lIn this samne tower is the heauiitifuilly. scuilptuired( omatory e! Anne o! Brit- tany, wife of King Charles VITI. and Iater of Louis XII, here she prmayed for the succegs o! the political plans whivlh proiniptel hier marriage into the royal famiily'. The walLq are de- coma ted with lier graeful emiblem. the erînine and thie neekiet. As the eminer is the emblemn of purity. the motto iii said to menu : \"I shail bie pure ail my life\". This saine devie may be seen carved in many of the,",
         "IAIE CIIA 1EAU OF CHIENONCEAUX, NOW A HOSP'ITAL FOR TlIEIE:HAU othier chateaux as a reminder that Anne of Britauny lived there, tee. It is as a state prison that Loches is most celebrated, and is partici- hirly notorious for thic unscýrupulous lises te which Louis Ni. puit its dread- fui underground prison. A very graphie description of Loches in the time of that monarch may be found in Sir Walter Scott's novel \"Quentin Duirward\", The iron cages invented by Cardinal Balue, the adviser of Louis. who became their first victim may uqtill be seen, and the( subter- ranean passage leading from the dungeons te the castie through whieh the cruel monarch camne to mock his former friend and ask him how it feit te hang in a cage suspended from an iren book-a cage tee low for its inmate te stand upright and tee short for hlmi te lie down. 'Phere aiso may be seen the chamber and instruments of torture. black dutngeons wkere the air neyer penetratcdl and the inmates died slewly for laek of hreath; dark dungeens inte which prisoners were thrust and remained uintil they felu into a haole down, clown, till tée were dashed te pieces on the stne below. Here tee were heavy iro collars chained to the wali whieh foreýed thle victinis te remain stand. ing until at the end o! three days at meost, they fell froni utter exhaugsj\u003c\u003en and se strangled. The occuipanits o! thle dilngtoll, a Loches whiled away sie jouely hiours by inseribing their se ntm.t on the walls and one ef thein baEa C a verse in the stone tes;tifying that in spite e! his cruiel destiny anid th suffering hie endured, there rmie for him the pleasures ef tender. lo, and sweet hope. Triily an optiauj- tic seuil. Our boy-, ln Germany don't italk like that in the letters 1 have read. Another prisoner. Ludovic 'pra Construceted, a simple sundial aig the window which enabled hùi to tell the time and mark off the nin y)ears ef his conl¶nement. At the end of that turne he was liberated ari died, they say, frein sheer joy, u the damp, ehilly atinoaphere of tht",
         "THE CH\u0026JITEAU\" 0F LI sho.;ng tho St ,~ f Fne1 . us to believe that joy was dly cause of Sporza's death. round passages lead from to the outer fortificationsi, and there a great many pour people have made their homes , partly with- in the solid masoury of the fortifica- tions and partly in caves hollowed",
         "TIIE CHATEAU 0F LOCHES out from the eliff. These dwellings eonsist of two roomis; the outer with a door and a window, and the inner lighted only by an aperture between it and the front room, while behind, clark and dismai, the mysterlous pas- sage leads to the castie. Tt is almost like living in the trenches, but I amn sure our poor soldiers wouldI envy, them the situation of their dug-outs, high and dry on the hiliside aud com- manding a wonderful view, across red-tiled roofs, of thxe beautiful val- leY of the river Indre with its vine- yards and fields, of grain, for 'the Touraine is one of the richest agricul- tural districts in France. The womnen are apecustomiedl to working in the field and they will have to do more than their share this year while their hushandq and sons are fighting, not 80 very far away, for their homes and the beaugtifuil land they love. Near Amnboise the river Loire ie its best, aud the majestic feuj castie wvith its round white t#, riscs precipitously above it, so that you. hardyv notice the amnall tr huddled at its *base. The high-pej ed gardens whivh cover odd porti of the rock on whieh the ea stands make up iu pieturesquér what they laek iu exteut. The gr, terrare is vimhelljshed by the Ji chapel of St. Hubert where the hir, mng-mass was said to the royal pa before they set out for their fave ite sport, and over the doorway i charming bas-relief representing miraculous hunt of that hôly In 'Within the shrine repose the bone. Leonardo da Vinci, Who is said have died at Amboise inx the. artm his royal patron. Ou the other side of the. castl. j tierrac~e once devoted to thie j«u",
         "ROYAL CASTLES IN FRANCE ne, and ait the end of ani avenue Iipped limes is a Inw door inI the( where Charles VIII., when per- Jly superintending thie workmnen addedp( the first renaissance de- to the fortress chateaui, is said avé struick his hiead and divid. It gt Amnboi.se too that his widow, e of Brittany, mourned hai deathi re slip beeamne the wife of bis pfflr, Ljouis \\UI. wkia here also that Francois y1ier and bis sister Mrurt . ieieted,. and with their rer,. Loeuise de SaVy formiled t Praneois la his early dIay- ised %Il 1«the trinity of loveý\". Birother sister spent xnany happy hours *ng together on the terrave or tryv- their bands at sonnets, for Fran- waag no mnean rhymiester and guerit, %vas g,,ive1 fihe n'amle of Sgreat feature of the e\u003castie isý round tower of astounding size !h contains. instead of a stair- a wonderful inclinied plane withi )pf. go gentle that a eoach and *May be driven to the top. It is te) have been eonstrueted byv ,ros Premnier in order to receive .4.. V. of Spain, wbo was uinable iount the, stairs. Thirouighoiut the etut the suggestions of Francois's mUec instincts may be( seen la the low framings aud ornamentations, ,,h embelliqb th(, stern lines of the original fortress and lielp to majjke it what il is tdaa beautlifuil ami harmloilious whole. Ainh1oise, the inost roiaili of ail atison the Loire, is to iny mmiid. inidisýoIlubly' a\"Ssoeiited withl fztlltuusý Mary, Queen of Scots. Though lier Stav hevre was brief, the mlemlory of onle dreadfull day wihen Mar-y iid hier younig hbad rnisIl. wert- forcedl to wivinss thle dre-adfiul mlas- sreof the Hulguenlots, volipses ail othiers. The white Stone of tue( casie and the, absence of trees give the place \u003ca semi-tropical appearance whein thie sun shbinles, and as you crosýs the( oldi stone bridIge, it is not dlifficit to iima- gine thev glittering prcsinof the Sixten-yc ar-old King, Frni Il., and hiis girl bride, with archevrs, pages and nien-at-arms, as it rodeý acro.ss fihe saine bridge. In their train wa, Catherine de Mfedici, the\"uen iiotheri\" of three kings, who, wvithi thle Duc (le Guiise and Cardinal de Lorraine, was the rel ruder of file kiiigdlom, and whio, fearing a lluig- ucuot rising, hadi hastily mnovedl the court froin the rkistle in the openi town of Blois. Io thle ,,trotigzloll oif Pranceis rode lu front, tail slighlt adhandsoine, but verv eîae lookinig. wvith the lovel y Mary a t bis, sid(e. not knowing why they hlad been sumnmoned so sudnyfrom Blois ANOTHER V119W 0F LOCHES",
         "TUE CANADIAN MAGAZINE They were escurted to a stately siîte of apartmrents wvith windows reach- ig fronm fluor to eeilinig, overlooking the river on one side and the terrace where the dreadfuil mnassaec was soon to take place, on the other. The gallery wa.s wainscotted in gilded oak and the, lofty ceiling-, were emnblaz- orned wvith heraldie emnblemas and mon- ogramas. Chandeliers, holding per- fiimed candies and huing with glitter- ing pendants wvere siuspended froin the- ceilinig, and rich brocades and tapevstrieýs aduorned the walls. Amnidst these luixurj-ous. siurrolundçinga9 Mary and] Franieis rested while the Qucepn- Mother biisied he(rseif at state affaira. A conciliatory ediet had been drawn lip asking the Huguenot chliefs to attend a couincil meeting at Amiboise, buit this was unly a mneans of gaining tiine. The conspirators, eniboldered by the ced ict, came towairds- Amiboise, and the royalist soldiers captured t hem in straggling bands and hield them for bloody puib- lie inassacre. Everyv duor uf the caqtle was guiarded and the gailery was fil of troopa. The terrare was tiirned intu a camp, and on the ap- pointed day ail the prisoners were driven towards Amboise like sheep, to the, shamble. After two thuusand had, been cap- tuired the Quceen-MuNfther led the trenibling King and Qcn to a cuv- ered balcony huing with erinison vel- vet with seats for the royal party. Beneath this waq a scaffuld cuvered with a black cloth, before whieh stood an executioner ini scarlet. The prisonerg were rangedl by the bun- dreds along the walls. guarded by archers and muasketeers. The ap- pearanre ot the royal party was the Anne, wWfr off Louît XIL. signal for the butchery to begia. Prisoner after prisoner was hastily executed while the playing ot a band drowned their agonized cries. Speechless with horror pat the young sovereignas unitil, unable to look any longer, Mary tainted and F'rancis asked his muother's priso to withdrawv. \"My son, 1 command yuu to stay\" gaid, Catherine. \"Duce de Guise sup. port your niiece and teacli ler lier duity as a sovereign. She must Iearn~ to govorn those hairdy Scots ot liera!\" i3etwen the ranks uf suldiers mnv. ed a line ot bareheaded men. with, bowed heads, whuse prayers went un tu heaven while they waited their tiirinat the gallows. When ail the muirdering was over, the bodies of th chief conspirators were hung in ehairis trum the bàleony; the re miain der of the, corpses were throw-n into the, river Luire a hundred tet below. The stenceh ot the bodies be- came s.o great that Catherine wa forced to take the yuung king and qucen to Chenonceaux, but the sho*k was ton mueli for the sickly Praneiq, for he died suon atterwarda and left Mýary« 'Stuart a widuw at eighteen. and obliged her to leave the pleaait land of France, where she had pnth greater part ot her lite, and seton regrettuilly for lier native but un- familiar Seotland. An imaginative visitor at Amboîse mnay see trace-, ut blond niixed wlth the red rust on the iron bars ofthe, haleony where the heada, o th~e Huguienot cnspiracyv were hung, bil it is difficuit to believe in sucli ghst- lv deeda while gazingz at the wonder, fi view, for in point oft llti)I Amuboise stands supreme. Louïs XII. Fra\"\u0026o~ 1. B4BLEKIS 0F FRENCHI KINGS ANDJ QuKiNS",
         "CH1AMBHORD) aneoB Premier Lad a mania for ing, but why hie chose to place atle of Chambord on the dry Bandy plains Of the Sologne re- Fia mystery. It is said that hc 0 as a souivenir of bis youthful c)n for the Countess de Thoury, r chatelaine of that district, but 5olossal magnitude of tic castie not suggest so sentimental an n. Il was more probably dlue to \u0026et that tiec ountry abounded in gaine anïd F'rancois, who was a huntsman, grew fond of the when he came here with his wr, i wife, and his beautiful talented sister Marguerite, wien abord was but a gloomY fertress bc swampy banks of the little Cosson and barely large gh t accominodate the court. iveiv genius at once imagîn- le lovely river Loire turned front i.ure and the present caste, 'd t0 its magnificent ieight, re- ,d in the shining waters--a pro- ject that xas neyer earried eutl. Chambord lies four leaguies fromn Blois and thc road leads tirouigh flât uninteresting country whosc soul was one supposed te 1w the poerest in al France. Now it is planted with vine- yards, and fromn late Septemiber until December there is a constant harvest. Thc forest surroundfing the eastie, planted by Francois, lias been cut down, se to-day there is only a mes- gre grove, and the great white cha- teau with its many turrets may be seen, framed by stunted pines, gleain- ing at tic end of any of the alleys that lead tirough the, park straigit te the castle, like the spokes of iR wheel. The towers, chimneys, cupolas and gables tiat crown thc massive struc- ture look more like the spires of a city than the features of a single building, and the eigit prodigious round towers, wiici are a specialty of CJhambord, seem monstrous and extraordinary, but it is said 10 o i te",
         "CAtAIESINE DE MEICIýSFRNOSIEM greutest rcietaltrimph of its day. Thei( iliterior of the castie, stripped 11 flie furies of the Revoluition, lo\u003c*sa eo)Il and brvery% iffe4reut fromn its a8pect wheni the luxury-loving Franeois. dressed iu the rieuhest and brightest of Italian v-elvets, wvith his littie band of blondes and brunettes, lised te frequeut ifs halls. lu ifs airchIitectutral emhellishimeuts are maased everY de ie eoration and ecc(entric-itY o! his favourite style. Even bis intriguing life is refleeted in the doubly spiralled stair-case mider the eentral tower. representing a gigautie fleur de lys in stone, the only one the Revoluýtionists did not SuecIeed iu destroying. wbepre those whlo aseud are hiddcn from those whlo descend. There are doors con- cealed in sliding panels behind the wall-hangings, aud Inany double walls and secret stairs. There are thirteen visible staireases and a rooni for every dLIy in the year. On the ground floor is the guard-room froni which one minounts by the great spiral stairway te a similar apartmeut which was used as a theatre, and m9 here mauy famouis pîsys were,ý tirai produced, MoIière himnself frequentjy appeariug lu themi It was in Chambord that F'ranicejs, flrst began to introduce the sa1sjnatj der lu his device which may be a.en together with his erowned F. in maost of the royal chateaux of France, for there are very« few lu whieh h.li didj not leave his iiuprint. Francois had a navlosappreciation for the beautiful. It was hle who trau4fori.. ed the gloomny fortres;s hoine that had been thec abode of French royal. tv Jito elitboratelY deuorated. lurx- uirious castles. The grounds sur- roundiug them, bare and foot-tro\u003c. den enclosed witli walls of defeneë. hie chauged to parks and gardens with avenues leadiug thirough them. that showed vistas of river or oe country. Ile purchlascd niaster- pieces of Italian painting and seulp- turc and broughit architects and artists froni ltaly -even the gT-t Leonardo da Vinci. throutgh whoge portrait of Francoîs lu Tlie Lou'vre we have become famniliar with hi, bandsome person. aud the longest nose in history. Hlis mny istake.3 and",
         "FMCI L. AMI H1PVU WIFE- MIARN SlUARl iîQUEIEN OF S,ý01s wviil be iforgiveti becus h JeFrance what she stili remnains, centre of Art for ail the world. ~rncis inaide Chambord his ourite residence and for some e before hlis death lie lingered re withl ii sister Marguerite, ýenj of Navarre. Noeof the(, other g. eared nu]uch for' it. Lou1is XIV. d it oecasionally as a huntling ge. and Louis X.gave it to réehâl de Saxe. the victor of Fon- 07, whJO spent his old age there id parades, Near hy are thec bar- kms built for the ifccommiodiation of regiment of horse forined by thic réehal : the excrc'ising O! this \"lit- armny\" was flic ehliefamsen the Old soldier. Later the castie 1) bougbt by lnational suhacription Igiven to the( Due de Bordeaux, upeetive King of France, whose M takinlg the titie o! Comte de amnbord, are kept poor 1, the, intenanop Of the estate. The re- ý\"s o! the roof alone absorb a large Kt of their revenue. This fact \u003eS not surprise youi when vol, walk )ut the roof in a complication of IIe$es, through the multitude o! meêyq and gables; itself a Pro- fuaeoly orniinented uastle M fithe air*. Altogether Chamibord stukme as being iieaniinglesa.,, and in spite o! its pompous appearance, it plaYs but a sinall part in the arinais o! history. The tarn of Blois was very'% recent- ly the starting place froin whicýh gay motor-loade o! tourists dashed out to visit other chateaux. Indeed they werc very gay and very numierous. that 1 cann testify, for Myý roorn iin file littie inn on the qua ' -as. feon- omIicaIllyv Situated above theV garaýlge. ,,nd even the small hours of the night eef ar f romi peaeful. Chambord. julst eýight ilies away, was once il shooting-box be-longing to the omi o! Blois, and au hoiir's drivi, in in vn dliretion will bring you in view of siumre architectural feature of historie inte-reqt. Now anlyv automobiles of thec army. fllled wvithi stern-!aed warriors go past, and tlle people who derived their living chiefly fromn touriqs are feeling thecirloa On the water-front thic towu looks- briglit and attractive. especially as 1 saw it at sunset when the xnany-areh- cd býridige. with its eream-eoloured stones. was tuirned to gold and re-",
         "TUE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Ilected in the. tranquil waters of the river Loire. It was disappointing t. find that the castie itself is net beside the. river, but rather ovenliangs the. towni whièh, apart freni its water- front, lu rather dxiii. The castie, on the othor baud, is flot dig\u003e' enough. It isoe-rsoe and presents sucli at comrplicated arra\u003e' of various forma iit airchitec-ture that it loses its effeet as ant artistip whole. We catnet be tee thanikful that the architet who eretedtf( the xnost modern portion of the castie, the pavillon of Gaston d'Orléans, was not able te comrplete bis planio et aking over the entire palacev on the stolid precise lines that wvere adnxired in bis generation. Its contrast with the. adjolnixxg wing of Franeoig Premier, wilh all its ex- quisite extravagance of ornamnenta. tion., lasatounding. The castie is usually entered thirolgh' the wing ot Louis XII., the chalirmfitg facade Of Whichi preseuts another architectural conitrast. Tt is built ef redl brick, crossed ber. and there with purpie, and bas a high roof of puirple siate with caps and arches uciptured with the porcupine et Louis or thie ermnine and cord of Anne ef I3rittany. The lew door is crwnd ith a bas-relief of the good King Louis on horseback, a reproduc- tion et the, primitive statue destroyed during the F'renchi Revoluition. The wiug erectedj b\u003e' Franeois Premnier however greatiy transcenda tii. others iu beauty and historie lu- tereat, snd the surmonut et elaborate wvorkmanship la seen in the winding qtairway, every inch et wii l wrought over 'wlth ciiiselied orna- mecntation, the chief design being the heraidie salamander ot F'ranceis. The qalamander la everywhere: over the chineys. doers and( walis. The. cor- nire la like a bracelet, the~ windows et the. attie are likce shrines for the, saluts, and everytblng suggests the work et a goidsmith on soine pre- cdous cabinet, rather tban on a build- ing exposedl te thxe weather. The. whole place abounds in secret stair- *ways, hidden doorways and deceptiv( panellings, and eue teels that evm now au assassin may lurk behind thi tapestries. One of the. chief personalities that hias Ieft bier stamp on the. ebateau ir Catherine de Medicis, the wlce.d Florentine who mnarried rIenry IL. soni et Francois Premier, but it was during the( reigi et hier three sons \u003cand eeially et Henry Ill., that ah. had liem greateat influience. When residing at Bilois she hield bier cor on the first floor et the, Fman.ois Premnier wing. Nethiug ceuildi b. more mumptuions than bier great gai- 1cr\u003e' with its diamond-panied windows and ricli dark decerations on whieh Catherinie's dcvice, a crowned C. and lier nxmrngram in gold, frequseatty appears. There iý ise a great ovel window, opposite whiich steod bier altar, and a doorway, hait cnealed, leads te bier writin g-rooem, with its secret panels ýon-cealing a stairway throuigh which lier astreloger Coetmo PRuggieri could coame te liem whenever lie was sumnoned. Catherine had broughit Cosiue trorn ltaly, and lie was the private dero on wbomn se conid shoulder lier pois- onings and stabs, whieb kept him ex- eedingi\u003e«' busqy. Whercver Catheine~ weut, Cosmo accempanied ber, and in B3lois ho was instailed lu the towe. on the plattoriu et whicb a flat stll table was placed te terni a texunda- tien for bis cabaliatie instruments Tiie apartnxents ot the. Queen. Mother were directiy beneath th. guard-rooni where tiie Duc de, Guise was murdered by thie erder et lier sou, Heury TII, and that event tak. ing place while sh. lay on lier deatb,. bed could net have added to lier peaetul demnise. She bad beggd H{enry te spare the powertuil I)x*. net fer bunuane, but politîcal raos but thie bitherte effeminate Hlenry who painted bis face and wore ear- rings, would net listen te ber. \"Metber,\" lie replied, \u003c'you bae neyer spared an eneni\u003e wlthin your power, uer w'lit",
         "ROYAL .CASTLES IN FRANCE o, when the Duke had corne to at- 1 parliamnent at Blois, the murder earefully planncd. The guard doubled, and a company of Swiss e posted around the courtyard uip and] down the gorgeous stair- ý. s Guise entered the council- rnber be was told that the king [id see hlm in bis private ront, to !h wichi hie passed tlirough the rd room, and the door was barred ind him. Th'len the guards, hid. behind the wall tapestry, sprang and stabbed hfim ini the breast. le Catherine, dyiug in the ron )w heard a rush o! armed men, a 1 thud, and] a terrible ery, and %w that ail wag over, not only for Duce de Gujise, buit for Heury ,doubly hated for this traitorous d.wag soon assassinatedl. and with i died the ilouse of Valois. t was under the réglime of Gaston ýrlêanq that the gardens o! the teau o! Blois came to their great- excellence, and a Catalogue of itga nd flowers grown there at that is nomes the potato plant as a ut novelty. The Queen Claude MRa were couSidered delicaces, and tomato bad jusît been imported In exco Even tobacco was ,wn ini the gardens. 3lois was the last capital o! Napol- ,In empire and the château walls ltcred many prisoners. Perbaps à1 will again play an important Kt in the bistory o! France now it it is no longer the favourite lking..ground o! tourists. I!he eream-turretcd ehiatpau of mnonceaux, built bridge-wise acros !river Cher, is quite the most bit\u0026ble o! royal dwelliug-s. Tt is ,re o! a couxntry bouse than a castle state, and the inemories that sur- ind it abound in gaiety rather than xigue; they are personal rather in political. Tt is the, place where ýajjois Premier loved to flah, where p fasiating Diane de Poitiers need. wbere Catherine de Mediei gave her Venetian water-f»ýtes, and where, when it had passed frorn ro-yal bands, the kindly. M. Dupin and bis, wife entertained their brilliant circle of friends. Jean Jaques Rousseaut writcs in his \"Confessioûns\": \"W\\e went to speud the, autumun in the Touraine at the château of Chenoneaux, a royal re- sidence upon the Cher, buit byv lcnry Il. for Dianv dle Poitiers whose initiais are stili to be sven there, and now in possession of M, Dupin. the farmeqr.general. We ampsed ouirselves greatly in this fine place; the liv-ing wvas of the, best, and T became fat as a m1oxik. We made a great deal of music and aeted omin edies.\" Now the beautiful, pleasuredloving Chenoneaux lias enitcrcd on atnother phase o! history, for it bans been tranisfcornied into a Red Cross Hlospi- tal for the Freinchl army, througb the gene(rosity of its present owner, M. Menier, the chocolate manufacturer. Not only ba- M. Menier given the use of the castie but he bas also contri.. bute(] a large sum o! money for its maintenance and the cemploymient of doctors and nurses. A lovelier spot, for the sick and suffering couild Tnt be imagined. Seen from the entrance gate, the castie lookq surprisiugly ernaîl, but very lovely, with its delieately finish- ed facade of pale yellow stone, A charming littie Glothicechapel tbat overb ang s the water. is fastened to the left side o! the bouse, but it ie only when seen obliquely freux the aide that the building is seen to be u1nique. To enter the chateau one must cross a draw bridge, for it is mo\u003eored. like a boat in the middle o! the rapid- ly-flowing river Cher. wbieb, twelve miles farther empties into the 'Loire. The magrnificent park which sur- rouinds it gives to this architectural gem a setting unequalled by any of the other casties, and froux the op- posite aide of the river the mass of pointed turrets, glist\u003cening spires and",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE, pillared arches seen through the treos, forms a pic-ture that will linger long in the momory. The ilain part of the château was buit, on the foulidatione of an old miii, b\u003e' Thomas Bohier, and is attri- buted te Pierre Nepveu, the daring airchlitee-t of Chamibord. After the dealli of Bohier the elateau was seizedl b\u003e' the, Crown and] Pranceois Premier hield the place till hie death, whlen bis son, Hlenry Il., presented it to the vharming Diane de Poitiers. callid \"the admirod of two genera- fions\" bevause when her chiarmes pal- ed ]in the C\u003e'Cs of Francois, she turn- vd vucssul to his heir. Diane, \"the brightest ernamnent of a b)eautty-loving court,\" was said te have preserved lier youth and beaut\u003e througli tho serceries of the ring of Charlemnagne. The Duchiese d 'Es- tamrpes was fond( of rexninding lier rival that slie was born on the dlay that 'Diane wns married, and Cather- mne dle Medici. the, jealous quecu, re- fe-rred to ber as \"ani old hag\". The gift of Chenonceaux to the hate-d Diane rankled in Queen Cath- eranle's soul. $lhe had greatly' eoveted this lovel\u003e' woodland place, for with al] lier taults C'atherine lad an ex- celilent taste in houses, Ro when the King lay dylng, woundcd in a tourna- ment, Catherine sent a imeenger eemrmandîng Diane to give up Chen- onceaux. To which Diane replied: \"le the King yet dead ?\" and whp.i the miessenger answered that he could not live a dlay, Diane replied: «Tell the queen that I amn mistrese se long as the king lives.\" It waq Diane who eaused the five- ardhed bridge to be buitl, forming a promenade fromn the castie, but it was C\"atherine who buit the long gal- lerY upon it and se made a spacious wving of two atonies, with the long banqueting-hall below. This bas four full-length windows on each side, looking up and dewn the stream. N\\ow the white cota of thue Red Cross line its walls, and tic mon wio fougit se vallantly to defend their country wil ho lulled te rest b\u003e' the gurgliug of the river Cher. Under Qucen Catheriine's régime. lite at Chenonceaux was a series (if fêtes and gorgeous pageants, Magmtflcent water fêtes were de.- vised to suit the Unique situation of the castie, and te remnind tIe que.» of a Venetian spectacle. The river banks were feetooned with chaînas or swingîng lamps, ,;Oftlv-eoloiiredl liglits gleamed in the gardons suid froim the castle windows, whjlc ati armyv of Catherine's servants in their gold and black, uniformes linedl the drawbridge and avenues., holding flaxning torches. The fountains sprayed perfumed waters, munsicilns filled the air with melodly, and gorg- eously-dreeeed pages dlistributtedl fruit and flowcrs fromn golden saivora. On thc river were silk-ranope gondlolas and fantastie barques siuap, vd liker birds or blitterffies whose glit- terinig wings fornued the sails. C.IiIy- dressed people, their identity slightly disguised by the smaîl eye-maê ,whieh Catherine introducedi troin Ital\u003e', reelined in the boats that elr- cled around a barge nuoored in the centre of tie stream where the quieen's mueicians were stationed wvhile ln the galler\u003e' above, a gr.at banquet was served on silver and gold plate-peacoeks, wild b)oa rs with gildcd tusks, and tongues of night. ingales. A different tare le served to-day b the Red Cross nurses, but perhap*s they tell tIe convalescent soldier. etorice of days gone b\u003e', se that they ean hear the hunting-Iorn of F'ran cois Premnier sounding in thie distanoe. or conjure up the faseinating Diane with her ermine and pearls, or th sombre Catherine in bcr blaek vlyet and white-starehed rufT, who uspd to direct the activities iu the chateau so long ago. We hope that tie poor seldiers wilU be able to sa\u003e' witi Rousseau: «We amused ourselves greati\u003e' in this fino place; tIc living waa of the lest and I becaîne fat as a mnonk?\"",
         ")NDSLAVE 0F, THE WILDERNESS BY JOHN BEAMES I E said hie naine was Coe, and there was no particular rea- son to believe that hie wus ly- g. For the man was so hopeles, spiritless, so generally broken \u003ewn and ineffectual that he would trdly seem capable of going Wo the oeible of inventing even a namte. (wer and Fored, freighting to Cross ike with three teams, overtook him ýon the trail, about eight miles south 1 Mink River. With the fellowvshîp tthe wild they hiailedl hima, and hie 11 into step beside Gower. nIe wa ~il, narrowv-chested, and bony, un- ,aven. and dressed like an Indian: ,nt is, he wore overails. coat, gloves, ocaisof buckekin, and a little wr cap, with a cloth bound about his irs and over the peak. Iliq eyes ere large, washed ont, blue, and ex- reffionlsS, except when they bc %me auxious or wistful. 11e had a 1gh, thin nose, rabbitlike front teeth, ,ad bis ehin, eovered with a scanty Pard, suid imperceptibly into a long, pr~neck, with a promninent ,darlls apple. Hle had the slack- need. shuffiing gait and the dang- Ln bande of au Indian. (;ower. short, iviry, bushy-bearded mn¶ hawk-nosed, looked hlm over rftb a pale, bard, gray eye, and iu- u~ired whither lie vas bound. \"Me? Oh, I'mi going home.\" Uce waved a vague baud northward. lis speech vas a littie halting, as if le vas unaeeustoumed Wo speaking ;,nls.But hie voice and the tone Jf bis genersi conversation were those )f a mani of smre education. A little furrow aippeared in Gow- er's brow, and Fored's eyebrows weut Up. \"h-omne?\" queried Gower. \"Trap. pin', eh 1\" \"E, es, I do0 at ittie trappiflg, buit I-er-I live up liere right aloiig.\" RFe hastened to get away front the subjeet. \"Whtere're voit f(lloNws. going Cross lake ?» Gxowe-r gruinted an assent, but wasq riot to be put off. \"Are yon workin' for thie C'omi- \"N-e was working for themn, but I quiit. I'm on my own now.\" Fored. who had been silently ob- eerving the mian, feit the suispicion ini his inid ripen to ii eertainty, Said he: \"If youi're livin' around here, miay- be we could put iup at your place. ehV\" \"Suire,\" replied the, other eagerly. \"I'd ho glati to haive vou. I-er- don't see many white mon these days.\" \"Thanks,\" said Fored perfunetor- ily, and with a slighit cuiri of seorn on his lip, and went to look after bis own team. whbich was jingling slowly along iii the lead. The furrow on Gower's brow deepened and the oor- ners of hie mouth drew dlown ini dis- dain. He knew now what thie mian wvas doing up 'here: this wss one of those despised outeasts who had eut loose from hie own people. married a sqiiaw and adopted the customs of hie Indian relatives. A silence fell, broken only by the",
         "TuIE CANADbIN MAGAZINE tinkie Of the s'leigh-bhells and tii grinding whine of the ruiers on th, liard frozen trait. Coe had noteti thi expression and presently he began tA sp)ekk in a tone partly apologetie parLltl d(efflant. \"MY place is just at M1ink River We'Il be there in two hours, anti 1 vian 11-x von up and niake you and your horses comfortable. It's pretty, liard on big horses like theni to be standing out this weather. It's pretty luckY I met von, isn't it, iiow 7» \"Ys\"agreeti Gower, \"it'q ail right te lic able to get in some place out of the, colti anti be eonifortabile.» «Toni het it laq. I'ni pretty coin- fortable miyseif here, though, about us coinfortable as a man eoulti le any- where. Don't get mnany newspapers andi that kind of thing, or mail; but then I've got nohody to write to me, anyway. I got my wife andi family, andi 1 don't have to dIo any work to speiik of, andi plenty to Pat. Why wvoldn'iit a mnan be cýomfortable 1» \"Ys»trawleti Gowver, anti the very- tene wvaR almost an insit, \"I guess it's ail right--for them that likes it!\" A littie pink flushi rose lu Coe's sallow' ehleekq, but lie took no other rntice o! the remnark. anti went on falking. Gower Icarueti that hie liat worked in former years for the Comupany-, that he hati then marrieti and hati left thieir emplo *;v anti that he hati since travelleti about the north coun- try. or liveti at Mlnk River with his wlfe'q relatives. Hie titi not mention that bis wife waq Indian, but Gower understood, anti \u003coe knew he under. stooti, andi the pink flush came anti wevnt ini lis cheek and lie taiketi faster anti faster. cynically, deflantly, pleati- ingi y , or hospitably, but under it al ran the note of shame anti remt\u003erse. The short twilight hati long fadeti into the ghostly dusk of a northern winter uight. The towering bilack spruces that lineti the trail stooti up silent andi grini in thc deep snow. A fcw owls hooteti diamally at vary. ing distances, andi some coyotes had e got up iii concert anti were baying e the mon with fiendish gice aud hid- c ous outcry. Then the men rame out upon the steep banks of M,\\iuk River, and a turn inthe tra brult ther full upon a littie cluster of log hut,%. *A whirl o! snarling, yapping, Indian dogs swept about thein, anti a fit 1 glowý of IÎght streamaet froni a quick- *ly-openied door o! the largest o! tlhe buts. *Coe shouteti in Cree, anti wua an-. swered !romn the but in the saine Ian. *guage. Two browni-skiuntedi childrer came runining to, meet hlm anti elung to bis legs. He lient over then, and then lifted strangely appealing eyeu to Gower's face. But the littie man's eyes werc flint bard-ie dislikP\u003cj ai] chiltiren, espeeially haîflircee chl-. dren. ,Coe put the youugsters gzently aside anti gave the freighters a bandi wlth their horses. He led then, to one of the stables anti turneti Several Iniean ponies out into the snow. The big horses squeeze(] through the low, niarrow doorway wlth a clevrns born of long practice anti a cordial dislike of the colti outslde. Their animaIs housed-tjie first duty of every freighter-tiey liftesj their blanket-roils anti their gruhbo ant imatie for the bouse, Coe Ieading the way. The place they found themn. selves in was about fourteen liy tweu.. ty feet in dimensions, with caves thart were flot six feet from the grounil. The floor wasa of liard-paeked earth, anti a large fire burneti in an open~ clay flreplace in a corner, and incij dentally furnisheti all the light tiior. Was tohebhatiin the pace.I bthe ffickerlng, uncertain llght thc place seemnet to lie fuil of people, especially o! chîltiren, anti the întiescriliaMe In. dian smeli was almost overpowerjn\u003c. it woulti have been altogetier over. powcring to one unaecuqtomed to the freight trail. Wlitliout a glance at the Indiaa Gower andi Foreti strode up to the fire andi calmly appropriate\u003cj it t. themeelves. after the usual mannéu. -",
         "BONDSLAVE 0F THE WILDERNESS white man ini contact with lIn- s. While they prepared and ate r uupper, Coe sat beside them and id. Hie did not introduce bis , but pointed her out to Gower. .aid the others were ail relations is wife's. The Indians, for their 1lay or sat about the room on r blankets and talked among mselves, with frequent repetitions ~he word moni as, a derisive LI- i terin for white man, rneaning, alIy, a know-nothing. Fored 11Y epened his mouth ail through evening, but Cower talked te Coe ia sort of isdaÎinful pity. In the Indians, of whom there, must Sbeen nearly twenty lu ail, be- te unroll their blankets9 aud crawl them. until the whole floor wvas oeed with reeumbent figures. The urbters began to spread their bed- Son the R9oor also in the place of nur nearest the fine. It was then Fonedl broke siilenc with a ques- \u0026ny fleas herel ?'\u003e e asked. y\".\", answered Coe, «quite a few. they bother yen?», [âike bell.» growledl Fored, and la\u003e' bey rose in the cold danues a ýIe of heurs before dawn, went to tend their hrsand carne ii in to make breakfast. Coe had If 'bis wife bake them some ban-. k. They provided the fleur, whieh t preeilus eomrnedity up uonth. Ceoe refused pay for the servie, asked if he niight acompan\u003e' n part waY. Grower gave his as- %, and thereby drPw down the th of Fered. What d'you want that thîng aloug [i us for?» Fored growled, Ce in gene into the house. Wht's the banni?\" said Gower. (1n't be keeP uis alI nigbt, aud pp bis squaw bake for utsi\" yeR, and I'rn ail est up with Wel. that don't hurt. We'll be ting baek this way, and any place gtp nt looks pretty good' toin e ln this weather. Hie eaui be pretty useful to us, and 1 don't mmid hlmii talking to me; I feel kinder sorry for the poor devil\u003e' Fored's cyebrows went up ln sur- prise; sn weak a senltiment as pity in his hard..bitten, inflexible partnier wva. the last thiing hie had expeecd. With a grin, he bient to hook a trace. Gow- er's acid tongue lashed out at lmi: \"'What're you grinning for, yoqu bally fool ?'\u003e \"Nathi',\"drawled Fored, arid just themi Coe camec Up. Coe, acomlpanied themi until near.- ly iiightfall, talkiug to G1ower, for Fored wouild flot even look at hlmi. lie was full of euriosity ahout what -,as happening lu the world and of tjuiklychekedrexuiniseences (if by.-- gone years. lie had not seen a rail- way train lu fourteen years, lhe said * but whlenee hie hadl crne or what hel hid, done before that tirne hie did flot mention, and (Iower did not ask. On leavingr them, he exavted a promise fromn Gower that he wvould stay with hlm overnîght ou his return. They dropped their londs nt Cross Lake, and came haelr light, stopping a nîghit with Coe, whon took the balek trail with thern as far aq Lily Lanke. There, he- took an almost affeetionate leave of Gowr and pressed Ilis, hio- pitality on hlm should hec inake an- other trip, Tt was, about two weslater that Qower, Fored. and their three tenis pulled into Lily Laýke, post wlth au- other load, Tt wvas past ieght at ilight when they arrived, and learued that a niimhbr of frvighiters going down wvere putting up at old Armiand D'.Arenues's stopping-place, and after they had see-n te thieir herses, they were ou their way thiithe-r. when they ran into Cee, who s;hook hands with GJower effusively, and asked where he intended to pas,- the nighit. Fored merely nodde-d bis; head with a gruint and passed on. CTrn putting up at D'Areunes'L There's a buneh ef fellows there,\" said Gower. \" m on oviAr.»",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Coe sheolc bis bead. Then hie spoke: \"No, you corne andi stop with me; lmi over in a shaek with a couple of ether tellows\", \"Inidianis \" asked Geower. Cee nodded. \"To the deuce with them,. I don't want te tallc te fndiiins,\" saiti Gower scornfiuUy. \"Yoiu're a white mani, ton; corne andi talk to white men, andi leave Indians alene for awhile.\" Coe shoek bis head again. \"No, 1 donmt lilce to. Yeu corne ove\u003er with mye.\" \"To tell witbi you and your comical, ideas,\" explodeti Gower and he etrode laWa. lle theught lie was riti of the mani for god, but they were oniy a few miles npon their way in the, morning wben Cee overtoek thern and attached hirnself te Glowepr with the fawning, vringingz air of a stray dog te a man who bas patteti him casually on the teand. Andi jilt as auceh a man might telerate siich a (log, Oower tolerated Cee. le hiat genuirie pity for this waif of circumistance and his own in- epItitud(e--almeet a liking, had it not been so tinge(] witb contempt. Pur- ther, he %vas net 'sdthout motives of self intereet: Cee offereti ehelter for birnecif andi bis beasts, and the wea- ther wvas very colti, andi then there waq the mnatter of Coe,'s squaw and bier banneek. FIe intended this to be bis laat trip to Cross Lanke, andi the idea germinated, in bis mind of rescu- ing this bond4lave of the wilderness andi setting hlm free in ei-viliaztion andi the seciety of his own kind. TT(e began to sound Cee, who receiveti bis craftY suggestions first with hewildcr- ment, and later with shrinking fear andi feeble proete. lie saiti that lie was eut of teucli with civilization anti pleadeti the immorality of leaving bis wife andi chiltiren. Gower titi net press the peint, just then, but lie saw that the idea had takcen root in Coe'sq mmid. for he bega9n te hold forth at Iength on the shortcomings of bis wife'sq relatives. Hie was very men andi pitifil,. and G1ower's1 nese wrin- kled with diaguat, but pride of bloý urged hirn more strongly than ev te, save this mani fremn lowening 1, celour any further in, the eyes of t~ despiseti Indian. lie could net i frain, hiowevcr, frein telling Cee sor plain truti.q, and hie victin flinih under the ac2it tonguie, but matie 1 attcmpt te flght back. \"'Well,\" said Fereti with an eat Iater ini the evening, \"if anybeody talk te me like that l'ci take a shc gun te him. 1 den't sec how te stan, Thiat's what I did it for,\" replit Gower. 'If I can get hiin god as mati, there's some chance of makir a mani eut et lin,\" \"Fat cbance of makin' a mari oi of that thing,\" grunted Foreti. They found very' evident suapijç anti hoetility amnong Cee'a hidie relatives that nlighit; thouli thei w-,ere ne open insuilte, in their tai among thernecives, the word -moniaý and others, uintranqlatable hy reasw ef their feulness, wcre spokçei fr, quently ani loudly, and followed fi a ticnisive cackle. Gower andi For.4 as usual, ignoreti the Indianis tei andi Cee alTecteti net te hear the\" Hie squaw came forward with asuil reluctance at hie commandi te b1a bannock for the freigbters, anti a olti biick, his father-in.law, sPokp t him sharply in Cree. Hie answere with seme show of spirit lu the sain language. but Gewer neteti with wor dering disgust that the man seemnc afraiti. WVhen lie was for aceompanvjn thern in the inorning there was irov hie. The women ehattereti like ma@ pies, thc children yellet in sympathN and the bueke seemeti te leus threats, Cee almost cringeti te thetr andi Gower's colti cyps qparkled wick edly. \"Yeu erne along andi let theni te blazes,\" lie saiti roughly. «Are yOI going to let a lunch of speciiedInT diane boss yen ?\" Cee came, andi Gower talketo. thin",
         "BONDSIJAVE 0F THE WILDERNESS e way, uufurlîng the whiplash s tonuie and cuttiug tlirough toughened bide te bis few sur- i sensibilities. His subjeet was sgrace Ce was bringing on hirm- nd on the. white race lu general 3 conduet. rst thing yeu nome, you'il be up here, ail alene among these nwine,» lie observ'ed. ), ne,\" pretested Cee wildly. young yet. I won't die up here. ) back te my ewn celour wheu ik J'u geiug te die.\" ýs, you wiil,» sneered Gewer. \"I better than that-you haven't .nough. You'U1 die up here, die uip bore ail alene, juat like ancd Indian.» pidea seemed te fil Cee with isr boiTer. )u eeme dewu with me when 1 Gower went on, Usund get shut is business fer good aud be a masn again.» it My wife and kida,\" parried liserably. ley\u003eil b. sMl right--the kids are JIrty little halbreeds, auy-way.\" wlneed at the brutality ef the -k, and even Fered sheok bis but said netbing. Ail day they d, and at iast Cee, builied, brew- a, and cruàhed, submitted te the Mr will. But 11e was afraid te a te bis family. He traveiled ho!. distane te Cross Lake aud wlth the. two meu. .-d bad maintained a steady ail- upen te remoiistrate with Qew- ,ne being out of easgiot, 11e ho- %y, *bst d'you want te mix yeur- ip i this business fer, anyway, 0a poor devil awsy frein bis snd hidi. A mn ain't get no t. tako a kid's father away frein a feller'd do that oughter b. ed Yen gem\u003e' crazy?\" ntil returned Gower shertly. k., wbat're yen delng it fer?\" il tell yen, though it ain't any RT bsinss.It's beesuse 1 got ne use for Indians, dead or alive, and 1 weni't see a white mnan get dewu jike that unitil he's afraid of 'em. Afraid ef Indians, mmiid yeui-thatu what gets mie. Listen te the way they talked te him last turne we was there, the--- Fered's nxeuth twitehied, for Gewer was a past-Inaster lu the uise of bad language, and h. hiad alinost surpass- ed himseif. \"Yes,\" 11e said, «that's ail right-I got ne more use for Niteliies thau yen have. But Suppose yen get this guy away, what in ii .Il hi o with hlm- self wheu 11e gets dewu te riviliza-. tien? He ain't ne ue, for auything that 1 eveýr seen, sud he'd -tarve te death. IIe's a whole lot better where 11e la.» \u003c'Well, insyhe 11e is, but Fvc made up xny mind I'm goiug te get hlm away, and that's ail there la te it.' Fered Ieoked at the. lard face, sot in lines of unalterable resolvo, and shrugged bis shouldlers resignedly. As they drew near te bis hoe, Ce grew mere sud more nerveus and frightened, sud Gower kept a wary oye on him, uow sud again prodding him with the. harbod arrow et bis tongue, te lceep the man's rosolutien alive. They swung up out ef the. riverbed te the. top of the. bank, sud camne te a hait before the cluster et buts. The usual eloud et uelsY curs euveloped them, sud, on a sudden, the houa. vomited ita contents intn tii, open; men, womon, and ehildren in a bedy, ail eackling and scoldiug at the tep et their voiees. Neither Fored nor Gower undorstood a word ef Cree, but Ce eowered at the, stemt of evidont abuse hurlod at hlm. The. erewd made a rush for hlm, snd ho slipped bohind Goer. The. littie freighter planted hlm..!! firndy, biis hoad thrust forward pugnaeiously, sud his heavy blaekanako whip grlp- pod lu bis hand. The. Indians w- ered sud haltod, but continued te sheut at Coe. Gower atrce ferwsrd sud eraeked bis whlp lik. s pistol- shot.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE «G0et b..k i where you belong, danin you,\u003e h.e anarled, and Fored loomed inp belnd hlm. The. Indians retreated suIlenIy lin- to the house. When the. hors.. iiad been seen to, Ce was for paaulng tiie nighit li the stable, and Gower swore at hlm for a coward. With c\u003cool audaelty, h.e pushed open the door of the hut and inarced in, Go. almost clinglng to him aud tr.mblng lik. a leat. The, Indians made way wlthout a word, and the three inustalled themselves lin front of the. flre. Tiie Indians talked among thernselves lin low tones, and Co. kept casting glance. of pure ter- ror over hisuhouldr at tim. H. lay down betweeu the, two men that tnlght, but it la doubtful whetiier h.e W',#iutiey rose and went out in a shadow, plainly afraid of belng left alon. for au instant. The. horses were duly itched np and they were about to start wben pandemonium broke loose; the. squaws shriéked and wail- ed; the, children howled; and the buoks armed tii.maelves and began to make tiireateulng gestures. Go.\u003e. wife seized hlm by one arm, sereaming, and tried to pull hlm baok Wo the. Iz.use. Qower gripped the. otiier and jerked hlm back. There waa an ugly glitter i h1s paie .y.s, and he swore betwe.u .benceid teetx. He pusii.d the lm squaw man into the. back of th sacad thi. vomen set up a louder wail than ever. The. bueks stsrted forward, ahouting, but h.e whirled and faced thein, and Fored, heavy-should.r.d aud powrful was at his ide. Wlth thiebuok8shaking th.lr flats aud shouting iu impotent tory, and the. wail of the womeu ig lng iu their cars, th.y jigled of The. noise di.d away b.hid them, and the silence o! the winter settled about thern. \"Now,» a9ked F'or.d, with e grin, «that you've been snd ni derm fool of yourself, what're yý ing to do wlth that long atre miaery 1\" Go. was lying, an iert mna the. back of the, rack. «Don't kxiow,» said Gow.r. « car.,\u003e be added as an afterthi Ris temper had been badly in and h. swung on Fored. \"None of your blasted bui anyway,\" h.e mnarled. \"'Guess not,\" said Fored; «I want to have anything to do witi craziness.\" He broke off: «loey, Tommy, what the.-\" lie began to plough throug deep snow at the, aide o! the swearing viciouisly, for the, le teain had eontrived Wo get itself up on a stump. Tii. teams ca a standstill whil. Fored jerke atray beasts back on Wo the, tra Suddenly Go. rose up sud s the. ground. Then he beganti o off up the, trait. UJf.y,» cried Gower,1whrj goingr be\"' Go. stopp.d and hait turne for. answ.rmng. \"Home,\" h.e sad iu a hpls «It's the, only home I've got. p', a wite min any more, aud I iiR b.. Their waya ain't rny and 1 dou't talk their talk here's the. offly place I've got n, liv. in and I guess Ill1 die her when my time comes. Thepe place in all the world that's my 1 oznIy thia. Good-byeY He began tù shamb1. siowly whenee he had coin., bead h\u0026 forward, bauds dangling, knff fron frbid lu ail aspeuts a out, broken-dowu Iudian-",
         "STUDENT DUEL IN GERMANY BY JOHN D. ROBINS '10 the. Germa\" freeliman in the. University tiiree things abide in lite--hie degree, his beer and ing, and thie greateet of these le ling. To b. sure, the eternal iin exists, but it ie priniarily the. purpose of adrnirig the. hmaxin thie last of hie three rôles. i a strlking mnrvival, thie duelling. sq posible that the. hietorian of future, lu estimating the chara.- ltics anid circumetances that have bin.d to nieke Germany the lng sword barng the. way to the. n ci international amity, will adso .eby b. eli'ing the. probleni, per- almut the. only nations wiic c .oe.scr or politleian and an ot- ling edt@r niay still oceasionallY a tilrty paces apart with a brace 2o kepgufiietly up wth the L an dereeof certainty on this .\u002b t mLv axnnen once in a a German medical professer aqsured nme that the number fouglit wae actu- ally on the increase in thes. two countries. The. great majority of German duele are etudent affaire, held under the. auepices of the different traterual societies. These exercise an extraor- dinary coxitrol over atudent aetiv- ities, eepecially durig tii. firat two years. The. young man wbo hopes to iningle in the. social lite of the. uni- versity muet join one. They are haughtily and mutually excluive. and their naine is legion. In Mar- burg, the littie Hesslian University town with whioh the writer is moot familiar, with an attendauce lu 1913 of 2,374, there were thirty-two incor- porated secictiesl Tii.y range social- ly lrom the. ultra-aristocratic \"\u003cCorps\" down te the. democratie Turner Unions, whieii frequently have e socialistic bis. The. new member muet be «active» during the. tiret two yeare of hie course, aftr which he joins the. rainks ot the. Ait, Herren- the. Old Boys. It is in eennection with the. active period of hie membersrip in hie chosen soeiety that the. treshman le initiated into duelling. Most se- cieties (twenty-eeven out of the. thirty-two i Marburg) requir. as a condition of full membersbip that the. candidat. ehail have satisfactoTily frught a speciled number, moet fi'.- queutly thirteen, of broadsword duels, den te duel. h.ii.. the Romani Cath-",
         "T11E CANADIAN MAGAZINE olie societies do flot have these re- quiremeuts. With this exception, the number of duels to be foughit varies in moat cases directly as the exclu- siveniesa of the society. The aristo- cratie \"Corps,\"\u003e whieh correspond more closely than moet of the others to the American Grck letter fraterni- tics, usuially require in addition that thrce sabre duels bc fought. Royal members are the only exceptions to this rule, and rumour has it that the prescrit Crown Prince fulfilled his corps obligations ini defiance of the law. A sabre mensur is much more serious than a broadsword one and must always be an aif air o! boneur. As a matter of law-not of fact-lt is ilIcgal. In order, then, to become a full member of a corps, the candidate must cither insit or be insulted. The remilt is the meut elaborate system of recognlzed insults at present citant, a sort of graduated series of chips on the shoulder. Seme littie acquaint- ance with (icrman students has con- vinced me that this codification was qu1ltp superfinoug, for the average 'German youth, atter eleven o'elock at night, le not given to making detours around the tocs of anyone. The German expecta to be inuit- ed. I remember hew my own suspi- cions of this were confirmcd one day when news came to ns of a challenge followlng an altercation in the old !I3lack l3ear Inn. My host, a young flfth-year medical student, twe months later a junior surgeon with the Elcvcnth Army Corps, turned te me. \"There mut b. an appalling num- ber of deaths among Axuerican stu- dents.\" '\u003cWhyl\" 1 inquired i astonish- ment. «éBecause both your ferms of duel- ling arc so, deadly, both the 'Western and the American.» I stared at him blankly. 'Please enlighten me. «What are the Western and Ameriean forma?» «Oh, I suppose that yen havcn't those names,» b. replied easily. \"But the Western duel is whcire the c ponents just shoot each ether at a time and without any formaliti What we cail the truc \u003c'America duel provides for the drawing e! Io the ]oser being obliged te comnjr suicide. Is it not sot'\u003e 1 think that I deserve some ered I did not siuile. I frît sympathet for 1 tee had read thrilling 'tories the glorlously lawless West, and h once belicvcd that boys in Arizo wcnt to Sunday sehlool arxned te t teeth. Then, I remcmbered a cIeN littie German comedy and a pepul French detective story whieh inti duced very effectively the «Amerie duel,\" quite as a reeognized lnatij tion. So I intimated very gently th the western duel had neyer beco, really fashienable ini Canada, a] was almost ont-o! -date in the bx society in the United States, whi' as for the «Americazi duel,» it had more connection with America, s. f asI1knew, than the Qeman ma have with Germany. But I arn afra that in that hour the liglit that nev was on lad or ses, faded away fro his picture o! America. Well, but,\" ho went on, after t exclamatory perioëd e! lus dslu ment had passed, «what do yen do yen insult cach other?» We don't mnuIt each ether, exee in polities,» I replied smugly. \"But Rimmel! What if a man \"Why,» I said sententionaly, «,ge erally a man doesn't get drunk, ar if he does w. have a comfortable ar rational theery that a drunken in cani ne more limait yen than an i, sane one can.\" H.e gave it up. \"Ton are doubtiess modela of bur tell me, wonld yen like te sec a «'b meneur, my friend 1\" \"I sure would. Thanks verymu indecd. When t?»-Per this was a",
         "A STU-DENýT DUEL TN G FRM ANY ,ht, broad blade which is the tidant of the old \"eut and t\" rapier, but this was always a aratively harmless if somnewliat affair. il, to-morrow, of course,. said Ail duiels are fouight on Satuir- so as not to interfere with Iee- Nowv 1 have to lic one of the alassistants-Professor Dr. ter is the doetor inu eharge-and all around for youi about 2,30. one is selieduled for 3,15. It te be a beautifuil miensur, for are excellent swordlsmcnfr.\" as it came about that on the fol- g afternoon-a hot day about iidd1e of Jtiri-T fouind niy sel f y way out to Oekersliausen, a siuburb of \"Marburg. Through srrow, crooked streets of the old ive lrnrried, along the Wetter- pait the boeuse -where Luther 4tayed diiring that miomentous renoe witli Melanethon inufthe ;ing castie of the princes of ý, stili towerinig above uis on thie t 0 to our right, down Barefoot t, with the gloomy old cloisters i. the Barefooted F'riars mnay watehed the beretie mnonk iu days whlen Germans, too, t for principle, then into the * part, along Wilhemstrasse, past irck Street to Fredlerick Square, a coarse, sinister Prussian Viul- of Victory had been unveiled a week befere lu commemora- )f 1870, on down Sedan Street, Kjoltkc Street and Ockerhanmeu then out into the green, al- feeeesflelds. The hay had eut already, but rye and oats )arley and vegetables were stili ie wavlug green of proxoised SFrein soenewhere on the road to the village came througb atflng grain and the trees the *s of thue «lCount of Luxem- ,ý', played rather indifferently by all brasa band. \u0026\u003eme studeuýt y7wasoff for a keg prty» aud lird th~e Seyen Ravens of Mar- My conductor pulled out bis watcli. \"Wýe don't need to run so fast,\" lie assuredl me. \"We are *in good tline.» \"Thank goodincss !\" 1 exclaimed fervenitlyN. \"Andi( now mnaybe you hiave, timie f0 tell me what titis duel is -Natiurally, it is an affair of honour, Von Trenclimanu cornes front Leip- zig, where lie wais active lu the Sax- onia Corps. Ucv lias,,; eite here wVith the( Teutoiai and li Ille ssýo-Nas- sovia. Also lie lias becomeit betrothed here. Von Trenei(kmainn tiuiks9 that thec Teuitoiai li slighted the( lady. so hie hasý mnadet sonme reinarks rather derogatory'N to flic oflenditing corps. Iu (feet tlhis la a cha1llienge to the( corps, and fil, resuit is tlint lin accordance witli tlic regular procedure lie Ixas te figzlit a sabre d1u11 withi each of fthe tliree excufiive offleers of the Tell- tonia, One, of tlic hie lias rad fougýlit.\"' We coutinuied on our way.% in sil- ence, wVhile I iuieditated on the(, peenliar qualifications of offive lioldi- vrs lu (lerinany and thec dangers of long engag-ements. The palli wc bad been followlngý ledl out to the main street of Qeker- shuedirtier and( worse kept and narrower evnthan most pea.sant Vil- lage streets in liesse. Finally we reachied file Werner lInn, thec dutelling lxeadquarters of the aso asva corps. Tt wiLs a low, ramlbling buiild- ing, set in a gardenl orehard badc frein fthe road uindcr flie outf iungl branches of a hialt dozen gnarled sur- vivors oft fIe olden hardwood forests. In the big bare front court flirpe or four automobiles and as many car- niages were drawn up. The chauffeurs were gafhered abouit and diseusing the long touring car nearest the gaVe- way. A girl inthequaint ostume of the Hessian peasanfs was listlessly puxnping a pail et water. I the wide arehway which separated the human frein the animal inhabitauts ot the inn, aud tbrough whieh eue eould catch gliinpses ot cool, damp grass plot. aud flowers and vegetables and",
         "TIIE CANADjAN; MAGAZIN-E truit trees, two dirty littie boys in precariously attached overails and bar. feet were holding a stick just eut of reacii ef au ecstatically yelping puppy. Three eapped aud banded studenta and a lieutenant came chat- tirig gaily out of a deerway iu the tarthest corner. They saluted with their eharaeteristie grave fermality as we met them. Thon we passed through the. deorway and climbed a steep stairs. A low buzz ot conver- sation and the oecaional clinkota glass replaced the. droning of the. flies and lees outside. Acre.s the. landing at the hiead et the. stairs we follewed the. bai: and clinking through an- other aud wider deorway inte the du.lling reem. It was a hall perhaps tiiirty teet wide and torty-flve feet leng. A' number ef chairs, several long, bar. tables, now siheved baek against the. wull, and twe or tiiree smali eues at the. ucarer end forzued all the furni- ture, exoept for a tew prints aleng the walls. On the. cleared spac. ef about ten by twelve teet in the. mid- dle et the, reom a man was sprinkliug sawdnst. For tiuwasolyeone ina succession ot duels that iiad been iu pregreos since five oeck tiiat moru- lug. I tink that enly oue otiier cir- ewnstanee tended moe te destrey the. romance et the, affair tor me than did theii.mgit ot tiiat servant scattering sawdust over the. reekinif fleer. with The. otiier circunistance was ti -the. vitiated, the, re-výtiat4 «W. Germans tear Ged, and ni ci., boasted the. griu old Chancellor. It may have beez tiien. A modern version xuigii bc: \u003c'W. Gerinans fear tresii ai notiiing else». Next te tiie iat: England cemes the dislike et air, at least in any terni wiiici conceivably b. called a draught Qerman whem I know wiii e drink and play and sing eut ef but if ho is indeers, viietiier it concert hall, railway compartm, dwelllng, h. must b. as nearli metically sealed as possible. was a sufficient number ef vii i the~ rooni te have permitt.d cellent ventilatien, bat two or et tiien, raised timidly six inch ten minutes at rare intervals, presumed te spply sufflexent we I had mistaken the. haze. Thal mist was net the glamour et rou but the. sineke treni relaya et c cigarettes and long pipes, pufqe on the beer-laden breath of s sin fperspring spectators. Ah es Te speetaters 1Thil tieular mensur vas attracting iutereat, aud the, reeni vas w6, ed. Tiiere wer. stud.uts in thel ours and caps, gray-bearded el1 men, military officers inu nifeu even saw the. cressed sworda o shiouldex's ot one). and baampA",
         "A STUDENT DUEL IN GERM\\AN*Y )y law and had to b. very secret- Tanged. hey are,\" h. replied in the inost ,rof-fact toue, \"but the, police ,'arned always so that they may out of the way, But if amran anotiier in a duel he surreudcrs elf and is sent ta prison-usually ionths lu a fortresa. It la great Sif a fellow has money-tiiis im- ,muent in a fortress. But 1 nmust Yeou bad better clmb upon that *if you want to sec decently. uqedereher! Aýnd be hurried r into one of the. two littie auto. is that were fltted up as tempor- )perating cliambers. wua quit. certain that 1 sbould cSed to retreat oecasloually for iair, but 1 wanted te sec the * F'lnaly Idid t'rn tetakc pos Dnof the. chair of whleh uiy hast Rpoken. Lt was already occupied. tstlly liumbed upan on. o! the. e. There was no formality se far ie gpectators werc cancerued. It gsuined that one came on thie ~ation o! some one lu a position ,erly te exteud it, so no officiai the slightet degre. o! attention iiy onlooker. Hem.., nmolested, janaed ta seur. the. position ý ya window, wiiich I suirrepti- dy opened as muci as I dared, e the tortuiate laek of iieight o! Epen i front of me permitted an s1ent view o! the. arena. re bad net long te wait. In about miuteste came in. Pirst, e taiefroin a third corps wiio te sot as ref.ree and presiding er. Next came the. whlte-robed on aud atnnts~, followod by ice the A.aron and Hur o! the. etve combatantu, *iiose dutY it te suport the sword arma of r prncpas hn rot i action. f @)geods were next, anmed 1,ubint swords sud swathed and proteeted as if against an Aretie blizzard. Last of aUl came the two opponenta. Head and face and brest and one arn were bare, while the nieck was well protected and tiie sword arn. partially so, for even tii. sabre mensur ia not intended to b. fataL. In sanie parts of Austria there are stili fought duels ini whleh the. com- batants are utterly unprotected, and trausers and footwear constitute the. only clothing worn. It must b. said, however, that these barbarous comn- bats, with the horrible mangling which frequently results, were beconi. ing yearly much fewer in number bo- fore the war broke out. And now the two take their places, each with one heel on the chalked lin. drawn behind him. To shnink back over this lime, even for a mom- ent, means a dishonoured defeat. Each Schleppefuchs supporta the. sword arm of his principal in a horizontal position-and, the. glow of pride ia an the boylih face of the one whom 1can best see. One of thieseconds states the, occasion of the. duel. Tii. referee goes tiirough the. formnàhty, meant to proteet him froni legal comn- plications. of asking that a reociclla- tien beeffected. 1Ishudder to tink of the dreadful siiock that would fol- low an acceptance o! this invitation, -lik. the. horror of the. moment wiien the. bride would say No at the. altar. The di4tance between the, mn ie insured, one sabre length aud the. lengtii of the. two basket hilta. The. swords are compared, long, curved blades, not so iieavy as eavah!y Rabres, but heavy enongh to do execution. \"Herr Unpartellacher, I requet silence for a sabre mensurV 1» oels ont one of the seconds. The. silence prier to this bas been as profound as tliat wbicii sueceeds a general invitation in a lecture rooni to answer a question. 8till, however real war may b. car- ried on, dueffing must aiways b. done decently and in good order.",
         "THE OANADIAN MAGAZINE The pasage of courtcsy is th( ceremomial prelude. The. duellisù p lace their caps upon their heads anc- face eaei other. Their swords crosa once, twice, thrice, four times. Theii the two step back. The paffsage of courtesy is over. The seconds raisc tiie sword armas; tiie caps are taken off. NQw the crowd leans forward and the. pipes and cigars and cigarettes are put aside. The real duel is about to begin; the two tsike position. The freaiimen supporters drop t. the. rear. The. seconds take their places between the combatants and step slightly back, their swords drawn, with points lowered to the. ground. Uliientium 1\" cries tii. referee, just as unn.ese,ýsarily as before. «Re-ady 1» warns one second. \"Begin!\"» cries the other. The. swords glitter like silver lightning as they ring upon eaeh otiier. Is there a clearer, purer tone than the. ring of steel? The song of the. sword is no metaphor. Tt is real and sweet and fuill of haunting melo- dies. There is nothing noisy or dis- cordant in it. In the. ring of an axe on bard timber, even in the vibra- tions of a saw in tiie open air, there is true music, ricli, and full of memx- ory-conjurlng harmonies. These, utrangoly enougii, are the thouglits that slng through my mind as 1 listen rather than watch. «Halt!» cries a voice. The. two seconds strike up the. swords o! the, duellists. A round lias been fougiit. A round consists of the regulation number o! pase-r blood. Sixty o! tiiese must be fouglit, unleai one of the. combatants b. pla... cd hors de combat. This time neitiier has drawn blood. Position is resumed. «Ready 1 Begin !\" once more the music and the. silver light. Hait! Blood la starting from the. temple of the. man nearer me. Tii. doetor examines the, wound, whicii is blood off. Tii. mords are wiped. 3 Position again. 1 \"Ready ? The two seconds spring bark. 1 1sword armaq are released. \"Begin 1\" But the music hias ceased for r. The. blood once drawn lias wroua its workc. Tii. work o! thousands slow years faîls away froni my wc and primitive jungle instincts sur Up. Tii. love of rhythm and beau lias given way to a still more insiste passion, tiie tiger lust for red. ý breath cornes quickly as 1 wat eagerly, almost longingly. Two three rounds are fouglit witiiout 1 suit, for the. two arc very even matciied, and both are fit. Then ln the round there breaks again t:J shairp \"HaIt 1\" Tii. blood is streaming down t] check o! the. fartiier mian. Tiie won, is stanched, and a tcmporary pie ter is placed over it. On. of the. witnesses steps out, \"rIas satisfaction been renderedA runa the. formula. \"It lias not.» This is the inevltab reply froni tii. challenger's rep sentative. So 1 know now that the. man f\u0026 tiier away is Von Trenckmaxnan~ the. duel takes on a personal. intee for 1 have beconie a partisan. 1%r by tuis tixue the air lias conquere me, sud, more than bal! fait, 1 e11m down from the. table and walk uunee tainly t. tii. door sud down the sW t. the blessed sunlighit. One or tw star. at me, but only for amoet \"Ready I Begin!1'; The. briglit, pitiless music foil*m me down the stairs. Outside, ho, lazy and how peaeeful itis! i down on the little bencli beiiu th pump and look at the, boys and t puppy crawling under one ofth, cars. In two or three minutes 1 ta back up the stairs. «Halt 1» I regain my old place. \"Ready! Begin!\"» Again the. swords gleam and ri",
         "A\u0026 STUDENT DUTEL IN EMN the men! Only by bis position I b. sure any longer of whichi is Trenckmann. As 1 look at them, see the dehumanized expression heir mutilated faces, and sec the ibles of a floor, ail the excitemnent the glory of it depart forever. ,t though thoy do stand there and ve fresb wounds without the ~le quiver of a muiscle! 'Wbat gh they even smnile grimly agh their swollen lipis during the es, in response to sorne whisper- ýmark of a supporter! They are e. They are displaying endur- snobh as one cannot find words te -ib. i.t this thiug bas become mere- brutal exhibition to mne. I Light, of events whish have since i place, I have sometimes even lerocl if the prevalence of thîs )m, with its inevitable lowerinig ie sensibilities, among the classes rrmany that dietate ber policies, not bear some share of the re- uliiity, not only for the Germian ude toward war in the abstract, uiq' for the lack of bumane con- itions in the actual condurt of It 1 cannot see ail this as 1 watch . nor cau 1 know tbat at this ent, among Von Trenckniann's ns at bhome, are the sealed orders, issued long ago, which, before two months are past wiil send hlm to direct the fire of lis liowitzer battery agyainat devoted Liege. 1 learui ail that Iater. \"R\u003ceady! Begin! liait!'l So it gocs on1, exce'(pt when at irre\u003e- gular intervals the variat ion is added: \"lias satisfaction been rendi(ered ?\" «It bias not.\"l One weomnes acculstomled te the harsh mionotny of thev reply, as if it had alwayvs been and mua,ýt ever bie. The duel bas been iu progreus for mnore than hall an hour. There is a newv note in tbe sharp warning. \"Silenitium\" Sixty rounds bave been foughit. Satisfaction bas been rendecred( with honour. M1ensiir ex! \u0026ln r!\" It is over. The buzz of conversa- tion begins agaîni, wýithi more eliniking than e-ver, The principals are led away te ho sewn uip; the secondfs and supporters foilow, as, weil as most of hIe speetators. The insu cones ini with bis broem and sawdnst. A rapier duel is srheduiled te begin ini fifteen minutes. «But 1 buirry gladly down tbe stairs into tbe fresfi onit-of. doors, to wait for my bost, the medi- cal assistant.",
         "THE SHADOW 0F STRIFE BY LESLIE FLOYD MRS. ARPER tood at the gate of the drive, looking af- ter' her retreating speuse mis- chievouisly. \"Rebert,\" sh. caaUed, \"are ye not afrald ef hein' toce polit.?t Mind, PIn tellin' ye now, if ye don\u003et corne right back ber. and bld me good-by pro- perly PlI go straight te lawyer Thomas. 1 will bave my due. of courtin,\u003e' The big man swung round, with a deep roar of laughter. \"Thiere, yen pernicity littie wo- mian,\" hoe sald, bending over ber. \"Guess I mnust be getting absent- mlnded.' \"Do yel\" asked bis wife, witb im- mense saresi.\" To thlnk of that, now. Though l'Il net b. denyin' I've suspected it, myseif, now and then, in the last thirty year.\" \"But thon it seems as if yen wero always witlh me, wherever 1 am.\" Mary reacedupt cul! hlm. \"Awa wih ye\" se said. Mary HEarper was, and la, an ener- after lier husband. At first, hi were twinkling with quizzical tien. It was a sweet look, for inischief, the loek ef a geod Vu and perhaps it weut far' te E why sh. never lest a friend 1 Sharp tongue. Presently, however, the. look ed, and she sighed a littie, thought liad gone te anothei, t ure that sheùld have been et along at bis side, carrying thg and turning te about proveatl pertinence at her--Johnny. Johxmy, now in f ar Flanders, ing on anether erraud and b Cther tools. «Eh, well 1\" she said softly,\" man child,\" aud, turning, set q the bouse ef a uick negbour, she was te speud the feon Poer Mary! I h. was te 1 thore a blow tbat might vel] killed bier, had ah. been ef les fibre; and, eve» yet it gives hei, a sleeplesa night. It waslate in the feon the man ef the. bouse where et visitiniz returned troyn tnwn",
         "TE SUADOW 0F STRIFE Dy t Deadil' and tlieu she gave le laugli that would bave broken beart te bear. After a wbule %id, \u003cWbst vill Robert sayt No must tell Robert but me l' sud that alie raul out of the room. I better than to foilow lier; but 1 ied ber most of the way home my wiudow, here;- and if tliere's jing I didu't say te Tom about Ing it out like that, you eau say Sr me, tbat's ail. Thougli, of e, h. dlidn't kuow she was here, man 1» ýt te Mary Hlarper, burrying ý, 11k. s hunt wild thing, the .sud- -s of thie blow was net ngrate- 8h. vas of the stuif that takes ,m standing. She asked no quar- )f fate--for herseif. Later, in pnivacy of ber owu seul, there d b. Uirne for grief; but nov ber e mind vas taken up with the ilit of ber bushsud. Long be- ha bad suiffered from lieart )le, snd the fear of s suddeu r lied seeretly clouded bier life sine. 8h. vas determined that ne mliould tell 1dm but berseif. Wod-lot 'where bis work lay, vas te from auy rond. Their ouiy r came at noon. Before that next day, she must tell hlm, aot that niglit. Ou tbat abche id ion 'heart with unreasonlug stnb- ns. Mje should bave eue more \u003ey evenlng, eos.t wbat it miglit elgh ?erbaps. Callons? Ah, Syou kuow lier! Behiud that el er lmsbaud's arma about ber, boof of one of the hiomes, sud seemed sbusy that she passed biln witli a quiet greeting. As shle entered the bouse, the wbistling atarted up, cheery as ever, aud with anl uncon. sceus sigli of relief she vent ou with hier preparations for suipper. Whien Robert Hlarper came in for bis meal, he walked to bis p lace, and atood leauing on the baek of bis ebair, looking at ber, oddly. It inight, she tliought, be fatigue or the reflex of ber owu emiotion, but there seemed a queer heavinesa iu bis attitude, a sag to bis shoulders, unfamiliar in ber memnory of him. However, a moment later lie straightened uip and took bis seat. quit. as usual. \u003c'Wett,\" lie asked, \"and liow's Mn., Brown V' \u003c'Mr. B3rovu' havin' a moot en- joyable iilness, thank ye kindly. 8h. had a l.f-pound steak te lier dinuer. an' we mnust alU hope for the begt. Mebbe, iu time, she'il recover lier ap- petite, if tbey don't hurry ber. A beavy day'm work ye've liad, I'm tbinkin'.» An exclamation from lier bnshand made ber jump. From the eup ln bis baud, a stream of bot tes bad poured over into bis lIR. \u003c'Eh?» lie sai4, moppmng at it. \"'Oh, yes I-Yes, lieavy enough! I Heavy euougb t» «Babbyt» she gibed, \"Is it a bib ye'r neediu\u003e ora a-boRtlThen, in \"I'm-tired, mother. I'v. bsd a- a bard day. Oh, mother, but it's bard, it's mortal liard. And I'u, an old mani.» 'My dear-hardr1 «Tes, my-my rbeumatism! T'n not the man 1 vas. This-this bot bread 's xnlgbty good, mother.\" His vif. came seroffl the room snd filled 'bis cup. Fo\u003er a moment she stood at bis side, stroking back the bair *her. it vas going grsy on the temple. «Ye're my man. Tliere\u003es not yer lik. lu the world,» sh. said. Then. suddenly~ - We've ever beau the vod",
         "THIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE an' a' te each other, haven't we, Rob.- ert r' Robert looked up at ber dumbly. Hoe waq, ordinaxily, the leaat de- mionstrative of men; but now he reaehedl up, and catebing the littie worn band, drew it dewn against bis busby check. \u003cTes, myv girl, the world and ail. And more than that !\" lie answered soberly, and acded, a littie sbyly, \u003clYoii've had many a hard blow that 1 weuld have spared you if I could, niother. Youl11 always remember that, won't you, whatever happens? 1 wenild bave spared you if I eould.» Shie turned hastily away, and was longer than usual in replacing the tea-pot on the ketti.. Whon she re- tuirned te ber place, however, she wore her old misebievous snijie; and, for the re4t of the meal, sbo plied hlm witb a fevorisb rush of talk and witticism. Tes, and langbed at ber own jokes, theugb bier beart must have been breaking. At sat ho pusbied back bis chair with a sigb, reached into bis poeket and began te fi11 bis pipe. Mary came acreas te him witb a suiphur match of peculiar virulence fizzing in ber baud. This se first waved under bis liese until b. sneezed, tiien beld at snob an angle that ho must almost dialecate bis ne\u003cek getting the. pipe under it. Thon, suddenly, ini thi. midst of ber laugbter, ber bead went down on bis shoulder. «Robert,\" iii. said slewly, \"If- __» He. turned so that their cbeeks teuched, and b. feit that bers was wet. 'cWby,» lie cried, \"littie womanVr \"'Tis the smoke,\" she answered, jumping up and beginning te pile the. disbes tegether at record speed. ait got int the eyes of me. 'Tis a wonder that ye must ever b. reekin' lik. a balf-burned boot, whiniver yer wife cemes near e' Robert took out the pipe and look- ed at it as if he had never Seen i before. 'Tes, I suppose it does smoe1\" «Smoke I A body'd tbink I wa a She was at the sink, now, mkn great play witb the. beap save-lLj Presently she looked ever bier shou~i. der. lus pipe bad gone ont inii g baud. «Would ye look at that, now. Yer pipe's out.\" \"\u003cI know, inether. I den't secam. t» relisb it te-night.\" Mary turned in blaruk ama7emelmt. but instead of meeting ber searching glance witb bis usual patient hum. our, hie fidgeted uneasily, got to hig foot; aud, going te the. door,' itoo witb bis baud on the Iatch. \"Guess l'Il b. going te thie barn,\" ho said cluinsily, \"I'm not just satus. fied witb the. old mare's lief,» and before she eeuld answer, was gon. Mary went slowly ou with th work. Her banda moved deftly about the familiar tasks, and later she found that they were don. as neatly as ever; but, witbin, she wasa en by the. fierce confiiet between ber grief and ber will. Tih. epening of the door bad ehown ber a ladder of black marks along its edge. Ter tbey bad measur.d Jobnziy's egt eacb birthday. Any suspicion arus ed by ber husband's action was wp away by a flood of remembrance.Th quiet room. witb its crowdixxg mem ories becatue unendurable. 8h. oW no longer restrain ber log1 o ber busband's presence, his ex pbysical uoarne. Drying lier ad bastily, sbe cauglit up a sbawl an ran out inte the niglit. The. eool air calmed ber a littie,an se. stopped at the. barn deor to re cover herseif. Graduaily she be»m\u003e aware of a strange noise from ih in, wbicb at first was puzzliug. hn like a blow across tbe face, its ea most terrible of ail sounda ofh! a grief, the. weeping of a strong in A groteaquely awful sound for ay oe's hearing, 'what it meaixt to ar Hlarper, as se. stood there lsei7",
         "THE SHADOW 0F STRIFE hos boarse wrenching sobs, no will e'ver know. Months after- 1 ahe would wake in the night ng out that lier man wMs in pain that mixe could net help him. thou\u003ch sbe told thxe rest of the r oeeauionaIly, of this part she Id Jiever knowingly speak. moment uhe leaxxed against the trembling, thon jerked the door i ad went in. The lantern hang i its book, c.asting a dim liglit t the place. There, in the far er upon a aixock of hay, alone for bis quiet beasts, lay Robert per. Witli a littie cry she ran )h, my busbandi Wliat i. it?\" t the sound of lier voie lie stum- te bis test, mopping desperately is face; but lier arme clung about \u003eb, my dear, is it-Johnnyt Do know Vy e turned aud swept a great arm t ber. )dVukuow, nxetler?7 Oh, my àer ws a strauge sense ot cern- in feeling the etrong support of body closeotoliers. Itwa asif physical contact eymbohized-as ed it did-a moral and spiritual .eràhip iu the things of lite and h. It brenglit the wife the first te h ai feit aine learning ot lier Thse grief itselt bail fot gene; momeofe the lonely borror ot it boom taken away. Her liusband's deep voice came te lier, broken, des- pairîiig, but none the lees, itiflnitf!ly comforting. \"Dick Mfile took a short-eut through the bush. Hoe told nme. Said 1 mueit bear up. Bear up! Hlie sori's ailive !\" \".ýy dear,» hie wif e sebbjed, -I know.» \"And then 1 came home wondering how 1 wae te tell youi. Andi wlien 1 saw yeni coing Up the drive 1 juet eouldn't. 1 tried te whistle angi ail that, as if nothing liail happeniei, un- til 1could think of away, 1 wae atraid ot it's coming eut suilen. Thon 1 came out here te thiu1k it ever, and-and__» \"Yes, es\"she whispered, \"l did the like et that meseif.' For a few minutee they clung te. gether like friglitened chludren. \\beii lie spoke agaixx, however, it was with a sort ef awtul dignity, a grandeur that rose abeve hie grief like a pro- pliet ini Ierael. «Tliey muet have men, Mary! They muet have men! My great grand- father left allIb hd anlsd came up inte the wilderness for the sake ot his ceuntry. Hie son was shot in 1812. Heart of mine, thie world is an MI place; but it woiild bc more evil if we coulil net sacrifice te bet- ter it.» Hie wife lookeil up through ber tears. «Yes, we must be brave, Robert, but-ôb, my boy!-my boy!\"",
         "MATCHING COLOURS BY G. W. BARTLETT \"TIIAT's the. oid Scarlett place. jYou eau se. the. chihnny b.- '4tween the. two bee\u003cch treis on theride.Take the. path ta the left; elib te rilfonce and-\" aThank yen, 1 know the. way.Y Tom Scwrlett thrust hait-a-dollar into the handof tefarmer, who had gi'von him \"'a lift' on the road frein town, and struck acras8 the. bill, leav- lng the. man to, pursue his leisurely way much wondering who the. \"styl- isi strangur» could b. Summer unurie was tinting the. mnaple tops when Tom strolled up the familiar ian.. Tih. houae was un- ehanged--exeept older and more wea- ther-beaten. No one was astir, A stranerdog ran out ta bark at hlm; the hicensfloced expectantIy~ out fram their pins; a hungry calf eaiu.d plaintlvely from a near-by shed. Tam Iooked about with oritical. eye, a tangled windfall, and a fe, veterana, sombre survivors ai pior ora. The cxrystai sreý shrunk ta a trickle of mudd, its green bansik trampled by. tie, and an adouriferous hqi une running down the. bani oid swimming-iiole. Everything aoemed chang the worse; but Tom Sean.e that these niinor matters di4 count for the. hunger in hlm which made hlm yield ta the to drop off the, trans-contineui hav, a look, hetween trains, at home.. Tiie place would nevui sanie ince aii. But, bang fauit was ail his! Wéll,b. w the. place andi go quietly awa, lng only a sweet, smd, fragraE 017-aUl that wBs 1,ft of the, wiiicii le lied a right ta eail 1 8eea,1ett climbeti the riz-za andi met off for the. cross-roads Tii. lantisoape hati shrum*k y.ars--te coasting kilt wus ng a dip in the pasture field; Burke's houa. was ne loi triumph of palatial architectu",
         "MATCHING COLOURS iout li-way to meet him. The electria train which sereamed bim lika a swoopig eagle, had Rtormed the littie hamiet into a tantial village of brick and stone. LlUel lines of new houses showed the. place had attained the dig- of two dimensions. Strango es vero on the aigu-boards; ige faces on the streot. Only at blacksmith shop-that wondrous ni of pyrotechUic affects of other ~, the name of-David Fraser still rad upon the rudely painted d. ie brawny giaut did nut reeog- the young maxi, but was willing alk to the young stranger f rom wt for ho liad iwo boys thera. was .omewhere i Montana Iast lie licard frein him, and Angus at Calgary. Yes, Anges had ,ht a big block of land and if ps turned out as he expected, rould be wortli hlf-a-million in a or two. Yes, lie remembered ScazrIett's. Tha old lady died two il ago, sud the old maxi soon f Fred, oue o! the boys, was in business in Toronto, and the r lad, Tomi, was in Manitoba. Ha heard lie vas mùkiug a mnt of ey A man named Allan was on plS ov-uo; nuit mmcli account aas lie could make ont. es b. kuew Billy Gray. Ha used n the mlii, but lie liad un\u003e bus- s hea, snd iost evrything- id have starved oxily for bis girl, ; àfine. oirir sir. as evor von )ris iu that cottage on c enid ef the street. not trust himself to inquiry, thongl lie felit r about Doris Gray's or a f ew more \u003cencrai atvohiled on down the among its flower gardons and bit\u003e.- soming shrubbery; but ha dared not panse, till ha had desceaded a dip in the road whore a plank walk spanned a littie spring rivulat. Scarlett re- niambered that ha had made bis first day's wages, fifty cents, helping to lay the planks, the yoar before ho lait home. On the second plank froni the eud, ha conld stinitrace the nearly obliter- ated intcrtwined initials R. J., M. R., which Dick Johinson liad carvedl su boldly tan years a\u003c0. Poor t»ck lay bnriad at ?Bloemufontein, sud Min- nie Robson-married Iikely, by this time. Ho leaned on the railing and gazod down at the shosis of tiny min- nows hovering aboya the gravai, thon fiitting panie-strieken at the sliadow of a floating weed. A liglit utep on the planks roused him froin lis re- varie. Ha glanced np; sha stood lie- fore him carrying su arinful of wildl liles. Their eyeu mat in mutuai re- cognition; thon hors dropped witli a confused bluali. '\"Tom Scarlett, where dld you drop froni 1\" \"I droppod off the Chicago Expres for a faw hours te look at the old place.\" \"Ton vili find things mucli clang- cd ?\" \"Vory mucli changed 1» aseited Tom su meaningly that Doris liastlly coutinned: \"I hear that you are doig vall in the west.Y \"No, Doris, I mada a bad liash of things on the start-an irretrievabla mistake.Y She looked at hlm sym- patlietically, sud lie added: \"MNoney is not averytlhing. That sounds frite onougli; but every yourg fool lias to learu it oer froin bitter experieuce.» \"Tou ara tue severe on yenruelf,» she said gentiy. «\u003cAnd yon, Doris, vhat have the years been bringing yonr\" \"M4usia pupils sud more leuons.» \"Uusband's no good,» wau ?om's prompt deductien. «\u003cCome up sud take breakfast vltb",
         "TUE CANADIAN MAGAZINE us; mother wvill be glad to see you again.» 'l must catchi the 11.15 train for Chicago,\" protested Scarlett. \"Our tram-~car runi every hait- heur,\u003e said Doris calnly, pausing at the littie gate. While they waited for MNrs. Gray to corne downt, Dorias howed Tom about the little garden, the. hobby of lier beanty leisure houri. They wan- dered up and down the, trim paths snd rows of shrnbbery, quite obliv- ions ot the. opera-gisases in the. wmn- dois et Wldow Morgau's lodging- bouse across the. way. They talked of the floiera, the. fields the seenery; tiiey reealled the old achool daym, and the. oid friends of the, piat. She seeiued ready te talk ef anything ex- cept her husband, un entity quit. dently suiperflious-the one bleu in an othenrwise ideal sdioe things. 'Who the dence iras the IIow any way? «Dor-is, you must pardon my t ilîarîty, but that is the only nai. know for you. i-er-do not-hi She looked up in a momentary irilderment, thon flushed slightly, \"I amn stili DoîiS Gray,\" she plied demurely. Tom Scarlett's heart beat wildl \u003c'Doris, woull yoii-er--change Gray te a livelierhu? 'Ton know, Tom,\" aaid Doria a ly, \"I iras always fond of scarlet Tom did net eatch the, 11.1 press. GEMMA'S GRIEF By MARY LINDA BRADLEY 3 HE sat apart, lier thrifty toil-creased hands Lay quiet on lier kneeu; that sombre fae Of Tuscan mould frowned on the day's demands. And still she sat, bowed in the hot, stili place. Elght daya ago, thre. sena ireut to enlist. 811. took a letter te the, prieat that noon And came thexice, ateru, her mouth a bitter twist Pietro and Lues, Mario--dead s0 50011? At laut a noiglibour overeame lier aire: «What of thy ions? Tiie saints will give 1\" Thexi Gemma stood in tragie heigt. '\"Tiie law Finds thcm uufit to serve, and thus they live. \"Pietro and Lues, Mario-eaei nnsound I My strength, thon, tailed them and brings shai Tliy sons must fight, and lmine wil bear ne îeixnd And I-I made thiese men for Italy.»",
         "~s. E",
         "The Canadian Magazine",
         "JR PORTION AT VERSAILLES THE STORY 0F HOW THE GRAVES 0F CANADJAN HE-RQES ARE TENDED BY A YOUJNG FRENCH GIRL BY E. MONTIZAMBERT ~SAILESlias alasboe i towui of minenories, al sort of p)ot-pouIrri of by-gonie glories, eoe the war it fias been gatlvani- to ùnlpetueous life, dus-eaere iotors huraip Qis XIV. c'obbiestonles at a j rate. Long ulnes of transport Inlake al perspective Luit of and bustling autnsdashi i the sleepy strects startling oes out of the silence. jiow a town of înanyv con- Ini tile triîn ventral square. tute of Gelîeral ohelook\u003cs rom its pedestall on a new and ordor of Iliiings. Little mlore hunldrcd ycars ago, Ilhe \u003eoyv \"seldier at site.general- at twvent-i dcdatten- '__\"'Mort trop tôt pour la '~-efededDunikirk against mecks of tlic Englisli. Now lie in bis grave In our encrny's 11 ,at Mayene. and Eniglishi sui- re bulried in Iii, native towri Ive fatllenI dlefending- Diitkirkl Pire. very barenoss and simplicity iitary v etr at Ver- weethroce Caiianilkl Soldiers iLed, pervadles tho place with m iey« that is enhianccdi by tlie ay of a dlark autumin. Pcrcicd top of the risc whichl slopes uip froin tlic town, flhe graves B3ritishi soldiers lie in a space Below Ire the French cîvilian grravos, and thc paJtit wI1ds Ilp bc- twveuil typical Ga liciimonuments and toxubstont-a covcrc-d with IbIlck, silver. and purpie imotle.The top) of the clijf ha,, been partiiliv levelled, leavinig as, a akgol a litle banlk of sand al few feet hligli crownied byv a grove of yeung trees, Unjder tiis ciif ilsvra ie of ye ie notiids lie tlle odir'graves. They arcý very ini.Ec vcaglrmuî lias at its hcand a sixdrwooden uruos painted blaek, onl whil-h stand ont iii white letters Ilhe inan's namiie and thle naine of ]lis re-gimeilt. lIere ani there aj Germian insvription catces. tlle eye. The cnemy'lS Woun1ded w\\lo are picked up ini the lBritish limesý are takeni withi our own mon ta Britili liospitals, and al number o! Germnait wouinded have beeni birought te Ver- sailles,. One or two of themil whomn no care ner si\u003cill cou1ld sav4 have died and been bilried, wvitb tlhe saine ecre-ý mionY that imarks Ilhe fuiicral. of ait English soldier, Ii filc grave that fî11s tie next Vvant pceiii fli le w Those4 whosc bitter miemories arc longzer livedl thani ours would perIiapa hiave prferd lat the, Germnanvi shionli lie in a spare ipart. The eol- onel in emmnand of No. 4 Generail Ilospital lias aniothevr vision. Onceý thieir filhfing is forever stilled lie al- lows ne distinction te be inade be- tween friend and foc. German and Briton lie aide by side in the peace",
         "M LLE RENEE LEFEVRE TENDING GRAVES AT VERSAILLES that is none of their .makîng, and the colonel hinIsef marked out the attitude which he thouglit should be observed by attending in person the funeral, of the first Germa» soldier burÎed at Versailles. The graves of our Canadji are beautifully kept. Frai especially the womexi of Frai taken into their keeping ti of the British, soldiers who 1 death ini guarding their soil",
         "SOLDIIËRS' GRAVES AT VERSAILLES I frst went to the Versailles 1, found there, soberly the. patbs, a littie solitary 3ed figure who unconsciously 1 that deeper meauing Whieh ath the bare political fact of the alliance between France and Great Britain. 'When war broke out M ademoiselle Renée Lefèvre aaked herseif what she could do to help. She had no training as a hospital nurse, and she wanted to begin at",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE once. Shie found thease to lier problem une daY as she watvhdîdie funera,-il of thle first KiEîglish soldier wlio died ait the hospital openied ini the Trianon Palare Ilotel, just after the battie of the Marne. Thec thought that these British voinrados of lier onSOldier rtherlad dliedl so far fromn their. homles and] friends weighvid on the inmfd of this girl with tile mlystir, eyvS and genitle voice. Ail through the cold d1ark winter she went up1 the cexnetery blli every day to tend the graves, planting lit- die brits of evergreen on each one. When sprinig Vaile she boughit eluinps of forget-m not and an tiy artiflojal flower la placed in quaint Frenchi fa.shion, so that even if wind and w thrdestroy the plants there may PtHi lie somnething on thie grave. AIl throuigh the heat of summiiier and the obili aitiumni 41ic kept stead(Fastl «y to lier self -appoiiited task, teniding es\u0026h yellowv mmmnd with peiseim- partiality, as if thevy wvere lier chli dA'on. If any receive favour, it is 811roly the three graves wvhivh mark the bds restngpIpace of CJorporal Macdonald (623 P.P.C.L.,), Sergeant LilIy (11197, 7thi Can.), and Private Tarry (11151 Pth Gan.\u003e). \"T['ey camte fron rio far, to help) u1s, site said, \",you muait tell the peu- pie, ofý Canada that as lon as I aRnI here 1 awIl loolk after their deadY She has been thle soleý guardisu of that quiet spot for so long that it semdalrnost like anl intrusion whon, the Canadian colony i11 Paris wen±t ont to Vorsailles on Ail Saints' Dsy wilî ti- six mlagifleent wrc4atlis or- dlered b'y the Canladiati Conimissiogne, %\\itl tlle funds placed at his dispuj l'y bis eouîîpatriots. Tuhe rain eaill djown in torrents als the squad of sol. diers f'rom Ilhe military' hospital plaeed the w\\realths, one on eacli Catia- (liali grave, one for thle 1eniSh. Freitl. and Belgian sections. Aý gncat ecrowd! SUI gathercd to witneas the. .sùmple veremiony, as weil as tu psyN their ow\"l pions tribuite to the d.a\u0026à Thi yar, tMe \"Cute des Morts,» w inarkedI a feature of Frencit reIijj' , lifv. lias takenýt on a deepor~ mienî,i and it was difficit to find Oies wsy thriouigh the( throng. I did not see the littie, guardian of the graves. 1 fancied she was kep- ing in thef bavkgrounid and watjg tili she was aTone again tA lift th heads of the frail roses and rea th golden inscription on the 1broaj $ib- bons: \"La Colon1ie Canadievneà cOmpa)(triotes mortes ait champ d'ho,k-",
         "INSTON SPENCER CHURýCHILL BY HUGH S. EAYRS r 7INSTON\u003e% LEONARI)SPN CER CHURCHILL, lias Vthrown dlown the gauntiet. a year lie lias seeni that the at- ýc of a large section of the publie reat Britain and the l3ritains sea iras almnost an impeachmient. on his witlidrawal f roui the ýruaient for a time,. in ordevr that jay serve as a soldier, instuad of gin «welpi natvt, e si glove sharply acroe th-oi. ýe fac1e of hie crities. Tlle ch1ai- ,r iq noir at the front, but doiibt- lie left ies address, so that lie be notifled! whcthier the gaunit- ~aa lieen pieked Uip. miurthill's forty-one, years-lils iday is this very day 1 wvrite been a ,erif-,o ocason wen lis thrown down the gautlntiet. lie, ever bias been the attacking r.Even, as ini this latest ln- ,eiin he defends lie dIcoe so ttac. 'Sre hlow lic dloes it. 1le t garde suffliiently to parry the then swiftly leapq to thirust bI1s %won't have it said that this wa s rilian plan foisted I)y a political Tur upon reluctant offleers and rtu.» Then, in the iiext sentenve. je truc that 1 dlid not receive Lord Fisher the elear giiane firai support which mighit have expected. if Lord Fisher dlid approve of the operations, lie Id have spoken ont nt the war \u003e it wa.9 in the beglnning. is noir. ever shall be. For if England dules not bcthis innyyouthl axid yolithfull mani to a IHuni huIeIIt, let uls make no ita:ke- abolit it hie will 1w baek. said M ermgfo isl ton taethat aphiorism unle wayN and arge that therefore thlnue muest be there. ]n Churehull's case it i s thjere, H1i.e haibit is Iuohlene to eaul out the foc, a foe, auly foc. \"hi lenger\" is bis nouin in apposition. To attavk implies., action. 'What- ever (,Ne Mr. Churehili is hle a naiii of action. Thevre are tholse who eay hie is suchl a mlai beoauise hec love's the limeliglit. Let us admit it. Iledar ]y loves to be in the radiuis of thev footliglit. There cannot be too muiieh glare for hlmi. And if the, operajtors arc issing lie ean Ili his own lime- liglit operator. \"In the public iyevo once moire,\"ý said al friend o! inte Io Winston Chnrch- iii some years, ago, whfen he, beardedI Mr. C'hamberlain over the( fiscal queis- tion. Churehill grinned, the brad. frank, liearty grin of tlu'- boY he was; and will ever lhe. \"T'Ve, got to be iin. if 1 have o tumii- bIc in !»lie said. That's it: Churchill has got to be in. irliether hc( is wantcd, whlihr there le roomn for hini or not. To lmi it is neyer undignifiedl to chase the bcani and gleami wblcb wmli refoct hlm. Me lias always donc it uip to, now,. and ire opewn our daily papers witli the continuiai expeetation that a four-coluain headl streteheR across the front page, index to a despateli",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE that Winaton Leonard Spencer Churchill has onc more tumbled into the limieliglit, appropriating every ray, and lias stood therc mnaking one more bow before a public that neyer wearies of humii. Ife wals neyer part of the perform- anice. fIe was the performancee. The stage and the ree't of the cast were ,lay enitirely incidentais; there to fcmiphasize hlm, focu8s attention on hlmii more ccrtainly, Iimnn himi more sharply. Churchill is the grect protean. He cýan hecomne at a miomnentls notice a niewspaper maxi, soldier, anti-suffrag- let, ýconioie.,t, party politician, or -statesmian. I1e lias learrned ail these parts. 11e caxi present himseif li the Theatre of the Publie Bye and play thie wholc seven in as mnany nights, and by way of matinee performnanc hie can portray either the general- issimo or the noveliet. As a \"benefit\" he miglit give a characterization of the thorn in the flesh. I1e is, T say, eternally the maxi of action. A score years ago he finish- ed with Hlarrow and its partial edu- ration (\"0, clain these public sehools» is the way he summed it np0 and went to Sandhuirst, by way of looking at textbooks on \"lIow to be a soldier\". Then he went soldiering. H1e was wise ini his choice. Rie need- ed the discipline whiich, a military life aloxie could give. And-tcIl it not in Gath-he etill needs it! Per- 'haps this second taste may give it hlm. lie eerved with the Spanieli forces in Cuba at twenty-one, and camne home with the Order of Miii- tary Menit pinrncd on hie uniform. England was too «slow,\" to uise an expressive coiloquiiligm, for this ac- tive, impatient yonth. H1e joined the 3let Piinjab) Infantryv ini India. lI 1898, as aied-apto Sir 'William Lochant hie again canricd a rifle, and came homne with another elasp, on hie ceheqt, and shortIv-for the nations of elc earth were obliging-Ieft for thxe Tririsvaal. nie was correspondent for The for)iiig Post, which ait this moiu wvouid sec him, in Jerieho before it Iowed hlm to represent it ini the i capacity, but he kept one arm soldiering. 0f course, he got into limeliglit. Hie accompanied Capt Haldane on an armnored train. ' enemy dcrailcd the train. Two gunts and a maxim spat lire at the cupants. The war correspondent came a soldier on the moment. ' fun began to get hot. As a lieuitenu hc walkcd! in and out of the mass wrcckage, and direeted and belped the firing. $uddenly the war eoe spondent in hlm bobbed up again. \"Keep cool, mein,»1 he enied, «Ithi what copy this wili make for~ paper.\" 11e was imxprisoned. Oenel Smuts held up the train whieh c rned Jili away and saw the lieutenant grinning impudently hlm and attacklng again, if ouly impertin 'ence. 'May 1 have speciai privilegest arn a war correspondent?\" h. sa out with that sang froid whioIi i always been part of his make-up. lie escaped from, his prison a came home, when he bhad done 1 bit, ith six more ciasps-and a g!j loue share of the limelight. Looking for fresh fields to cnu thie mani of action (he was littip mc than a youth glimpsed politims was the son of '¶andi(y,\" and his ie tree was easY. , He represented~ t' Coxiservative interest in Oldhal That was li 1900. From the ,fin hie activity was on the attaeking gk A close friend of hie, whose 1o, frendsxip has been my privilege, to told me of those early days.Ohu\u003c iii buret upon the flouse one night an attack upon 'Mr. Broderji Army echeme. Stutteng and il ing-for he had and stili bas an i pediment lin hie speceh-he spoke good deai more daringly tha n he fel Brandishing hie sword, the mission 1 his constituents, s0 latelIy bue.kE about him, he pinked his foo, \"Randy agaixi,» said one reb",
         "F. ANI) MRS\u0026 WINSTON CHURCHILL r. But Lord Randoipli never orce of this younger Church- not long before hie threwv gauxitiet to Mr. Chamber- strong mari of the Govern- inly one other inan in Eng- ed assail Chamberlain, and d Lloyd George, 18 aise a Churehill for some turne had akiug away fromn the Con- fold. I'atrician by birth ing of a long line of patri- ie seed of real demnopracy I with the aristo lin i and was gradually Winning out. W\"ith thie saine bitter saresmni the saine scath- ing ruthlessness and the saine per- eonad mialie. hie thirewv back Mr. Chamberlain',, argument.q, torii, brok- eni and for the time being of no effeet. Thus h*e burned hia hoatq. FIe crossed the floor and sat on the op- position bench. It was a daririg. a brazeri thing to do, for a young mani barelyv turried thirty. lie rose te spealc frein bis new seat, and. headed by 'Mr. Balfour, bus former allies, ieft the chamber in a body, muttering",
         "TUE CANADIAN MAGAZINE \"'ITurneoat. - -Mi lie sign of it thiat this iinp)etuious fighiter gavec was to f lsh. Andg Ile 111ushed again whenl, walking intio Ilis club11, the \"officers' tout\" of the Coliservative Pathis t;ittinig downl to) dinle wals followed by Ill epatr fromn the diingi--roomi of everyone but flic w-aiters. \"It wals,\" silid a promfineint Coan- s-ervative to mie, \"a daring thing in Chiurchili f0 chiange pates Tt was moire-if wvas brave. flore was a young mnax with a heritage of Tory- ismi for whom, despite mnany parlia- meintary disadvantages, great things Were promised. Rlis repu)ltationl was by no ineaxs mnade. Hie was, on thec whoIe. afill an indifferent speaker. Aund ho hlad always shown bimself an entirely ndpdalawkwaird à rid unererfain quaiitity. Rlis ex- freine youth, hie Icaninge, to impuil- siv, nreasoned action, bis spasmno- dip incuirsionsq into aotivity 911 f qa- tered fthc belle!( thiat lue was not to ho relied on. Yet hbe took the one stelp tlint bas fixiislied the political varcor of s0 Mnarly. If was- tbouigb I dopplore if- a brave thing to do.»' B3y 1906 if came to ho reeCoguizpod that Churchill stood for action. R-e wais, even in those da ys, a strange ad- mixture, a make-up of coinplexities. flc was beginxiing ta lose the look of lithenresa axid bealth which wevre bis as a soldier. He appeared to be very« confident, but iinderneatbi he -was a butndie of quiivering. d1ithering ilerves. When he spoko if was as thouigh ho waq repeaiting a lesson, as indeed he wae. lu m teens 1 st and listened to hîmii one, night wben lie foloi a few friends,, how lic came ta be rppgardled as a second Pitt 'or a second Býurke, \"Ousid,\"Le said, \"I was confi- dent. 1 used mny armef, my eyes, my bands to empbas,,ize wbat 1 was say- in g. I talked for haif an heur and fthc House applauded. Put no one knew howv I funked. tbat speech.\" fIe pauserd, reminiseing and enjoying ît. «,No one knew that 1 was wondering, wondering, wonderig, al] the finie. whfe1 should forget the weo hall writfen and rehýlearsodl ini stuidy for days anid nliglits boef But that was the speech whirl cided the flouse that hiere wva arrivai, a new force Wa bo reel wifh, a piece( who was going t more than a pawn, whose best ,Would( evýer ho in attaek andl nd dlefenoe. Ile kept uip a fusillade O! tir T'arifr Reformi. It was on fli tion thiat I first heard bini qpeu the FIluse. I had mnet hurm-ii occasiýons previolusly and( I WâII xiouis to compare nlotes. 1fr, 1 Georg-e was 1lading. 1 reý viiily tfie miasterY of nxood~ h. sessed. Ilis e'lqence w'19 in sioned; for rich, sparkling r from the, heart o! a inan ta the $ of mon. Mfr. (George liats no»e 1fr. IBalfonr, lookirig as usu;ial Ji ourate at a pink tea, f ollowe( and as usual he mefaxdere\u003e4 tjrg bis amazing dialectics, remainij, ways eharmingliy tbougitfi1,~ in, lyv diplomatie. nimlbly olusave, Churchill ramle ilext. 1 î p' indeid 1 htappen f0 know-thnt partîcuflar speech liad been eliu and ininutely* rebeiarse\u0026. Th( I woke up fborougly, v for Mfr. 'B,1 bad 111110d ift ýf s onoe F the oufsef if wae intereaf cd, Chl, iIl's talk was sheer rbctoric. It an attaek upon -Mr, Balfout' and lied nlot at a11ilupon tihe immpu1ýý flic moment. Ch-urrhili knov v he( was going to sa ' . le said if. began by genile, -proda, progroef~ a series of ruhsand digs. and fi Iy jabbed the steci as lie, worked fo hie point. lie reindedi,( me~ nofhing sO mueili as a kniglif jousfed, and who intended fa borne. Ris blowvs were Plean, s, and certain. The ligbft o! hi,. fer mind and flic fire of bis faifh, tha bad bis quarrel iust gleamed,, flamed froin tbe second lie was fi flic time be was dowxi, He figbting, attacking-for no ni Word is go apt-aII tbe fiie, 'R",
         "WJNSTON SPENCER CTHURCUILI, followed liard faet as blow fol- i blow. The only variation was itty epigram wiceh rather turnedf,( .steel ii its weunid, or a simlile, .y and essentially îiice, whiieli 41l fittcd the Situation. Ter nio trace of nevosu iswtoghi bunife of senitied entl and! uical wires was feeling\" very. Ifeut like al wet r-ag. le saiid so reeptioni afterw;rds. But whleo wvas speaking sheepr wiIl-power bis agitation une.The sec il eut as an inoprbeat- Sini whichi the thrulst ofacs- the jil) of argumlent, tlle prod iermiasion and thle resof trulth posed the \\04oe. If N\\sa gea 7 t a rA 97-t awerdsmian. is axiomatie that theë mian whio êks muast be ulnafra1id. 110 muait villlng te risk somnethiing on the wv. Churchill did, wheni lie ehang- iis politial voat, Theire la4 a le. indeýfiniteý belief that a tiirn- fromi the mioment of Ilis tur-i ,s theneeferthi geed for nothing to) be trodden uinder-foot of mci. arenltlyV Sir' Tlinry ambel iermian did int aseribe to siieb ~enet. Chuirchil,. had risked h; \u003c'C-B\u003e' was equally wvilling to a ehanee. 11e gave theo renegade 1. aud muizzled( hinm. Churchili aie Under-SeeretarY for the vol- bave often wonderel,» lie once to an intimate friend. \"mat 'C-B' thouglit oftime in those rdays,' Wliatever he( theuglit scog-nized the value, as a peliti. 1 o Winaton. le rise of Mr. Churehull i teo liar and tee recent te need any.- ,ý but \u003ceastal recellection. Tt was more to a series of sallies and mishes than te auy graduai -th. In due tîmne. , 1 ecamne ident of the Board of Trade. Home Secretary' . 11e continued R.ttaeks on the Tarif! reformera, when Mr. Lloyd George intr\u003e- d bis fanious Budget, Church- band was te bis sword again as lie sighited the latest eniemi, thle lanid- lord. ilolingii aif t his bane, pon wh'Iieil was inscr'ibed the moite of his fatherli, \"TIrust Ili Il\u003eeoe l,h ilunged and did isP best as a lieuitenant of Ilhe Cliancelor. TI enemyv soerured re- inforemens th Lo,*1ý no leaýS and ('hurcl'oil feit1 tIo ede f hîS fou,. re 1lig uf11 nwrh of his sei have touchelfd uipen his gift as, a limle- liglit operator. I li uad it oe the Ton ypand v Riots and ovv er I amn- euis -and 111deronis SyNdnevy Sr Iig. li, 11nad414 hlimaief more than ailiti ab1 'lsurld in thc latterbuies as a1 eoinman:11ding efflver. Thlvpe tac(le, of Ilis Majestyv's Hiome Seero- tnr ireeIllte filring of thle iii- tia uipon Peter. the Painteri \\vas onlly eqiialled liy the foelhanrdy Way « l whiel Ile got inte the range ot Pete's\" weaponi againi and agfain. We mighit inideod hiave lot our en fant ferilel thon. IBut even breq ecals for footliglits. aud Churehuli dlemanlde'd the centre of theo stage. ILe was bitterly opposed te Wo- mian's Sufaefor- a long timne. and mnisjiidged tlic qtrengtli of thev move- imnt. Once more lie attaeked, Nm\\ and tIen the oithe(r side, reune lie bl Ow. I wasý eue et a party thilt awaitedJ hli at Bri-stol wliere lie was te ad]- dress the famnows Anehor oet The, tr-ain eamef inte the station, and Churchlili lited. A yolung wznan, evldently' determined te asail withl lier hauids the man who had deliveredï miali wordIv blowa at th(, Causl'e, crept Iup aud struck the Minister acosthe face with a dog-whip. For a moment Ile waa flabbergast- ed. then tuirued te iee ef the meni standing there, wlio was a genttlemani et the elotli. \"Wliat de ven say. Mr. E,» lie asked slyly, 1sa turu the other eh eek 1\" Ie camec, at last, te be First Lord of the Admniralty. Prom thc first.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE lie took the offensive. 11e attaeked red tape wltb the ruithiesaq-nes of flrmi resolve. He drove bis lance of Reformn ewiftly and uneorringly at liydra-headed offlcialism,. The old order wvas nothing to respect, merely becrause it wals old. 11e instituted a newer and a better, and( he trod on thc cornq of innumiiierable people tW do0 it, Take Beresford, for instance. 1 sat in the, gallery and( heard Lordl Charles, the old hroom, siate Churcli- iii, the new, for hiaif ani hour uiiner- vifuUyl. Churchili was suire hie was right in the action eriticized, and hie had no dleferene to pay to experi. once. lis couinter-attack was pro- bably the nicet seathing rctort utter- edl in the Commionaq ini our time. \"Before the. noble lord gets up,\" lie flunig out, \"lie neyer knows what lie is going to gay. When hieis uphle dos not know what lie is saying. And m'ben lie sits down, hc doesn't know wbat lie lias said].\" Tt is generally eonceded that M.%r Chuirchilra out.9tanding post was the Admiralty, and moat persons would be prepared Wo sa «y that lie proved the inost sueasrful Firat Ljord Britain has bad. lis regime waa a series of nieded reforme, which, whatever else they' did, guaranteed that if and mwen the Navy was called on it was ready. lie lived Uip Wo bis self-im- poaed creed, confessed when lie don- ned the. cocked bat of office. Tbis is it: \"It is flot for the Admiralty to niend the tiines in which vo live. That is a task which lies in other and better bands than mine. But the task to whieh the Admiralty is pledged, the. taskç whicb, with tbe ungrudging assistance of Parliament it can and vili fuifil. ia to carry tuas nation sratheless tbrough any tume. gond or bad, whicbi nay ho in qtore,.\" So it bas donc, so, it is doing, and so it vill do, tili peace is siLyred. There are tbose wbo believe that Mm. Churchill made sorne inistakes at the Admiralty. A section of the (Jan- adian publie, believes that bis mema- orandum to, Mr.-now Sir Robrt. Borden was sucli. Wheth.r it vas lnt is net mine to say in this papi There is, however, ene cimeumalltan whichi forma an interesting enfumer ar y on the subject. ýoine months after that memora dui camne I was in London, ai after playing for four or live hou at what somneone bas aptly reterr tW as \"the new gaine ofWht1 iing,\" 1 secured an interview wi Mmr. Churchill. The report of tb interview appearvd iii The Cana4j,4 Courier of January l7th, 1914. \"I biave corne to tel] you?» h. sa wben at luat 1 got past ail thi. se tries, and awaited bim, «that 1 \".al cannot say anything about the nai quetstion.\" «Buit,\" I saîd, \"I have eorne aIl il way froim Toronto, MmI. Churchill, ask yeui te give me a mesaage tWC adians about this question, whieê ail-important to theni. '\u003cWell, aIl 1 bave te say is that do not think at thia juncture it vise for me Wo say anytbing in? gard Wo the Canadian navy question '\u003cWby V\" * .\"Wh T\"he said, «becaue 1 do M think I should sav anythinq le.t seem to interfere wflê the Movemex, of a sdf-governing Dominion.\" I give that conversation for wli it is wortb. It would seem to tud cate that the First Lord himseif te: bis memoranduma W the Premier wi a tactical eiTor. We corne nov tW a consideratj q what Mmr. \u003cJhurchiil's future viii h, Until lust week bis reputation w\u0026 for rnany menthe, under a clouaé. 'f was blamed for the Antwremp ep tion, the las o! Sir Crsoh Craddockc's fleet in the Pacifie, th destruction o! the cruiisers Cresq Aboukir, and Hogue, and tý faflure of the Dardanelles ate Not even the sportamanlike wy i: whieh lie Wook the position o! h ceilor o! the Ducby. theb, u",
         "WINSTON SPENCER CHURCHhILL i, from the Adxniralty, was a oome..down, reinstated him in Sod opinion of many thiuking e. Last week lie made hia aie explanation. On the bcli was weil advised in so, do- He lias gone to the front and miot b. certain tliat lie wiil re- He therefore used what op- mity lie had to ear himscif of sevral charges muade against TPhat sucli refutation as lie was ample remains to lic seen. may lie words to be lieard from 1F'islier and Lord Kitcliener, would offset the resuit '.\\r. ikili secured, namely, a correct- i the. estimate of responsibility placed on lis shouldere for theSe' is acts. But, pro tem, lie is high inI favour. Said the press Lch, ilcscribing hie speech in 'S:* r months 'Ur. Churchill bas lived r.proacb. Hlm entrance to the to-day was pasued s.Imost unno- As h. rose, his supporters gave rourugaiug cheerg. Approbation in- Iini volume as ho anmwered one after another, and h. concinded a hurricane of appiau se, whlle rg of all political partie. cromsed use t\u003c' congratulate in. . Asquith made a speech ln which Igredhe had always found Mr. m1 'a wise ceunsellor. a brilliant ae, and a faithful triend'2' e cornes through the war safcly, 1, in my judgment, corne back ýtain ti\u003e be a mighty force in ipollUecs. We have corne to Churchill as unsafe, n.ot de- bis, and even slippery. There tbink, in the pat been good 1 for such an opinion. To lie- li, lie lias undoubtedly ap- [, again and again, to bie play- r hlmself. Hlie personal ambi- iunboundied. Heic l a MarI- ,b. Young arnbîtio-n'e ladder rvd him well, and by good )Iiaek, liard work and ecaseles g lie asmountedrnn by ruug lacenearthe op.Itrnay lie b. climber-upw.ardl bas looked ;b clonds, g-rown soinxthing giddY as lie lias reviewed ft celerity with whicli lie lias thus far accom..- plished hie journiey, and accun a vision of wliat persoual grreatuces niight he hie. Buit if this lias been the case it ie tho commiion lot of younig amb)ition. Mr. Chuitrchili is juet fortyv-one, and has more youtli thon is the portion of xuoet mon of that age. If, in the past. ovcrweening ambition lei been his, lie lias shown signe, thesqe later years, of losing it bit by bit. Ilis eetback, ln the shape of bis more or lema fore- cd departure fromn the AWiniralty, lias done more, probably, te steady Min than anything in bis career. Ili, experienees and lot as a soldier among other soldiers in the Oreat War niay ho warrantedl to continue tlie settling procces. Mlien lic returna to active politice hoe will have lest mudli of that dare-devilry, that ovor-coufidence whieih bas chiaractcrizcd, in smie sort. hie early political lite. Ife wiil re- turn, T think, witli mat as niuch per- sonal ambition as is nieesary, and wholesomne and helpfuil. and no more. Whcn wve sec him again 1 bdieve the rashuese, the penchant for basty and tinder-juidgedl action whieh have earncd for hlm thc adjective \u003c'pre- veous,.ý will have disappeared. lie lias, T venture to think. tbree attributes whidli wiil make hlm mighty and miglitier yet as a states- man. Ho bas, firet et ail, genius. lie lias thc spirit of real democracy alive and tliriving in him. And lie lias the. power of initiative and the capacity for liard work needful te carry that whicli lic initiatee to matured mucecess. Ho hias genilus. lHe lias infinite capaeity for taking pains. Hie liad not always. but always lic hud the seed of it and the development lias taken place during the last ten years. Hie la the faeulty of close and rea- souied thinklngz, and lis. teel, the wide, wide vision. lie does more than sec; lie perceives. That is what lias muade hlm, audacious and pre- vcdons as lie lias been upon occasion, the «wise counsellor» to which Mr. Asquith referred. lie lias enough",
         "THEV CANADIAN MAGAZINE perseverance and large faith to See the eit erprize boriu of hi,; fertile mmid throughi to consummiation. Ile lias the spirit of real derno- Prac(y alive and thriving withil imii. The people of England know it. They inay have douibted 1-114 politieian, buit thiey hiave neyer dbtdthe denio- erat. Throwing overbýloardl s0 early adi th(. theory of' elas distinction and heredity whiehi was the appurtenance of this child of the uipper tenic, his i-Icar and prophetic vision and Lis powepr of abstract rvasoning showved huîn the essential justice of' certain v1aimis of \"thie pe1e. remnemrber imii repeating, wvith thle liglit o! sin- Ocrity and grippiig c-onviction inli hs sple-ndid vyvs. the Ume of tHait great hymil 'tWhený wilt Thou Mta'e thle peo- pie ?\" \"Whn ilt Thoa qsavi thie peoplie? O, Gmd of iiieTcy. whien? The poople,. Loîdl, Tby People. 2 -The wefaeo! thc great masses o! England is what I arn voncerned auti, said. Ille lias the power o! initiative and thwecapaity for liard work. Ilis mmid is alert, bright, fresh. and his armi is ready to soc through the, work Whivh his mmid originiates. Hie is, indeed, a tireless worker. '4Chutreli- ill.\" sýaid a British membeillr to mie. \"is a icloggcr!\" 11e mas always a si ger. çain et his haind to p)Ilgli, thle 1lbour. be it (\u003ever so gro is flot shirked. Early and laido, \u003c and inighit, Ilie worked, as First Le at the gigantie problem o! Ille 1 preparation o! the, navy. It las 1), so wvith wa eve csc lie lias ta] uip. Ils energyý is enormyous; Ilis, and zeal are uniflag-ginig. No rand ton lng, no speil too protcracted, himc to travel and for himl to wcý 1le would never Iaiiniiier a nail h into the wood, and drop his bamur whenl tfic dock1t00k the hotu, quittilng. Whatevcr bis band findul do0, he does with ail Ili,, iuight- They' say Jwie ay formn a Il, party, if i(,emovs safely out of wa r. le niay, thougi1 Ionot, p sonally, regard it as likely. Býut w thier he( remains with thle TLbg party in lhritiain, or wiethter lanhe 1nother, lie wifl he a S. le was a-bout eigliteen. 1 thil wlicn lie and another Harro\u003ew t stood looking at the pileý of buildii at Westminster. \"You sec thIc Brluse( Of COmulnon lie said to bis friend. \"I shall get there one day, and a to the top.\", And grelat will be the force *hl wil keep him dowxi. c",
         "LIGHT AND LIFE PROFESSOR D. FRASER HARRIS, M.D., D.Sc. ,eds ne intimate kuewledge of ,its or an)imals te appreciate the -edingly important part whiehi ilays in the li1e of ail creatures, lie possible exception of thiose inhabit the abysses of thie The green plant must have if grown ni a dark cellar it up paie anid feeble- -ati0lated vegetal ceunterpart of the e and unhilealthy dwveller of the s courts and aileys of our cities. lit sunllighit the ehieorephyli will ýVel0p, and without hophl L calmiot mianutfacfture- organ.iie inorganie mnaterial, a pewer is its chlef characteristic. thc plants (Io net fermn atarch igar, then an immense source of oct supply is eut off. The colour- ,ants-the fuxigi and bateria- Lly do net nccd liglit, but fleur- Kt without it: mnushroomns grow 1 dark tunnels, bacteria flouriali n a sunless enviroumnent, te of tubereulosis, for instance, tive in sunlessand ili.ventilated liglit by imeans of its chemieal- Liye (ultra-violet) raya is dis- r inimical Le bacterial growth. -places over an active culture- a stencil withi a letter eut eut aud te plate be expesed te te iine for seme time, thien only part which the liglit did net will have \"colonies\" of bacteria mg oer it, and the letterstands k. a suniL figure ln te midst dow. Beeently te sterilizatien ter on a large seale by admitting violet l,-Ilit to it 1ù ua litut~ut Appar-ently lighit inhlibits (certaini dissct-pr 1oduetinzg mran~is s, for. ithan e, i bavilluis of lupus te tubervuiir linecteti of theo -kim. Ileru the light uali get direvtly at the lvsimn. TlIte speeial applicatlio f IhIs is te 'iighit Cuire, d.. ie by Ilhe ltle Pro- fese \"iseOf opnae.Onl 11c inodl cfha liniue here 1lir \\Ma- jcsty ucnAlexandra fouudied Ulic pheotothierapetiel. depart.mvit. at Ulic Leonl Hlospital. Tho lighit uised ia that fromn an e1ceetric are, te hecat rays beilng acreeneg off by aL speeial prisml. ThIere i la ilvI about the cuIraltive action of liglit that we are far f romi uniderstand(ing; thuis wev do neOt knowý wh1Y iL iS that rcVd ligill prevents, sîniailpox front becotning virulent; pat»ints kept ini a rom lighted only by red lighit neyver have sucit bad \"p)ittinig\" as t1iise whe are Det se treated. Titis is neot ail that is cuirions abou)It red lîglit : it would seem that it is Uic chemically active raya ait thc violet end of thie speetrunii, wblichl are re- spotiaible for '\u003cinuburui\". Nowý peo- ple whlo live in hot and brighit sun- aliine wear, as we knew)ý, a red head- dress; thle fez ef Uic Turk an(d ef te Egyptian la red. lc lias feuind eut by experience that thie red materia1 preteets hlm from sunburn better than any eUlier eolour. 'lhle red suit- stanec acta aLs a filLer te separate te violet and eh em i caly act ive raye f rein tic others, se thiat it la imposib\u003ele te geL a aunhurn in rs\u003cd liglit. The lady therefore who wvishes te preserve te",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE whIitenless of lier ekin WîlI do se mnost effectively by using a red parasol in proference te one of any other colour. Lagtly, there is something in red which is net iu any other colouir, as the \"rcd rag te the bull\" shows. What it ia we dIo flot kuew, but it must be very irritating; it lias been suggested that the bull mistakes it for blood. Biologiats are ail agreed that liglit is in mnany wvays a stimulus te plants and animais; it miight be interesting te take the evidence ef this somewhat in detail. In the firat place, liglit causes meovements ef plants and animais. We know how certain plants close up their leaves and petala iii a feeble liglit or in the dark, and open thern up again in streng liglit; certain flowers \"follew the suin', as it is said, eue in partieular turns or bends te- wards it se conspicuously as te merit the naine of «suinflower\". This turn- ing towards the light is learrnedly cail- cd \"positive heliotropisni\"; it is a pretoplasinie response te liglit as a stimulu1s. Some plants have made this turning te the sun such a habit that some of them will go on turning te it or opening sud shutting their leayes even when they have been kept in the dark for a considerable time. Certain animais exhibit pliototaxis or affectability te lighit and te colours, changing their colours te suit that ot their backgrouind, as lias been specia- ly demonstrated for some sorts ef prawns by Professer Gamble, et the University et Birmingham. A large number et animais love the sun, turu towards it, bask in it, appreciate it. Those which do not love it are t'ho lest plessant of the animal tribes- frogs, toada, ensila, etc. Mankind naturally deliglits iu the sun. As Solemon long ago said in the Ecclesiastes: Truly the light !ms weet, and a pleasant thing it is for the eyes to beliold the suri. Liglit is a tonie te the nervous sys- tem; the brightness reflexly exhilar- ates the nerve centres, and we are benefited by the lÎght quit. a frein the ozone and the antimu action whieh are inseparale set panlinents of sunshine. W. me. hleiotropisin on a large scale in waY inwhih iiestd t gov wards the West-towards the st suri. The vagit majority oeopl mnore concerned conseioualy wt setting than with the rising sun.: Peip se the Sun risc compar.d, the number who sec or desire to the sun set. The incereased ton, the nerveus systein whieh liglt duces îs a further proof that the. has exerted some real influence on organisa. Definite proet is aftor us by the tact that the milk of c kept in weil-ighted byres is riche creain than that of animais kepi badly-lighted ones. The liglit bas duced încreased chemical ton. in eils ef the mammary gland, the. i lias raised or Stiniulated the tis toue by having llrst raised the. ton, the nervous systeni regulating milk-gland. Similarly, animas exc mnore carbonie acid gas in the li than lu the dark, ether things be equal. Even the lewl'Y AMga, Mi carpus, if placed in, the pcrl the solar light will evolve mnost a gen at that part of the ribbon of c which la ln the brightest part of liglt-the Yellow-green junetion. thÎs Part there Îs an accumulatio certain oxygen-loving bacteria pla in the water fer the purpose of tecting the place of the max1nmuln duction et that gas at the place maximum light. Other evidence t liglit bas a real efTect on prool is that those animals whieh cm their colour aecordiug te their îa reundinggs-frogs, chanieleons, M. iais, etc., enly do se when thelr , have received the raye ef liglit. Si animais when hlinded or hoodeê net change their skin colours. PhYSÎGieoga have long been el vinced that the seuse of light an senSe et colour are two distinct @ tiens, but it la only recently that dence lias been accumulatin\u0026, t. !qh",
         "LIGUT AND LIFE Ltthus senses have different peri- w-al apparatuses in the eye. 39me persons caxi perceive nothing roeponding to what we cail colour; yare \"colouir-blinid\", to nie a terni rised by Sir David Brewster early last century. Asked to say what y sec when vicwig the solar or ý£ric lighit spectruni, they say they a hand of light differing in in- sity i its different parts. These uIly colour-blind people sc forms, lines, differencea o! liglit and de, white, black, gray, but notbing i; tbey have aehromatopsy. The ,joug tinig is that the impression iob the apectrum of daylighit makes thlem ie the sanie as the spectrui liglit of very lowv intensity mnaies a persoxi with normal colour-via- On anadysing the conditions iéh mnay be causal in theee two morena- -total colour-blindneffs 1 achronxatic vision of light at low -nitles-it appears that it is only rods of the retina which. are in h case stimiulated. The notion is t the. cones are for the colour sense, roda only for the lighit sense. Thus the tot-ally eolour-blind, the idea ,hat the roda are funictionally ac- Sthe eonls for some unknown rea- being abnormially inactive. n~ nocturnal animais, those wbich very well in feeble light-eats, 8, bat. moles-the roda prepond-. te. At the exti'ome periphery of ovu retina there are only rode, ~tbisportion of the retina iscol- Jbjnd. Any given coloured light, pweatly diminished in brightness, )me colourleis before it fades ýy; it is supposed to be stimulating r the roda at this tume. There are ain persona who cannot sec i a )le light, at dusk or in the twi- ýt; their condition is known as kt-blindnes or nyctalopia. The ion is that their roda are chem- [y abnormal or deficient in the ment which permeates the roda, visitai purple. the preaenee of ehi essential to viion in low- Lastly, animais are not only sus- ceptible Io lighit, somne of themi ean produce it. Maxiy of us hiave seen the ,irefly ; moat of us hiave seen the woods on a summner nighit scintillating with the flashes froru inniumerable glow- wormu. There is no more b)eauitifult sight o! its kind than to sc the waves of the Mediterranean splash. in light the boive of the steamer ploughing through myriade of phosphorescent Noctiluica. Certain lowly plant or- ganismes fungi and bacteria - -are also luniinous. Recently an elaborate researci lias been carried ont by tivo Americaxi mvorirers on the production o! lighit by the firefiy (pholinus pyralis). Tt ap- pears that normally the lighit produc- tion is rhythmie or intermittent, but that by the action of manyv chieical substanices it ia converted into a con- tinuous glow. They found that the photogenie inaterial of the lumninous organi could be separated fromi Uic animal and thereafter actually dried in vaeuo ivithout inipairing its powver to emit lighit Mvien subsequently plaie. cd in oxygen and moistenied with wa- ter. An atmoephere of carbonie acid gas soon extinguished the light. A very curioua piece of work on the luminosity o! bacteria hias been donc by Prof essor Woodhead, of Cami- bridge, England. Prof essor Wood- head actually contrived to make the. light fromn «Byerinck's phosphor- escent baeterium\" affect a photo- graphie plate. After twenty minutes' exposure hie obtaied an image of a spot of the light passed through a smail aperture. Hie then showed thiat dosing the. culture plate with from seven to tivelve per cent. o! alcohol abolished the Iight altogether, while such a percentage as live lengthened the necea-sary exposure to two and a 'half houri. These intereating obser- vations prove that luminouity is a «vital\" affair, and that the. funetion ia therefore injuriously affected by a protoplasmie poison. Somne ivestigators believe that two substane- are neeessary for the. emis-",
         "TIIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE saoul ofl liglit iln the low o, onle a ubtaveluciferiin to wýhieli oxygeli la vavrid b1 il forment Ilueiferase. If this hie su, it is oie mlore, examlple of the idepred aciviiesof fermnits ( ntne\u003e Anlotlior very reiniarkable thîng abolit the go wrmsliglit la that it is licatiess. Liigltt without hieat ! This lias for long ee'someithilng whieih mari huis grýeatly (Iesired fo have. Unl- les,; he rai iake uise, of the hevat de- %eloped illung wýitl1 the lighit of gas or elerctwieh lie vannot always do, theni that hieat la watsted., But so far he hias nieyer diseovered how to erealte light withoitt hevat. Nature, however, did so ikeons before lie ap- perdupon the soene. $hiakesp.urq haid probablY somlething of Illua ini hia mmlid v\\ lien1 lie wrote: 'l'le glw-;r hois thie matin to bie usu Amd 'g\"iis to pule his uneffectual lire, it is rumarkalble thiat liglit of ani-' lmal m-1igin shouild ho conifinied toe More lowly memlbers of the kisigdlom if i,, uutknown\\v inth lai mammalia, for instance. The idea uiriglinted by Des- eartes that a cit van see il, thi. dark by liglit emlitted froml itas own eyes iia quit e ai niilae, but lîlce tiaily fi. fions if hins gainied a eredence refusd to manly fa1cts. SONG 0F THE SLEEVER ]RI 1ISA14EL ECCLI-STONE MACKAY Q~LEEPERrest quiiet l, s Deep underground, Lord o! your kinigdom 0f mlurmiurons souild, Ileari thie grass growing, sweet for the mowig; lear the stars sing As thiey f ravel around: Grass blade and star dust, You, 1, and ail of uis, Deep underground! Murmur not, Steepier! Yours is the Key To all thinga thaf were and To ail things thaf be.ý ~While the, lark\u003es trilling, While the graiin's filling, Langli with the wind, At Life's riidk.me-ree! How you were borri of it? Why was the thorn of if? Where the new mors o! it? Yours is fthe Key! Sloop deeper, brother; Sleep anid forget iRed lips fliat tremhled, Eyes; that were wet. Thouigh love be weeping. Turn to your isleeping, Life bas no giving Thait death need regret. Here at the End o! al Hear the Beginning eall, Life's but death's senesehal.- Sleep and forgef!",
         "- - - £",
         "The ':niladi:an .\\lag:tzin.",
         "UR GREAT REVIVAL IN TRADE A REVIEY 0F THE PHENOMENA. CHANGE IN CDMMERCIAL CONDITIONS IN CANADA BY WILLIAM.% LEWIS EDMONDS LTIJOUGH' stîli under tiie shadow of a great war, indus- 6 :riîLlly Canada is baskirig in inshin1e to an extent that evenl ost optimistie of us thought wvas uiblo a year ago. On every there are imistakablle signas of iing prosperity. ~en 1915 made its advenit, the andi commivee of the. country ri such a parlous conditio\u003en that and not confidence, predomin- A bad harveat was behinid us, rade waa at a lower ebIb than bee-n experienced for many Capital waa tiinid and refus- b.l texnpted into its aceustomed iels, and credit had no solid in which torest its feet. Manu- 'er, mnerehants, andi financiers, dof planning for expansion, carefully studylng waya and i for curtaihing their operations ler that tbey miglit fortify thcmn- against thle attacks of bard vas not that there was any deep- 1 lear regarding the ultimate trial future of the country, for who gave sustained thouglit re- mg the riehness and possibilities ier natural resources could -Iy b. gravely eoneerneti about Itimate destiny of the Dominion. arwa only as to the immediate dsy thie conditions are the re- of tboe *bich obtained a year ago. It is optimiismi anld tiot pesýsim- ismn, thiat aboulids in Ile ic mmds of the Caniadian people- regardirig the finaneial andi commevrcial condition of thie country. Ther fiinancial and industrial strenrgth of a nation, like the, effleirey of its, armny, e.an only be amcertained after it lias been puit to the severeat of tests. There is no mistaking th, eharacer of the test whieh bas beven aipplied In thec finiancial and indu4trial strength of Canada during thef pa«t twelve to fifteecn zuontha. Not only was it severe, but it was more so than proialy anyone anticipated. But now thiat thc test lins heen muade, and tht, strain lins been with- stood. we have awaliened to, ther fart that flnancially anti industrially Can- ada la stronger than even the. mi«t optinistie deemeti it Wo be. «God,» we are told., \"helpa thffe that lielp theruselve..» The experi- ence of Canada during the pagt year wvould seemn W establisli the truth of this. Shortly after the, war broke out, whien adverse tradic conditions cast their shadow over the land, an ap- peagl was made from pres andi plat- formi Wo tue farinera to apply thein- selvea Wo Uic taàk of increauing the productiveness of the soil, andti the. manufacturera Wo inerease thpir cx- port frade, and Wo atudy more èlosely tberequieents of the home market witli a view Wo supplanting merchan-",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE dlise which bad hitherto been im- ported. The responae was ready. Farinera and manufacturera set thie.inselvea, in their respective aphieres of operation, with a will to the ta.sks assigned thein, And a-s thefr efforts have been erowned with a measure of suceesa far beyomd that whieh the most op- timiatie could have anticipated, it la net tee xnueh te say that we enjoyed the faveur and sinile of a kindly pro- viec.At any rate the fates were with us and net againat us. The fariners were urged by the De- partinent ef Agriculture at Ottawa te mùke au effort te produce 250,- 000,000 bushels ef wheat. That would bave been nearly 89,000.000 bushèls more than in 1914, or an inerease ef about 55 per cent. But they did a great deal better than that, They raised 336,2-58,000 buahbels, an in- creaeeofl108perecent. Of oats the soil yielded 481,000,000 bushels, an inrneof forty-six per cent.; bar- ley, 50,868,000 bushels, au inerease of tliirty-seven per cent.; rye, 2,478,500 bushels, an increase of 18% per cent. ý flax, 12.604,700 bushels, an inerease o! nearly forty per cent. The total inerease ini these llve grains waa 347,- 777,700 bushels, or sixty-live per cent. In quantity the reet and fodder cr!p were smaller than iu 1914, but their v aleeecrdfng te the figures imusd by the Statistical Bureau, was larger by -\",152,000 than that ef the previons year, being placed at $230, o! wheat was 275.89 buahels ai while in the United States it wi buahels. But it la net lu field crepe that the farmer haa been ben during the paat year. Ilis livu and bis dairy produets have ais productive of more revenue. what that revenue may bo is present aseertainable. But t] ceipts at the eattie markets shoý the fariner is selling more catfl formerly. And a Goverininent ment isaued in July, 1915, s that there were on the tarins o: ada at that turne about 65,000 cattie and 48,361 more horses tl the saine time a year ago. The lateat figuires we have r ing the value et the ]ive stoe1 and slaughtered by the farin, Canada wcre those furnished 1 census of 1911, whieh shewed i of *177,635,000. The figures fer, if attainable, woufld uundonu show a mueh larger total thain $200,000,000 would probably b. in the mark. 'Milk and milk pn were lu 1914 estiuated te have e value of *123,000,000. The va the egga produeed lu the sain\u003c was plaeed at $26,000,0(0 Frein a glance 'at thls brie! mary, -whieh does net inellude ite vaine er and ro, in exeels c",
         "OUR GREAT REVIVAL INTRADE tkre cati We no doubt. For war munitionm a9lone orders te the citent of $U5,00,000 wvere placed by the SlclCommittee. And this does flot inrhlde tiiose- obtainied by private rompanies direct fromn France and Russla the amouint ef whichi ie flot awrrtinable. Altogother about 350 tirais are niow enâzdin manutfatuiring selthe mnonthly eutput of w-hich is 1,100,- (M' 'Thon tiiere are thie orders for huot-; and mooe, elething, and equlliptlnent ot varionls ki.nds, tint onily for the '200. M)0 Canadinn troups muder arms, but aln altiiough te a lasser extent, for the Kuia ai Freneh troops as, wP11 These erders for munitions andi .quipirt have by neo Tirns been, e j»ne.i the . banefitq aeeruiing. to th industries imxn.diately concePrneti. Othpen have b.nleflttedl as9 -Well 'Saniv tx a mnarkesd extent. The steel i dlryis the. most euitatanâing ut thew, Wbier the war broke out the stm industry. owingz prlnecipaily Io the iigcontinuiance et 'buying by the lraiways and the. mantaciturers of agirultural imnpleinentq. was pro- babl7 in a more depressed roendition t.e any etiier of our basic indus- original orders fer shelsq it was tigbt that al sir, requlred for their weuid bave te be im-~ ie acid-made description ng turned eut b 'y any ia. the openi h.artb pro- h.. one emploed ber. ited. bowever, one ut the ies began a eri.a ut ex- thi tii. open hearth steel d an article which wae4 the. British War Offise. [ber larue steel niant ini- ot this devsiupmnent uipon tii. future of tlii stei industry can scarcely b. titiderest imated. The stimnuilus whieh the, ordre for muniiitions lias impartedl ta the mna chiinery indiistry is scareely !eK mark. vd than that upon the, atecl inidustry. Owing te tii. general trade dpres sien. manuifacturere were huinig lit- ic or nu new enpnn.Bsns wasq tiierefore, almost at a stiiideitill as far as mnakers of rmchine tools were, coneened.But wvith tii. advetnt ef oresfor sheila ramie a sudden mud unxpetd demand for machine tools. Within a fe'w mon0tha it hiad becomeri( se great that it 1by far 1ex. eetdthe suppiy. oftadu beinig inactive, as they were eiilýin monthas ago, the mlanulfaictutrer, of machinse tools- are, now being eiployed Io their ntmiost caparity' Aniother lndnetry which ha. b.d lite put into if as; a resuIt ut the Xshehl orders that have ceins te Canadia in that widciy terms(,d thi. woud-working induistry. This romiprises pIaninig mnille, turnitiire faoteries, box fa. terise. And tiie canas et the activ- ity wbieh bas been imparted ta the. wood-working indnaiitry is the denuand for sheil boxes, in tý ii mnufacture of whiebi huindreds et plants in al parteq et the country are buslily emi- pluyed. The. devélepinent ut the. shdllI-box indnstry bas naturafly creat- ed a deinand fer wffld-%verkitg ma- chinery. Befure the. orders for shela were received, Canadla wats withuut zinc and eopper-making industris. Buit tbeir n ybecame su great that within the. Iset tew mentheq thes bave been started( under Gevernmient a tronage. Pla-nts fer making the. high explosives trinitrt\u003clene and nitre- ceilulos bave also been establiaiied. Tii. erdera wMceh have been re- ceived frein the. Canadian, Britsh French, snd Russan Oovernmenty4 for elething, bout. and shos, blaukets. saddlerv. barne\u0026 and ntbe, frmnda uif",
         "THE CANADIAN »MAGAZINE dustries engaged in filliug thei.. For sevoral months many of the plants have been running twenty-four hours a day. This lias i turn reacted upon the. textile industry, whicli, as a re- suit, lias enjoyed a good year's bus- jus. Anotiier f actor which lias lxelped to stimulate the textile industry is the demand whichli as corne to it for miaterials wiiich were formerly in- .ported frem Great Britain, Germany and France by manufacturers of elotiiing. As a matter of faet, there ie pro- bably not an industry in Canada wiiicii is net te smre extent manufac- turing Uines of merchandise for the, supply of wbicii we formerly whoily depended upon the foreign market. That tiie financial and commercial situation, as a combined resuit of the bountiful crope and the. war orders, iq now b.ing strengthened at a rate mueh more rapid than was a year ago thouglit possible, tiiere can be no doubt. In every branch of trade a revival is being experienced. Cer- tain industries are experieneing it to a greater extent than others. But al are siiaring in it to smre extent. To manufacturers in certain lines the improvement lias developed so mucb more rapidly than was expected that they llnd themselves .xperieneing a demand that la greater than tiiey can at the moment supply. Of ail barometers of trade tiiere are none more reliable than the. banik eleariDgs and the. railway earnings. The one is indicative of the, financial paper that i8 passlng tiirough the. banks. The. other indicates tihe mer- chandise that ie being transported to various parts of the. ceuntry. A reading of both barometers shows that a r.inarkable change has taken place ln the. financial and commercial situation during the past f ew months. In September there were reassur- ing signe that the dewnward ten- dency which had cactrzdthe. bank clearings all tihe year had been stayed. By October the. tendency was decidedly upward, the, clearingi ing nearly ten per cent. larger thos. of the corresponding meul 1914. But the November rei wcre significant for two thinga. tii. finit place, they were the, la ever rccordedl in any one mont the hlistory of tiie country, and ii second place they were tirty. per cent. in excess of those of N ber, 1914. The. inecease in the railway i ings during the last couple of m( for which figures are available been even more remarkable than in the. bank clearings. October1 .arnings of the. Canadian Pi Railway were the. largeat. 'with exception, ln the, histery of the pany. The. earnings of the. 0 Trunk and the Canadian Nori during October were aisoe a the. corresponding montii of Earnings in November of al railways were aii.ad of the montE a year ago. Those of the adian Pacifie Railway were se,% per cent. larger than in Nover :1914. Anotiier v.ry good lndicatio the. improvement which ia ti place in the. trade and commeri the country is the mar*.d de. ln tiie number of failures ohrou in October and November. lm former montii the. dec s wns eï per cent. and in the. latter 35.4Iý cent, The. d.velopm.nt whieh his acterlzed the. expert trade is oe the. most remarkable features o, year. Owing ln part te the hqay verse frade 'balance agamast uî have during the. set few yar borrowing abroad te the, .xte about $300,000,000 a year. Wit London market dlosed te us asa of the. war, it was nesar h siiould on the one biand desre»",
         "WAYFARERS W)th Octobecr of the presenit fiscal ycar were s98,604.7021 iiixcs of thec itnporta,, whercas at the end of the, smei peridl in 11 the impilort,; were targer thani thiecxports by near- If titis ratio o! excess, of ex ports 0over imiportq a li ainitained Io thle .udf o!fh flica year, thev balance due Canada abroad biI li ore titani enougli to nicet our intereat indebted- n, wichis etatedt be ]b(- twee *13,000000and $140,000.000. Ifs.it will hoe the flrst tinte in th(, hisbory o! the Doinlion tlint the bal-. sauve of trade in lier favour hws beexi #vcn7 equila! to the interest shec lias, biad to mort on money l\u003eorrc\u003ewed ()ne of the most reaasuring features of the situation is the strength o! Ca n d a's finnciat posit ion. The Mng srtriking proof o! ti4il to lie oeen inu the monthly Governimevnt çttscments regarding the ehartered batiks o!f the Diioniii. Soine mionthsa ago, thev deposits crossedl the billion dollar mlark i they11V are now thte lairgeat liiifthc history o! the countiry. Tho (inl fnc o11th; is thle coui. imd o! fui'' whiolh it f e thr, 1qn) t finiance the, crops nd to) pro. vide acommiiiodation for tlic mainufac, tuirent and mevrchants. lit a timte of buiesrevival if ir eertainly re- assrîg to kniow thint it, will tnt lie retrindfor- wanit of ant adel(quaite supjply of fuinds. Buýt thint whichi iz prbal the hest (mja if o! th sounnessand strcngthi o! thv bainks o! Callnada is thc conidition o! their re\"ources, eodn to recenit state mnents. these are nowv larger than at any tune Mu the hisýtory o! thoi vomi, t ry. To put it ainothesr waY, ther b)anhk9 we(re neyer as well fortifled to stand a strain as thoy are to-day. That Cnaida lias god reason for faeing 191r) with an air o! confidence thiere vean lie no doulit. WAYFARERS BvY MARY SUSANNE EDGAR W AYFARERS we, with faces toward th(, suin. lEager to follow to the glowving west Tiie winding highiway o! the hesrt's lone qtiest; To swerve not from the patin we have lieguin, Ere the far goal o! pilgrimage is won;- To greet the morti, and face thec noonday test, To kindle lives with our Godgiveit best. And share our vision tilt the day la donc. Ah,. friend o! mine, thougi you pas ont o! sighjt, ,%s to flic crest ire venture forth atone, U-pon my path hias streamcd youir irondrous hight; in your etear eyes iny sotil has stead!a.,st grown. I amn convinoed that soineuiere inu the hieilt -We tro mitait meet and know as ire are kno'wn.",
         "FRAGMENTS FROM A MOD POMPEII BY BRITTON B. COOKE P I mention the naine of the. city whee 1I.aw what I amu going to write about, this article will b. \"killed» by a sensor. A first censor iway pas t and a second censer may louve halt of it, but bêfore the lust of that inquisition bas sheathed his bine pencil there will b. nothing left of the story. Canadian readers have heard the nae oft bis city time and time again. In defence of it and in at- ta\u003ccks round about it miany a (Jeu- adian boy bas lost his life. One eoubd ainiot hold this against the city. One mnight b. tempted tosay, WThy shoubd a lad born tbree or four tbousaud miles from here mun straight into the face of death in the. defence of this cltyl What elaim bas it upon Can- adianat But wheu you look yen understand. What became of ail the. people who used to walk up and down these gap- ing strects, laughizig snd giggling, mAlini, 1nva .\"A hnyt,4a41\"4,n are iio babies in the. guttars twirling their moustaches,4 servants giggling, or old wom ing the lace bobbins iu the 1 their houses. Here is a mi: presented by an oecasional 1 two of masonry standing lil in the jaw ofan old man. ýJ rising frein the ruinw makes quiver. This is the. rigour o Every three minutes, 11ke tile a elock on the side of a wail mnan sheil flies overhead, uingi élaborate sirnplicity, as if to the. nature of its errand. «Juat-er-roes this road- quicly as yen ean,» drawls fleer guide. \"Better go ene ai Run if y'ou 11k.! It's a bit C spot, tis cross-road.... body over t»",
         "F'RAGMIENTS FRO'M A MODERN POMPE Il aiiadow of this old wall here.... Tiiat's it. . . .W.l; scein to have CMorn in tirn. for a bit of hiating... .They are pottiing ýem ail over the . . . Siily feilows-whatf juat foilowý mle will y.. lmaybex-able to find a funk-hole if they iru1prove their shooting... uh! Look up! DoVoulSeehimii That's the. Tauibe again. Youl Cntell hum b ii hIleult o! hus winga. 11W.\" right over tbis ,treet now. G et bar.k iBark, C Oet Ii under that bit Of arehway tiil hev's goe... That'a better. Ojraeeful spiral lie did th., wasn't it? Ah! Sýee! Our fel- Ipwa arc fining on humii. Good shoot- ~in U1ood shootingi . . w iith gsmethlng like a iiigh of regret. -Rot- le ituk! Ont o! rainge,. The. arehIway wiiere we tocok refuige wu realIy in a half l deent state of \"air. Tihe wallh4 o! thus partieular buewere atil strong enough to bod up the. roof. but every window Sooa~d heinsde of what had one een a drawing-room was a mere hpa of debris. A gaudy ehandelier hung frorn tiie eelling ail bent aud t\u003cwig.d with the. force of the saine ex- piinthat hall blowu in tiie wln- d msad pitdhid tiie heavy mahog- ay furlture to on. aide of the rooxu. lunder MY foot was a litter of papers, o!o them\u003e scorched and othera *wrivlled by the. unholy cenriouity o! rain wte. Ipcked Up orie-it was mimllg, and yet tuis was part o! the story o! the. ruined elty-and fond that kt vas a caneiled draft ramdraivn on one o! the, forma of thGredit Lyonaise in Paria by a f'ari banker againat one who vas ap- paetly a private banker in this morn Pompeni. It bore the im- -P . -i,.i.w zfnmn oprtifvinu poinited it ont Wo us Iater: a meroe mnark ont the. ground. A third piec. of papier vas appar. ently froti a letter. Tranaslatvd it rend: -. . . . No, ljittle Ma».ý I dIo flot thiink that Ih. freehold of tii. Iiin o! the Arrival of (Inôd Frjcnds iis worth the inooney wbhivh youi aig- ge*st payiing for it. [t wotild not earni the interest. It wvould b. mmciii bot. ter ine. fiou aeSolling youir Amevr- ioan seculrities Wo keep your MOoney ablout you, inil littie aack. There are striange tiiines voing. One ighlt ledaittle mioney, Mariv'a, aif air (these nlamea( I have chne)with tlle man P'olente ia qiiit. flnishcd. 0f course wel aveept Ill. situantion, bnt it maiikvs yaur maother sorry til ser Marie so sttubbor», for we hevar that Pui ente was a good mian, a very littie drinker, and able Wo ruie Mfarie's trn- per-wiiehyoui will uinderstand is most rlportnt-thouigii of course thant is not a reeoniendat ion o! tii. man Poulente whioii your niotiier or 1 would venture to mention Wo our Marie . . . .' I3eside this letter ia a bill frovi a dres.saker-a dres for Marie pao- sibly-and on tlie bottora, lu thii .e hiand-writing that aecepted tii. Pariai draft, is a note, Tudi-. me dire ce que c'est que celal\"-an item- laed aeeouint,. plea.se! There ia a baby'.; rattie made of oeliuloid and partly broken by a aplinter of -,petit ahrapnel that Stili lies besRide the. rattie. Iler. la a pair o! iieat-warped curling togs Marie's f Wiiere la Marie? Ta ah. atiil so stubbornl Where la the mian Foulent.? Is Marie, in spite o! ber stuibbornnea, aee(retly weeplug for lm becaus h la ast the Nvar? 'Wbere isfirfatiier? }Iow doesheclive now that bis eomfortable bunss ia gonet Ts heoune- o! tiiose people une meets living lu Gower Street boardlng- bouses on one meal a day and a six- ponny cake éked ont wlth a bottl. of Cauary sac bought at the corner gro- ery t A dance oardi A abl's rattle! A",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE wonnsfirst aid to presentabilityl A shrewd business man talking Wo lus son-I think it was him son- about the freehold of the Inn of the Arrival of Friends? And Marie! What of lier? Is it a flicker of amusement that seemai Wo lighit the duil face of the street? Was that a ryniead smile? Did a womnan just go ini at yonder doorway? laI the Wown really dead or only holdinig its breath and pre- tendinig Empilty-eyed,( and rigid it stares at the aky. The smile was the aiiadow of a eloudf tripping lightly aceros the sky. The wornan's figure inerely a mhred of a garment eaught montha ago on the. aide o! the door fron smre frightened refugee's ap- paroi aud now blown grotesquely about by tiie breeze. Af!ter a time the. Taube satisfied his euriosity about the. street we were ln aud salled on Wo other parts o! hi. beat. '\u003cD'ye know w'ot we caU.s 'im t» .aid a sentry Wo whoni we ventured a remark as we passed. \"'E's Old Copper Beily Jac~k. That's w'ot we oelis 'lin. Y' eawn't mike the copper awt naow beesuse 'e's flying levil. But w'en 'e tilts agin the suni y' can seo the. béily o! 'is machine is red and shiny. 'Eisn't abad ort either. 'E spots usand we spots 'im, and its all fair flghtin'. I think, sir, 'Vi. a mar- ried man, air, bi the. wye ho drives. Tes, sir\"-with a wink-«very reck- less-like. I reekon he don't care mucii, sir?' Some o! our party having more courage and less responsibility ini Canada went to the very centre o! tiie desolation and pieced up souv- enirs o! a certain famnous building. Others iiad a less exciting-.but not ultogetiier danger-proof-returu to the autornobile.%. Blessed bo big au- tomobiles. They look like a shelter from whiz-bangs wiiether tiiey are or zîot-ehiefiy not. Froin the. runnîng board, with glammes, we had a long stare at a certain section of the front line tronches. The. nsaa two lines o! sand bag-s ini a deserted field- casional savago flash, a Ch amnoke and a far-off roar! le stands at the mlost imji cross-road in this town. Ci town graveyard if y ou prefer. delinieate the four sides o! tii, On two sides are Germians. T'ý whiere this sentry stands i. on Germnan maps-we know th- acroplane maps we have capt and one o! these days two bue -will be pliced in the miiddla cross-road just to block w] traffie might happen to pa\u0026 This is certain Wo happen. an( it does happen this sentxry mnate will report for duty soin out o! the ken o! humnan bein1 lie arrives there at the end short beat, wheels right-about ly, and tramps witii a crisp e o! heels Wo the other end. Se( eoming he challenges, sud thet together, iiead up, brings hi down from the. alopo sud sla other hand acrosa his bres against the flat o! the barrel. eyes I suspect hlm of a lîfe o! day night riota aomnewiere b the past. I doubt ifie can s ho eau swear-if iudeed h. o\u0026 at ail-and 1 cannot bc cortai ho was always polite Wo hua *11 h. do.. bis trick here like a man. Nover a nervous glane sky. Never afalter in his stoj he hears a big shell slobbn the, aky and kuows it lsas HlI drop beside hlm as not. Ti your bat Wo hlm, ýMr. Employe \"fired\" hixu once for figiiting i: shlpping-room. Three men d the sme spot last week and sme job be now holds with sui nlty. But when you have a, ledged your debt-hurry. H. on the hottest spot Wo bc foi twenty miles tis very day. _W. were golng along a 1 street on our way back Wo the.ai bile wiieu three whiz-baings ai so, close Wo us that oîur guideêi",
         "FRAGMNTS ROM A MODERN P1OMPEIT weal soldiers are, fot supposcd in the mind u! fiction readers to d1o, bult what a good soldier always ducs when) lie eail: lie touk shelter. \\We ,ourried in thronigh a toppling door. way v ad half feill hait rail down a stairway into what looked like al rnlneid cellar. \"C.heer-O !» shoutoid a strange voic, asw arrived ']l a sort (if hall at the far end of the cellar fromn the stairs; \"I uay-yon are al morry lot. What's up? '\u003cAh! Beg pardon,\" explaiuied our gij dlmcuvering that, we were in the premence of airnother officer, and on who apparently eceised somev \"r of doujinion over the cellar- .Apw intrudliigVý' \"lntrifding thling.,\" retorted our yciunteer host. \"Whait's iup? Seme xtrffing lipabv? \"\u003cA little,- said the guide, \"I tbiuk W.e over nov'. We'll lie going. Thanks awfully.» \"No, . ally! Doui't go. 1 say .1 furning. «I1 say. Williams, Wil-. l.is Williams' are yon there? »amu that man! What'll you have io drink? l'Il get it myvseif.» Williams, the batmnai, Showed bais fa\", in the dloor. '4Wbat have yeni got\" 1» sked his sueir offleer. \"Tewhlskey is gene, sir. Sorry. oir, Therels wine, sir. A littie of the rd V, '\u003cToali have te drink ted wiue»' reported our host, \"aud you won't get glams. either. Sit dowu !» Ws bad tumbled thus l'y accident inothe dwelling-place ot three yoiuug ofceswho4preferred to live here in bac t thé qater region beyond the bondarpsof the city. The place W\u0026C furnWahed with the wreekage ut .»etd and splintered in spots and nomeimeqheld together l'y bits of trng and wlre. There waa a car- ;t o thefloor aud an empty eight- een-olinercartridge hung l'y a -lecnl liv-ii' hr og7 ur our guiide. -Months.\" \"Wîtarc, you T\" \"ll oe'tyu heardl of u1S? We're the utlr-oak because we. ruistietnhr out of fallen hoiisca and huild barricades of 'cm.- t* lVa bcaly c 1a nalie, but it7s, casier than our roguIar, unv, -and fie gave ilt proper naine. ai thing 1 daro nlot do) in this atce Byv-and-by his red wvint, vame andl sorne tall thirk andi, whulo enamnel mugis. Wc sipe lit wine aud we heard thlt story uf lite in a cellar iii \u003c'Pomeil\".The detaila etf the oqui1,. ment don*t niter exeept pe(riilsi respect to the- building (it a bath iu the cellar. It was easy cuonigl te get a tubl fromn a ruiiied house suld casier te flnd %vater. Buit thev real toucli ot luxury came whlen a smnall elctrie suction puimp was dixcovered and ,onnected with the electrie wireý -of whieh and its mysteries more ainon. \"You se,\" exclaimed the Ruistler, \"nov' that it\u003es fixed 1 go inte myv bath and Williamsq sets the muter runniiing. with the suction end ot the apparatus iu our big hot wtcer caffldron iu the kiteben. When the bath la sufficient- Iy filled with hot water I ilieut, sud lie changes the aneker into the cold water canîldron. I shout agzalu wheul I have enouigh, aud then-when I've fiuished-we reverse theý pumnp, and pumpni the water out into the guttter of the street.? \"Býut wheueie the eleetrie-Ity \" sit.- fed our gidfe, who was l'y way of lie- iug an eutertainiug stoy-cllr lm self sund ebiviouidy disliked poor tecli. nique. «Whenec the, elertrleity. old Tep?1\" \"LeookI\" saidl our host, sud] tand- iug up tuirned ou a Tuingeteni lamp over our headg, -Love o! hieaven 1\" whispcred eut guide. \"beyý the devil did youi get that V' «Rush ! There is a power station as yeu n uw iu the tewn $ust over",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE behinti our gooti friend the enemy's lines? t 11 or wvhy we do flot knew, but this rnueh is certain-\" andi h. elicketi the. light off. \"I su2ppose tis city once got its light fromn the. otiier ocnel» \"Precisely. Andi atili gets-a lit- tIe.» There vas one day a strange sigiit iu this littie tovu. Down the long deserteti street came ten littie uns in black, looking to riglit, Iooking to left, fbir signe of their old habitation, their heels elicking on the cobbles. It vas disoovered still standing, tiicugh in bati shape, andi the, nuns were pro- ceeding toward it viien a sheli burst betwern tiier andi the olti nunnery. A second aud a third folloeet, anti the frighted women cowered inl a door-way, kneeling. It vas thus on. of the, three offi- cers founti tiiem andi led thcrn te the cellar snuggery. 4irbay hati corne, y' know, to res- eue smre of tiieir things frorn tiie nunnery,\" explainei our host. \"One of the. isters hati Iefh a piece of lace she vas rnaking for a bride, aud an- Chier hati lest tiie only pieture of lier mother. Eaeh hati corne back to get smre littie thing ont of the. place. Peci, little women. W. gave tiier smre tes. That buelted 'ern friglit- fully. Tii.» tvc ef thie otiier ebaps aud Williams iiere-they weut over te the littie old nunnery andi lisheti out smre trilles-tii best tiiey coulti get, and iirougiit 'cm back te the. nan. Poor littie thinga. Tiiey ver. frighitfiilly bucked. F'rigiitfully vance wore the blessiug r neck. If it vas not effectiv shrapnel, it vas effective ways. As w. stood on a bill ov, tii. desolate towu we thougi last story we hati heard c it. It runs lik. this: Down this very hill oee fore tiie Gerrnans hati bprnbî town, rode a \u003cJanadian on le hati heard of an estaminý one miglit get a decent dr the. estaminet, acting as pri the. sitar of botties, li. fouud wiio cash upon iiim a \"f 8 eye\"'. She gave him vinei ah. cooketi ii chicken andi back ho his «pig.ry» net fresheti, but resolvedti o r, iieapitallty. Witii mucli intriguing fi with rnany runnings back a of rnescugers betwixt the and the. «piggeriea,\" it vas that on a certain afternoeu adian and two offleer friei\u003c arrive ah thie estaminet w gocti things ho eat anti to di foodi vas already beeoming i tii. town-as they couli col] widowvwasto briug inbe marrieti sisters andi, fer el the. curé. \"Wll,» said the Canadli whom 1 have the. story,, \"w TMW] witii I lesi left vit their '9 aihtt1e wMp n",
         "AUTUMN S17NSTT threo Iiiindred( yards away. The os- tiojet ieoked sale enouigb, but I sa te myself: 4This is no place, for a party,' and 1 turnied baek, ridfing k..a strioak. eas hng eegt tin bottrr The-re wasri't a soul iii oil on t'ie whole mainste. 111 heard later whlat happeined to thi otherS. Bill, of thle lie h rame altrr 1 had left, I uea and gta sbrapniel splinter in bis le! t airm - 14 dec(ided it wan' ealthy either. Marston, tho third vIbapi, lie, mlrvpÉ after Bil-late as usual, Al b. voiul get was a pig freil a fairier pvidsom7rebheer. Ile bad laidbisbhot- tle% inqide thop Pig and the plig on1 big pack-honse. When the thir-d manii -Puddin' we cail him--got thiere th gh.iing b.d stopped for supper tie. so he rode utraiglit up te the paaminet.Y we sait]. suppiyig the do- siredl pause. -Ile fonnd tit mat anicesd cmnystili stIand41ilg and the bot- tics on th1w littie bar ail iniiordeir- but thýat was ai. The- humour et the thing took Puiddiin' oýTff is fret, anid he left bis card on thev xnantf-1 fil te wçidow?\"« \"She andc moa),t of thlt tewnaoýfeý1k lhad eseapetjd. WVe beard o)f lier up -way. Slie aid bier atrsliad pited cmpi iii a deete arin houise, tenover themngeet and airi alread1y layving the, foundi(a- tions of :t fortune 1eiling grill la oee eif our blrigad baduates It will hpc bard to prove whlo ownz thatl tarin bouse when thc war is inver, and the orgnlownevr cornles baIk Io vaimi AUTUMN SUNSET Bv ART14UR L. PHELPS PlI evnin wilethecolurglowed Rnd spread, The whieii eternially inconipetent 19 band of mni te iimitate, was bredl Sone yearning spirit only haIt suppresmed. The vast and cloudy pageant of the sky, A boet freisomoe atrango caravanserai, That swayed i crimmson, going dewn the wPst, Btirred me. A great and silent lonieliness Smote in my heart ita lever of affriglit, A dumb fear grow, and ail the ûhapen mniglit Of solemua grandeur mnade it more, net less. Seezned that brusbed by mne. pausing very near. The awtul cortege of the stricion year.",
         "THE R'EAL STRATHCONA VIJ.-A PRINCE OF BENEFACT1ORS BY DR. GEORGE BRYCE pERHIAPS4 nothing was so re- markable in the career of Don- ald A. Smnith as that after spending thirty yeare in the forma- tive pcriod of hie life in the wilder- nes lie shiould with the utmost facility enter into the highly organized s0- ciety of city and national 111e. The young maxi of the wilds of Hudson Bay, Ungava, and Labrador was a natural-born civilian and courtioe. Ilc had withal a strong sense of obligation and of hie duty to the most hiighly organized life interest as cmn- bodied in education, religion, charity, and culture. Ile was a most gener- oue participant in every phase of in- prevement in the youxig society of Winnipeg. Hoe wau at that early turne, jifdged by present-day standards, not a rieli mani. Ue exicroadxed seriously on his Labrador savings in hie early western life. lI xewly organizcd coxnmurn- tics pereonial benevolence le thc only merana of advancement and progress. The writcr ivho in 1871 was charg- cd withi pioncer work in education i Winnipeg remembers well the first enhecriptioxi rceived froin the Coin- missioner in bis offlce ini Old Fort Garry. Strange to aay it was in con- nection with what was afterwards one of hie hobbiee-thc education of vornen. Whlle the writer\u003es ebief business was supplying educatioxi for youxig mcen, be eoughit at the. saine tinte t, provlde ixi a humble way for that of girls and Young women iii W So a eaUl was mnade upoxi Dc li hie office to head his sube list. The Commissioner hesitation began the list V sterling, for at that time, wl. shortly after the transfer to sterling money was still ued River Settlement. Uce thexi cd: \u003c'Professor, always tûke y seriptions lin pounids sterling dIo-es flot seem so big, you kno dollars, and le more eaaily go Donald A. Smith was in member of the first MaNfnitoba Board, and was the only othui ixig meniber besides the w that first B3oard at the tlim death ln 1914. His gifts to loge 'were numerous. lie ; the first $500 to begixi the Lat of Manitoba College, whkch firet \u003cchemical college tabori Western Canada. He contril the new Manitoba College Bli[ which the -Marquis of Lorne corner stone i 1881. Hie was a constant doxior to movemente for social, athlet educational advances. XI lat, lie gave to the writer as Chaiý the FaciultY Of Science in t versity of Manitoba the. tirn of $20,000 to organize, the. Other colleges anid bexiev\u003clet tions were objecte of his bouý were helped by lm before",
         "TIIE REAL STRATUCONA of Wimiipeg rec(-eivedl fromn imi $10O0(o) toward ther ereilion of their Mdnebuildinig. 1118 bounfty t~o _hrhmof different denomixiations wu notable. île neyer inade his giftaq inadioeriiniatelyv. In reading hise la-~ borate will, one . stsruck by the very, wld.e poeion of his lands ili the Rsdi River Valley. Ilie Ilidsoni's Bay Comipany AMsociations no doubt ap- eolint for thlis. MIany and many a e-huréh, and that of different dIenioiin- jutions in the nerighblouirhoodl of thes lands. la known to the writer, whenl being built, rebuilt, enlarged or rraored tr have received \"Donald A'ýs eontribuition sent proitnptly and Whil. Lord Strathicona'N national- it precludled hlm from any charge (fwastlng his money. yet ini hie giv-. ingx hi. tuste, old. connection or ns- tilil asuociation larRely dominated him. The. St. Andrewls Soecety, the Cao-onangatheringe. aud particui- laly the -Roaring Gaine» of cuirling newe taild Wo be remembriered. As iliffratveof his kindues,3 and re- meimbranee of old finondg, Donald A. st rqgularly about Christmnas timne 7p t. the venir o! his deatb a brace rfphesnts. in eold storage, to thé, writer and Parti of about a d\u003cmen old nlweates in Winnipeg, from bis Brit- ix Mates in token of hi: romem- bMne o! tho \"«old days, the \"041 mmoie-;.an sd the «old associations\". Ili het never became hardened by hi* wralth. One of t»e distinctive fields in ,wie Lord Strathcona deligbted Wo cýjPgsand umiveraities. Though not * eg-rcd( man, hoe nevertheless ha a prnfound admiration for learu- ic ad loarnod mon. As vas vcry n\u0026ua ho took a gTeat intercet la the ,rit o! hi. largest reuldeuce-M.Non- -rai For years its C}hancellor. b Gl 1nivorsity rereived xeany tok- dSl.joinlng with hilm la a fredrivalry, led Wo great things b.n de for Montreal's favou-rite colg. It -as flttinig thiat after Lord trtcasdeaein 1!914 ,ir Wiilliamii shouild suceced hiilm as Chail- pefaled moetstonl fo Lord Strath.- \\%a as thc me ilodpa rtTient. hit he ooke'd u1pon a-; a . iee of humnan suffering. Ile gave MGl ifs heautifull niew meiidieal bu1ildingt ait a vost of hal! ai million of donllatrs. and ailso cndowe'd the two meiarhaire of 'lygiene atud Ptogvwith i0 000 veh. Tt le notable that the, MdalResearehl Smoiety ini Loidon,ý Englandf, houged neoar RueiýseliSuae o! wicvh he waes for years liresident and benefeetor, shouild iik1ewi'ýo ow his strong sympathyv for siff erilng humaiizriityv, as did also hie «egav o! a thousand gineafis fo Dr. Pasteuir.Te euli ati on of Lord 'St rathen\u003e bouinty vad -.vtipallhy lu this direc- tion lis seen in his Ieavlng ain addi- tionial half million dollairs lu hie wvill to the Royal Victoria lloitnl, whieh had reeeived a liko suin frein hlim vhen years bof ore hif rollabor- ated with hisencusin Lord Motiit Stepheni in buildling the hospital for- the city of Miontreal. Hli. devotion Wn the cauise of edii- cating women le in sonie, respets the Most complote and ne'eful monumeont whiplh he left behind. This la cmi- bodied lu the beautifuil building lu the ueighbouirhoo\u003ed o! MecGiII Uni- versity, Mfontrea1. knowu as the Royal Victoria Colg.lu this building thc %vomen stuidents of MeGilI Univers-ity, froxa a comnpeteut staff recePive thelr training for obtainlng uiniversity dle- grecs. Thtis promineut rite an(d the building ereeted upon it vas; gipplied nt a coot of lk4f0.0M0. and la hie vill Lord Stratheona Ifeft an additioual million dollars for thîis pet o! bis fancy-sonetimps knowvn as Donalda Collegre. Tt ývas also littlng thait Ilis Lordahip left Wo hie friend Principal Poterson o! the University a lcgIaey of £1,000 sterling. Tt i la bt mest toi state that in the bealthy competition betveen the preut aud past chan-",
         "TIIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE cellors, Sir William Macdonald bas t.\u003e hi. credit severâl of the grandest buildings of the university and aise the magnificent Agrivuitural College at Ste. Anne de Bellevue. That sympathy for ignorant or mnfferiug humauity was one of the chief motives of Lord Stratheona's life is seen by gifts bestewed net only in bis own native land but iu foreign lanids as well. Tri 1906 he sent $10,- 000 t.\u003e the Ssai Francisco sufferers; in 1912 $5,000 for assistance to the sur- vivons of thie Titanic wbe belonged to tbe IUited States. In 1913 he forwarded fOvo tbonsand dollars te the. sufferers in lie Ohio fleeds. These are but exampies of a con- linuons flow of sympatby for unfei,- tunate bumauity. In bis will we id entries uimply typical of scores et Cheirs, as LeancÈoil l ospitad, iu bis native town of Ferres et $50,000; Lo ndon Hlospital $40,000. Mention ba been made et bis great gift for universily education and general knowledge, ebiefly in Mou- treal, but Lord Strathcona was aise mxoet cosmopolitan iu bis gift. As much of biq wealtb came frain invest- ,mont in tb. United States ho as feeinge in dutv bound left $500,000 To those wbo had been 1 secretarieq and faithtul emr ceived iu most cases the stm each, ani te a large bodý tives and friends hktndsnx iu the shape of animal r, were devised. Ife forgs debts. To the nation bis est ly left te bis fauiily will gi large legacy duty. iu finsq cie. the total amouint of th( mnade ont te be *28,000,001 a portion of this may depel valuation of bis Canadian It was certain that eue s fui, se noted, and se influent not escape the longue of si, is easy te say that human fi net properly arrangedj te possible-and indeed we iii wheu ail ha. been ehtained for a compauy's clerk le ao three quarter. of a cei enormens a fortiune. To t s4peak thus il gives smre eC teouw tbat besoe) lu makiug bumauity more lu more happy, sud more eor. The list of donations g i.gacies lotit suggest that I Smnith was a thougbtful, Wyi Smith lent rnoney telit erument offcials, yonng ities, aud even thase ofhih earrying ont bis plans.",
         "THE REAL 'STRAT11CONA the d.,bt. Donald A. repllcd: \"No! J gave that to youi young Men to help ymi. you can have the mnoney m8 long as you noed iL Youi Van follow what.. evwr poliey you think rigbt. 1 gave it t. yeni to help you. not. to coere yen?'\" Tie. debt reinained unpaidJ for ..voral yeara. Mr. P., niow a well- knwn Cmaadian, d.lrdDonald A. t. b.e p.-rfeitly honiourable, (b) Another alander la thatt he tri.d ta buly up The Globe newqpaper by goie t th prc\u003eprietor's widow inEiburgh. She, it waa .aid,. re- fu\" with scorn, thouli strongly »olaltdf, ta mell ont. The finanicial a .no The Globe told the writer thtthhR waa4 nonsense. for at thle tinie piyt of thé- stock rold at, that time bg ojht at a large discount. The Mor ixuntru. We The. charge ws made that h.e lent mncyte politicians Iikely to be- -en cabie ministers te influence thpir votes on his railway achares. Thp w$rter bias informiation from the. hilthet authoicrlty that it was net the inetino his party te give the im- Patat office to tiie Persan cencern- e1. Thé- ataternent la a fiction. (d) The staternent that Donald A. paed te lake, advantage of the. Duteli bondiiolderq of the Mýinneiisotat Rsalway was delared to the. writ.r by another director o! thkit railway to bie absollutely luntrue. (e\u003e A frequeni(tly repeated repre. sentation, inadein shady cornera,.4 tht bribery, corruption and1 gener-al mi- trustwýorthlneuý- in Canadian public l!.e W58s broiiglit abolit by Donald A. Srihsmaliguilune i. not gcn- erailly belicved, la unproved. andlto the mind of tiie writer is imprimable. (f) Th(- rviteratedl charge, o! Doun aid A. pietured a; a feroelous wild hea4t, reesdy te a.pringz on uitnwary fin- anciul vicýtimal, lu publie and bsns lil!, Ili# wvriter la in a positin tn de- clare ridiculouas a bslu]l un- The %writer would ask, Is it pas- sible. or even probable thait a mani se large lu his benievolence-i, so broadl ir bis sympathies, se pitifull ta the uick or unfertuinate. se anxilus to prom-~ oe eductatien and clharlty. se ab- solutely puire, temperate, and dome- tic lu his life (-eul(] he other than a klnd, eonsiderate and hlgh,-mnlet man ? Tii, writer. as hia intilate frl.nd, denies,. sncb a poslbility witli th,,lit- most sern.",
         "WHAT'S IN A NAME? BY ISABEL SKELTON T11E lit of guests at a large civic receptien bringa home te one the mnultiplicity and variety ef naies one's fellow-citizens bear. Where did thiey get these naines? Uiad thiey ever any mneaningi Was there once a tiine when -,%r. Long was rcally tall, whien Mr. White was fair, when neiglibour Gull's reputation was less enviable titan Goodfellow's, and when Oosling, Peascod, and Bull were mnore likely te be elosely conneeted with agrictiltural interests titan they are to-day?1 Oniy happy accident ever mnakes a naine ln the twentieth century de- scriptive ef its bearer. Yet when it happens, with what joy we seize on suha fitness. In election campaignas, for example, what an asset fer the candidate is a naine whieh bears an honourabla interpretation. How quick- ly his frienda will preclajini it an un- deniable pledge for ail that le good ln character, while on the Cther hand his opponents wll as readily inake hostile use ef it if it iinplies or they eau inake it imply aeuiething mean or bad. Lt is liard for us te free ourselves frein the feeling that naines sheuld be significant. Unconselensly a mus- ieal naine with aesciations ef eredit and charin predispeses us in faveur of a persen, while a harsh or gro- tesque one as surely discourages sudit expectatione. Tt is provex1,îally true tlxat a bad naine bringe a dog te an evil end, while a good oue 'will soe- turnes help him over a utile. Yet, be a man's naine what it wiil, lie resents deeply any tamp it. Lt muet net bie mis-iý nuispronouniced. Aitheugli ne longer te othiers as desc hlm, lie values it highly ai leoin fron the past whill in. turn te hiand down te hi ants with adided lustre. A when understeed, la a recoe ily history more or less brii are the things it xuay tell ui gliinpses into the past it: One man's naine recais tionality of hie aneesters French, .English. Anothai mucli liglit on the trades au et days gene b\u003e'. What j mnedical lore and histor\u003e' i b\u003e' the naine Leach., The Leacht was unquestiouably clan who eured ail humawlt bleeding with the aid et his tee eager assistant. Again, Moweher must have beau f rein an aneestor who cree arnazernent in hie village garding the primitive metho ing hie noie, and usiug mou choir. Again a third m may praserve frein eblivior standing physiesd or moral istic et hie meut important f Sucli naines are Merry, Mas Arm\u003estrong, Croekshanks, (crooked noee'. DeninçAv 1,",
         "WHIAT*S IN A NAME? ben pthe earthit i murprising to ecal fr ow many no murname wu necary te distingulali a mn. The. Book of Comnion Prayer, pub- lfahed but êhree and a haif centuries \u0026g, recogniues none. The. baptim ad marriage services know but one nan. It is impossible to fix the. date whe mien were born with a naine s with a shadow. The customn stole up- on thein b\u003e- ver\u003e- slow degrees, it migt alinost b. ..id te have over- ute the manooity unawares, su grdully diti m.rely personal naines he om rystallized into hereditar\u003e- eurarnes. Between the. eleventh and sixteenti centuries our modern no- melature etablimiied itsélf in the. mor populouz and cîvilized Eure- pesoceties. It began with the. »Oiiywho lu thie tenth andi .Ieventh th citlscn* in the. sme way proud\u003e- sdoptlng the naines of their trades. ,A weLlk-nown autiiority gays: «There wa uc greater propriet\u003e- ln mak- in the. naines of occupations station- ar faily\u003e naines than appeared at firg sit; for tie samne trade was 0fUen pursued for many geiierations by te decendntsof the. individual nearly ailnititi or iron-founders an t is nlot imaprobable that the. busi- ,-t in the tirteenth or fourteeutii need andi remaineti exceptions te the. general ruis. Icelinil, a lat. as 1861, knew not a fainily naine. Every mn was known b\u003e- i permunal deslgus- tiensanduathe son ofiisfather. Mir. liaring-4)ould says, «To the presont day, ini the. western hbills of Yorksire, the. people know thernsilves and are known arnong their eonradem b\u003e- their descent. A mnan la John a' Jake'a a' 11al'as, andi a woman la 'Mary a' Tom's a' Bili's. Shotild tiiere have been a moral slip, it is flot forgotten; it laq duly repremsnte-d as4 Toc a' Tom'a a' Our most iumeroug clus of naines, patronyrnics, were lu thelr earli.r forme and usges eloml\u003e- akin to mast mueli a methoti of deuignstion as this Yorkshire one. It la the. rare man to- day wiio unakes a naine for himmeif, an in the. gooti old daya the. rank andti le of our ancators iad the. saine difticulty ln distlngulaing thein. selve eato îe-ofern dege. Tii.\u003e were simpl\u003e- the. clourleu somno of tlueir fatiiers andi vere nameti ae- cordinl: Thooen, Johnson, Jack- sonWil\u0026n, nd te lke. As these naines are apéileti nov ther, lbas been a ]ose, for the. original fom vas Thomas-hs-mu John-hi-mon, Wl- iiam-his-son. A furtiier ablireviation la foun in uc ueli s as Johns, Jacks, where mere\u003e- the «s\" of the. possive es reniains. In naine .nding in «s\" even thia la droppeti: Francis, James. Charles. tainheati. On. lias on)\u003e- to eeme selves to pet naines andi diminutives andi that our aneestors ver. ver\u003e- fer- til, ln devising ways o! treating them mu. Tihe exigeny of the casenmade theun do it When several nigibours were ealleti John, and o*lJohn, it beetaute abe\u003coltitely neoesary te vary the label of soins of theun te Jaek andi Ian. Tey oeie added inst\"",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Marcock (Mark) ; Simpkin and Sin- cox (Simon); Lamabkin (Lambert), aund Taneock (Daniel), Tonikin, Jef- cock (Geoffrey) ; Perkinis (Peter), aud Htitchcock (Richard). These are a few êx*zuples of surniames to-day which prt(scrve these old Saxon di- iuinutives. Again, the Normian et or ot, en or on, provided another means for rlnging tihe changea on the sanie naines, and they, too, have given us mny desceendants: »ancet (Daniel), Gillot and GJillet (Giles), Gobbett (Godbert), Ellet and Elliot (Elias), Tixumins (Timotlxy), Gibbon (Gil- bert), and Luxon (Luke). There is apt t o nnticertainty about the on suffix, for in mnany naines it sceems impossible to decide whether or flot it is a part of tixe usual patronynie SOL. Tii. relation of sonship could also be variously expressed. Among the Angl-Saxons and Scandinaviaa tixe sufi ting meant sonship. Thus Job- son and Jobling are both sons of Job, and Godding (Godwin), Gibbings (Gilbert), Tapling (Thomxas), and Willings (William), are sixuilar for- mations. In Wales ap signified the son of. This form lias been much eorrupted, as tihe following exainples show: B3arth (ap -Arthur), I3ryee (ap Uice), Bowen (ap O\u003ewen), Prodger (ap Roger), lrobyn (ap Robin), Prichard (ap Richiard). 0'ui Ireland, and Mlf4c or Me in Scotland and Ireland, were the equiv- ailent of the Welsh av,. So evident son 01 Ille paIreb, son of tii. abbot. o! GlCendlockart, bl between 1150 ai1 (aetually Mýac-gii the. servant of J( The Norinan was yet afifth w-, ship. There is a of this: When]1 marry the wealthy- hein Baron Fitzllamon to has i son, Robert of Gloucester, fully replied: \"lIt were to nie a mnigbty ehl To havfe a lord withouteui hie And thereuxpon Hlenry ga, surname o! Fitzroy. It ia interesting te noti large unxher of faxnily sometimes deduced £romu o Christian naine by the ditl binations and pernutatio foregoing prefixesand suml t*ake Robert, for example, fewer than the followin b'oua fide names in variotu Bobbett, Bobbin, Bobby, E kmn, Dobson, Dobb, Dobbi Dobbins, Dobbinson, DebU Hobb, Hobbes, Hobbinu HEobba, Hobby, Ulobkins, Hoby, Habkin, Hlobkings, Hopkinson, Probert, P'robý Robart-s, Robb, Robbens, R~ bins, Robertson, Robert, Roberthail, Robertshaw, Robeson, Robinga, Robin. son, Robison, Robjohu, Roblin, Robshaw, Robson, 1 be the following naines an rivitivea are fairer examp] formations: Alexander givi derson, Saunders, Alkey, MeAlister and Palister; for his descendants Harris flawson, Hawkins, Hais Haflet, H1aiket, Hacet, ?arry, flarrixuan (servant Hail; John is father o! Jol son, Jenkins. Evans. Heai Le great belong",
         "WUTSIN A NAME? vus En Ille days of feuidalisin in Europe that sunnamiiies, were genleraflly adoptedl. This systeini filtered through 1h.e wbole social fabie fromn the cmi- peror on his thronec to the porter at the gate of tire humiiblust mianor. Tho rankih and officiais bwenthose ox- tr.moes wero, lgiun aid with very kcw .zceplis aret COMIMemlralt'il in our tw.n tieth.i ceit ury noecltre ix a pleasanit paistimeg for al deinocra- tir peleI te .oiideigr Ilow nliany of thvir pre-senlt hiighest, Solnding tities %pralg frem11 these h\u003ewlyv offices. Tlii Stuiarts or 'Stewarls were in lb. bginintg the keeso hi te;(rs r4 h ai t graduially rose in ranik upltil dtey becarie the chief ef- inee lis hli ousebIoldt. Anist cil ]y aious bratioh werec thle liered(itary Stwrsof tlle Crown etofln fT.i Marshalls wvere the sal-ep m-r wboe m'w tg) the (-urry-,oinig of th. borsoe.. Tiie Chai berlis were the moaet initimiate servants iii thIe seig- tiraclibouse. Ther surnamie Chani- I*,rf aise voiries f romn Ibis offie. lBlow- rr aird Ilonimian are ecndtao! file man wheo at a chas., callcd the 40 t together. lae and Claver. have for Ibecir fore-fathier fiec day- lner or keepeýr of thet ke*y s. Buitier, (la rer. Cook re, Faleonier (aise FaIknpr, Faulconer. Faukn-ier, andt Patieonefr). Hlarper, Napp)ler (aise Napier and Knlappr)r, Parker, Shir- hff. Blabler, and U1siier are furtiier ex- a11ples o! Ibis rime Mu lifeý and inde- Promn these retainers of fcuidallsmi jet li turn tg) thie freebonn, prosper- , udunepndn craflamein of the toiw\u0026 In tis q. o imaehinery w are npiIol forgel the. pride ie look ini their tradles and handiicai(tsat fou oir 'ive bundiired years airg. The tralle guiilds of miedisaval Euirope were importantad imnposinig organiza- tin. Eveiy tourist bas gaunied soine dlim ides o! their formier einiiiienre an, mçrnfienee frein lhe Guild I a!l o Bruse]s and othier Buirepea.n lutes I iese the master-s o! tih. cil te deteriiiiii, all muatteýrs affeetig thiiitreats of theiir indusiry. Eacb trade mighit bave been ealledl al dose, corporation, Thiere was nei climbung ove.r ther wall imb i it l old ho eri- tere-d only Ilbroigl Ille dooir of long ani worthiy appreubtieaiuip. Natur-al- ly wiat. wzLS uo ihard Io wun was Iligb- lY pniied. Mcii emteredtir brade. There %% ert nei Jauks uf ail tradcos. Lot uis otcaorigte Mr. S. Kar- ig-Couldi lIow nay pvlis wbo hiave tlseidnt alkun1g Ili eartbi te-day, we ried t ouvr al fIeece o!î woogl jito aSuit o! e1lthe ini ye olden limes: - 1 bbc 1 î ., place, whclin a farier hiad woo-ml te sg-li, tii. pakrwa sent fo r, b4 faýSte il 1 and weighit. These,ý wcre then-i c(ni- siguied to Ilic tpl whe lo c or, sorte the weo 1 1 iw A fler 1tc sort1ig Ui1 0wo got-a te b11c mili- bhooutgly scnre and dried. Thte coubin)rg portion is vonilttcdi te flic coinber, angi on leaiiug hlgl rieady for- the Spunner. whe in lunu p Ihe spuin wool oir wvorstedg,, Io theo wvarper, Io ho inad. it siiitale lgthus. . , . The wirp la is îîo rea dy for Ille wcaver, or wbeo wesewbo bsil pnt iiii is bue The, short wool latae froni lte sort- er 10 tlle wvillayv, and it lu, then oue and givenl te tii. carder, wbon combsý it. IV Icaves bis bands iii the. in o! a rope, and patsses t)le b. mul- spirner. . . . On bc-ing tugt eut et UlIt leom, tlic clehhi la fira burled. anid iis burling i lonc byv the fuler, N\\bo wabsit wîbhtl soap) andig places, il ii the socks wher, iVla P amce tilt it link te Ilt reurc ength aid x1 ItbI. This wa.s foýrmci(rl don., by traiunpling onl Uic ulotb wilb blle feet, byv tlie walker. Mie debbl then passaed te thie dver. aud froin hlmi %-cnt t4e Uic tenlte.r, wlho trchdit te tibe width required. A lister wuis a cornu,- er. In the case et linen wveaving the whistýSler N-as the man who saw te 1h.eaeig Another naine for tie fufler n-as a tueker. The tozer or",
         "THE (3ANADIUN MAGAZINE towzer was, he viio brougiit up the. nap by going ever it with tesalea. But thiecloth on racligthe talor, or as the. Engliaii culled hlm, the. aliaper, vent througii the banda of the cutter. Then it vas taken up by the. seamer snd run togetiier. But even viien aitted and adjusted thie garment was net complet.. The trim- mer hud to b. called in te supply the ornamental laces, and the pointer to turuisii thie fasiinahle points with- out whlcii no gentleman\u003es dress was complet.\" Our must common surname, Smithi, la; a trade appellation. The. smith of the. middle ages mipplied a vat num- ber of thi. mut erdinary mechanical needs of the. people, and ho vas every- viiere. Consequently he bas left the largest impression upon our nomen- clature. W. have issu that a maxn would be alled Johnson when he had no duatinguishing cbaracteristic of bis own te provide a naine. But the mnu who was called Smith must hiave beeu otiierwise. 0f the. four or five smiths in a countryuide, the one wiio vas ulngled out te, b. kno'wn by bis trade must have been the, one whe plied it wltii the. greatest energy aud auccess. H. vas the smitii. Ail houeur te our trade-naines then. Eacii one of tiiem goea back to aman who did uefiil wor* with iige aud skill. 'There is no need to tisg ie espelling of Smith nr TaiIlor to elaim aunerior cousider ia place-naines, ia notiiing very mysterig them. That a maxi frein who came to live in EunIi soon become known as Jo\u0026 la only natural. And se mi are t. be fouud te-day al world oue cannot help roi old saying that% etm people other lands te, avoi at home. At the. sanie tii remember that the, two popi in Scottisii history bespe blood. Wallace mens a (Waleys), aud Bruce là place-naine (de Brus\u003e. Some Irish place-naines happy enigin, In 1485 ai passed entitled \"An Act Inishinen dwelling in the. \u003c Dublin, Myeth, Wrial, a shall gae appareiled lik. E: aud ware their heada aftei lisb mauner, aveare aUqe take Engliaii surnames', dlrected ev'ery Irisiimau vi cerned t. \"take to, binia surname of a towne, à CJhester, Trym, Skryne, C sale, or a colour as MWbl Browne; sud that ho and shall use this naine nder forfeiting ef hia goods ye\u0026 premises be doue.» As our motherland bas al a haven of refuze for ail",
         "WHIAT'S IN A NAME T (de Vanti\u003e, Weir (de Vere\u003e, andi may more are deriveti front lands andi towns acros the ehaunel. But other European conutries sent their quota. F~rom Gerinan (Alle- man)anstors sprang the. Lalle- nua, Dolmans, Almnains, andi Dol- mains. The. ancestral borne of Mr. Beamiah was Bohemia; our two somne- wbat Irilah4ocking gentlemnen, 'Messrs. Biulen andi Cuillen, camne originally Irom Boulogne aud Cologne. Breton or Britton, Flemning, French, Ger- muine corrupteti to Jarman, Hlolland, and Veness require no introduction, aithough Legge, a merchant froin Liee msy flot be so readily reeog- nized The diescendante of Joscelin, a paename from Brittany, andi of Pycd derived from a village ini Wales are examples of an unfortun- ate company. They must often wrish thefr names miglit b. rest in the. original moulti andi anatiiematize the. eoevulgaxized luto the trivial and mainglm sulngad Peaueod r.- ferred to inthe hgni of this akin to these surnames o! those of location derived mau's dwelling. Tbey are eling on the. whoe, as inany tic. Anglo-Saxon, Qld Eng- ýIdt Norse words f rom vic) tored havre droppeti out 2er voeabnlary. An Anglo- eck.d, drop-sbouldered in- mt rther a mnan vho liveti Coate, Aldu. (olti bouse), Maithuls (m1alt bouise), L'oftnls (houa. with a roof), Newholt, Scales. andi Wilnter- sealea. Sucb cota, bolds. aud scales hiat an infinite variety of choie for naturai srronndings. They inight bc at a Crsg, Carn, Cliffe, Bnirg, Etige, Endi, Filid, Grove, ore, Thorpe, Steati, WeUl, Wood. Ton, or Tree, to mention but a few ponuibili- ties. Suruamnes deriveti f rom tiiese beýgan lu somne sueh eircurniocution as Will-at-a-well. This in tinte becamne WViII Attawell. or Atbtleld, Attaway, Bytheil (i... by the. bull), liytbeway, andi Bythesea. In othier instances the preposition aloi\u003e. remains: Athorn, More, Atritige, Atton, Attrem, At- water, Byeroft, Blyford, Bygravv, and Byburst. Iu otiier. all but oue letter la oblite-rateti: Nash for st-an-uh, andi Nangle for at-an-angle or corner. Iu by far the. greatest nwnber, Iiow- ever, all signs o! both proposition anti articles ha. eompletely disappeared:- Goodacre, Oldacre, Longace, and 'Whltaere (acre meant rorniand) ; Brostibent (bent was a 1\u003e1gh pus- tare) ; Deane, Oxentien, Sugden \u003csow- dien). Dearden, Deumnan, andi Denyer (Anglo-Saxon Den or Dean, a wood- eti valley) ; Bleckett anti Hlohek (berk, a brook) ; Nfoor, More, 'Mulr. Blackmore, Delamore, Morton, Mor- ley. Moothayes. anti Paramore. (an enclosure ou a moor), are a few char- acteriatie exaxuplea. Tet other men\u003e dependeti on the. pointa o! the eon- pass, North, South, Eu. anti West, or .Norton. Nortbeot, Easton, andi Weston. anti many more such coin- binations gave thecm their designa- tions. W)\u003e.» ont fortfathers turnedl froin nature's his anti Ioors andi feus to- wartis their towvna and i eties, a. 'Don a. they pawmetiMr. Townaecnd's pro- perty on the outakirts another kinti cf landms,* greeted their eyes. Ait",
         "TIIE CANA4DIAN MAGAZINE follmwing lines from Pasquin show how iu the. seventeentii century peo- pIe were identified by sucli signa:; First there is Master Peter at the Bell, ~A linendraper and a wealthy manl. Then Mýaster Thomas that dotli stockings Bell, And George the Grocer at the Frying Pau, And Mauster Timotliie, the woollendraper, And Master Solomaxi, the leatiier scraper, And Frank the Goldsmith at the Rose, Anad Nfaster Philip with the fiery nose. And Master Miles, the mercer at the Hlar- TOW, And Master Nicke, the silkman at the Plow. -And Master Gils, the malter nt the Spar- rffw, ÂAd Master Dike, the vintuer at the Cow. Anil Harry Hlaberdasher at the Hlome. Arid Oliver, the dyer, nt the. Thorne. And Bernard, barber-murgeon, at the Fid- 41., And Moses, mnerebant-tailor, at the Ne.- dIle. It ia very easy to sec from this how men acquired'as surnames eitiier the namne of their trade or the aigu under whiclh they carried it on. Harry Ilaberdasher hias ehosen the. former, while Frank lias aUfll has choice to, make, and inay b. Frank Goldsmith or Frank Rose, andl Peter mnay beconie Peter Dyer or Peter Bell. Indeed ever 'y one of these signs, exceptiflg the Fryixag-pan, la now a surname. .Macaulay telas us that when coin- mou people becaine ale to read and Let us turu froni this e tdon of names descripti, mnau' abode to the compar; which deseribe instead the self. When the. beasta we before Adain lie gave theri cording to tii. charaecris served lu each. There fi been something of tie oIL eacli of us. -White, Bla( Long, Little, and Smal of obvious origini, but t] equivalents are mrore puz71 MýLacBeari, Fiin, and Finlay, Dow, Duif, Duffie, -MaeDi and Keiran, of BIavk; Dun: man, of Býrown; ýMcFadz Moore, Morain, and -Me) Long, and Beggs, o! Litth( Tintil the etymiologiat ha( our vast mnountain of na more were thrownv promnisc apparently withi every r this nick-name heap. Bull, Guil, Crabbe, and Peaco\u003c stance, were ail cast on i feit that the explanation original bearer and uis uar aeased so many attributea i was so simple there eould no other. That the. naine been inherited froin the fi er'a shop-sign waa surely in comparison. But one mon sense had to bow to learning. And tantalizing is, many o! our moat truth derivations have to b. gli the saine reason. Goodla4 mran mean not wvhat they say, but rather good lathe, barn, and a servant o~f LE exiamplea 1 and an .for an -- -e came te",
         "CURRENT EVENTFS BY LINDSAY CRýAWFORD ONF of flic ost thr-ililhxg rhp- ters in Ithe htoyof the war waýs brougbht to a d-rainatio con- ellsiol Iat ni!txbyte cornpîete \u003ctacuaiftilOf 1o the aslipoili P4enin1- K1a . Ofca reticencýe vuils fro(mi p~ng eyeite reai triith iregard ig th.erain l tis inhlospitablo rrion, buinsxhl kuown to shiow thaqt smre of the offleers omxdg oerlnsly bkhinderedI. Nothiing, hiow- evor. -aix detraet f rom the, heroisux of fixe rank and file, underr alviost imii poilc ondtios.CIcnsorship bas mbbed thes mci for the momtent o! the triIbixtos whlelx ir otheir days their matehlieq bravcry anid endurance- W0111d b1ave ealled forth. Nowhiere hâve greater difrleultlcaq heen encoun- ternd or more vherufy crne. Vie lig o! siek-abotxt niety thoirsand- wa equal1 to the total eaztxalty1 lixt. on tbe firing line or reting th were always inx the dagrzone. Cint of from an adlequate, wa-tcr supply and rlngfor emrihu o thle riilarity- of the qi1pply sIiipa, they *ù ld owlbereesaete neys SNot aui ineh of thie availablo %bieias safe fromi the guns. lnx th istarire a transport wagon is Sep Itumbering alonig. There, is a puf or smnke. an explosin.i andl oxly tewagon renalixa, a battered wreek. %1e and borses have- been annihi- làe.A boat pixtsauot tnoOne of tlie trarsprtq lying off the shore. A Cludo spray bides it from sigbit. Tey p.e earches inx vain for the boat adits oeeupants. Vie shore it lit- ___ with thé~ fraeflxfts o! wreeks- vietimiS o! the Il rysraig~d 1iro that tuirus thii echit avr t;lelo Oaablrs, One tho 1a1d 1cs fromn Its baýse. uipon a bareind rô-kv « ý .Intinstula, '11h witr att1in.g in,. amd diest and deapthl e.ves pres- euTt. h vauto w:1, rfltwol unepete hythsewlho Ilndeoi.ýIod th atutin Toa ihd~ four VOITy corp a1 ailimedimenota in faeo! ai v4gilanit foc, wýithl a total os two wounded .la a, featwhh lias few.ý p)arallels ln mxilitmirY hi1Story. hIieintea lias now beenl itn- feýrre1 to aonkwhere the Mllioed RrmlP neepy irenbepositions. Raia, whieh hq\u003c play' ed a mloalt u- slihpa1rt iu thI3; war, erete a di versIon in East \u003clhcaand ikw ina !o-llowvitng fix retrepat o! ber \\l- lies,, !rom Seria. Tis xxew onffensive waýS ou a a('e01at1o(i not be ignýor- od su nesiatd the (ua Iro re- iuforeemntsf froux the B1alkkans RuM meMrs o af Fuia landfing7 il Bu1l. araproved to 1- piremaituiri. In r~-gadiugth'~failr o lriiv to supplvir, hroop; poised ad 1Kiixlk hampere bythittitudeli o! O-refce., Meanirueii the Al l ies have been strnahcxi ansd !ortifyilng flic nnrtheirn approa-hbes toi Slniki, wbefre, inx the opiniion of some,. the enemjy eau hi, deait a dcath-blow. Liftie Montencer bas sbared the fate o! Relginux sud Serbia. The eap- ture of Lovchen, l. fortified nxoun-",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE tain overlooking Cattaro harbour, led te the occupation by the Austrians of the. Montenegrin capital, Cettinje. 'With a population of two thousand, Cettinje did not rank high among European scats of government, but it was the pulaating heart of a won- derful race o! figliters. Here the picturesque figure ef the present King, Nieholas I., inight b. seen in ordinary trnes as he strolled with per- fect freedem through its itreets, or 8at by the fountain wiiile seme hardy and flerce-looking mountaineer pour- cd into bis ear some domestie or legal difilculty that pressed for solution. le is the last sur'iver of the par- riarchal menarchs whose rul is that of benev\u003cobent depts.And now, like King Albert and King Peter, Nicholas 1. of Montenegro is driven froni bis bonme and his capital into the. fastneuses of bis meuntainons counitry, By the capture o! Lovehen, which dominates Cattaro, the, Aus- train navy, riding at anchor under the. protccting guns of its naval base on the Adriatie, is sate froni the. Montonegrin guns whicii for weeks past have been raining high exple- sives on the, town bclow. sheills, 1aving drawn Iarg Uhc munitions factories a Germau officers captured a front express a desire for po officer, questioned by Profea tiie officiai British observer Russian arrny, adzuittcd ti burg was a dead town, and mans were on short rations. planation of the war was t' -nomically thc struggle for li inany had become almost il Seine outlet was essentiat, England and thc ether Po united te prevent\". Twie red te Uic war as a «\u003ccate and that the, Gernian poli led te the. catastrophe «\"cou a policy b. defendcd\". The the. Germas troops on ti\u003c front is no longer buoyant thusiastie as in Uic drive of mer. Ail the. Oerman sol for peaee, and this is theceoi frain aise ln Uic letters the from home. The Russian I\u003cfreua Uieir ri Bw drafts, poi ivolvcd. At",
         "CURRENT EVENTS \"e.The. situation bua been great- r exaggerated lin sme of the. des- atch that have reaeiied this side. bh objee of tiiese correspondents pparen tly ia to diseredît Nlr. Asquith ndteBritishi workinig mani. Tii. ac rmnains, iiowever, that voluxi- irylsm, flot conscription. lias saved ie Empire. The, number of unmar-. A. men that have flot responded to le cal] ia inflnitcsimally smail wiien mpared with the. gigantic propor- -n of the. voluiit\u0026ry army thut lias se raised since the. war broke out. , \"a wrong is donc the. Britishi ,rigclasses b\u003e' grosa exaggera- osud mnisrepresentat ions o! a par- -a pres that lias neitiier forgiven or forg tiith social revolution a. )mlsed by the. Britishi democraey Ungthe. paut eight years. Take, wr instance, tiie minera. Tiiese men alised inu snch numbers at the be- Inning of the. war that coul produc- on beesme aserions problem for the. ,dmltY, and numbers o! tiiem were -nt b..k fromn the trcnclies to re- ,m ther civil occupations. In àklU- j labour, in the. manufacture of lulti@ns, the. -a tiiing oeeurr. ki4 edbeanloe, more useful in the ,or.hp tiiau in the trenciies, were ,n home trom France to manufac- Ir gua sand shells and build ships. rhna British Minister like Mr. Dw tatngthat ho must have .ighty josn men ut once for woi* in the. st, i dmand for more skilled aud ddldlabour iu the. munitions fac- »js uut b. met by drawing upou instead o! a local s.tting. It 1*à for. gotten that the tUnited King-dom la an old country wii for centuries bas hadl an open dloor for the, stranger. The, conditions are totally different in Canada. where immiigration laws bar the. feeble aud unfit. After deiduct.- ing thole engaged in munitions fac. tories, the piiysirally unfit, and tiiowe whose famnily elaimsq are as pressing as9 those of niarried men. tii. nunuber o! eligubtle, single men wiio have not. voluntarily responded is ecompara- tively amalli Were the, Empire rely- ing uipon thes. to obtain victor\u003e' tii. pliglit of th(, Empire would b., lid indeed. Haviug mude a promise, that the, married men would not b. culied upon umtil eligible single men iiad first \"eponded lu suifflcient numbers., the. Prime Miuister la in honour bound to red.em lis pledge. The. alacrity witii wiie ail parties hiave faflen into lin. béid Mr. A8quitiz showsq tbat thi. opposition wus due to causes otiier titan a desire ta evadé milltary service. The Labourites made it elear the. scarelfr o! labour for induatrial faetories; that would follow a romu- pulsory draft of ail eligible mon,. Whatever glory tiiere la in tusq war -and tiiere doms fot appear t. b. much for the. higli offiorsi cu oin- maiid-tie British sud Irish wotk- ingmen, lu the. Dardanellesand on tiie western front, have not been b.- bid any cdama in the, conimunity lu their bravery lu fa.. o! the. enemy and in the sacrifices tii,\u003e have dcer- fuillY made for the cause of iumau liberty. Canada is asked te coutribut. au- otiier hal! million meu. It la a re markuble testimon\u003e' to the strngth o! tiie Imperial ti., and Sir Sainu Hughes will no doubt acoempli the. task of equipping and training this large force itime t. eomplete the mastery of the, Aflled nations iu",
         "TRE CANADIAN MAGAZINE tic indebteduess of the war without involving its financial obligations up- on posterity. In the United King- doni waste and extravagance are frowned dewn in ev direction. The P\"j,ibshers' (Nrcuir anueuinCeS in a reect issue t1iat the tille will hience- forth lie prinited iii black te avoid extra e-xpeuse. The notice reads: \"By reqtaest of the Goverfimlent we are ait to observe econoray where possible; so, as ouir red head(ing is not a eCes- usity, we shal (Trop it until the star of peace retuirns with our victorious forces\". British newspapers genieral- ly bave retreccbed fiud some of the weeklies are publishing monthly ini- stead. The, Âtkenaeum lias become a shilling mnouthly. It bas doue splen- dlid service duiring its eighty-seven yearq of existenco, and many will re- gret its téxnporary disappearance as a weelrly. Tt is a debatealel qulestion whether mere absence o! expenditure is truce eeonomy. The saving of inoney un- aeonipanied hy its circulation ie haiful te the eommuuity. In war- finie extreme thrift, is justified only on the grouud that the moutey se saved is being diverted from personal to publie purposes. The ability of Britain te win in this war does not depend wholly on ber military atreugth. It is the side that eau put the hast million reserves in the field an(d keep them there that wlll reap the fruiits of enduring peace. Econ- oniy and retrenchment, if rightly un- derstood, will carry Britain throagh. But what is eeouomy? The lion- ourable William C. Redfield discusses it as follows: \"E1coromy ia not the absence of spend- ing. A man who i8 able to Bpend tern dol- lars a week on his famaily f or f ood, and who dues nctually spend two , week instead, is net econoni wasqtefubl Hie is waating the. liv f amily and preaenting the Kur. doctors' bis. \"Tho manufacturer Who. havir available, lets bis faectory bauid down and bis mnachinery get out becaiuse ho does not want to spex on either i.a flot vconumlêal Mi igli. He is laying up charges future larger thlan would ocrur il the plant in proper condition. S\u003cThere wasq a guud Irishman i Iiad a fiole ini his roof and kept becauso, as hoe Maid, Whou it r could flot mound it snd whon 1* rRin it did flot needl mending, 0 consider lm witty, but hardly e. \"If it is truc, as morne seeani p) Say, that there is5 a great deal e.f ment extravagance, 1* is algo t there is more Gnverament frue times thain should ho. Lt is net thi of mnoney appfrup)riated( and spent way it is spent whlch la real Wo should cease juidging aiiy part groms by the irore aggregate et tures. It one Congroots as coiaps amiother bas spent ten millions les hanve dune wrong and beon wasti the other baud, anotiier Congrens r spent tweflty milliuns more than dlecessor and still have been MI economical. The macre amowxt te ing of econ2omy. The. question in Morley Wals spent and what resI badtfor theexpenditure. \"Economy is speridlig mione3 It meanis spending inuch when il much is avalable; spending Ilit little i. needed, and none whila needed. La Cther words, for a me that he spent one thousandde this year than last and, therfo tbat nmieh or bans bees 80 econi the mereet foulisbuess. The. fact that bis fnilure te spexxd that dollars may involve a mmmci het penditure ia the~ future.\" ?VIr. Redfield riglitly distl betweeu frugality aud econom- war, it isto befeared,hlas b\"' cd of by uiauy te e\u003cffet aav-i cannot bo classifled as war-tiî omy.",
         "Zbe Ittbrar%2 Zable FIONEER IFE AMONO TIII. 1L0YALISTS flr W. , S. HloeauiTON. Toronto: Thew MaemilIain Companyv of Canadal. T IE niuthor of theexastv andl admnirable \"llistory o!f fli Cou)inty o! lelnnox arid Add(ing- to\" in this his laiteet Iiterary work daswith a .subje-t. that hitherto lia been sadly negIeCtedl The early iinprlife ini Canadaa part Wularly ïthe S-ction 1no% known as Ontario. wa full of romnance,, adreniture, aud hr o!i o the lhigliet order, and yet we bave buit few- amthentie records or itrrtionaý of it. But this at- trcivbook shows uis the evolution Of the honxestead,. the developienit frm the 1. log ht to the brick houwe, and the. peculiaritices of the common fnl of a huundred yeara ago. Mr. ilrngtn writes: -Té ife of the, earlyv settierg vas Dot \u0026i won* and drudgery. They had their licu=i of reereation, and whi il bemt of \u0026Il thèy iid the. iippy taeLulty, in mny 1ngt,r, f mRking rly out (t work. ThO; .wi e,-mplilhed bymeainso let '.'. Teew.r loggirg becs, raiging becs, imunig bteR, and liiking b..., for the. men vile the. wonen iiad tlieir qiiltiug W.qs( parigbees. The, whiole nolgh- borhfod oul beinvited te tii... gath- nigp., Tt may b. tiiat upon the. wiieie *qe flid not ,ee@niplli more than rould )jve berru doue singlu.iianded,. except nt tbeTaigigg -iie) required many bands to iftthelaro tmbeg ito lace; but wr irLi ot theo @iiy objert in view. ma na Mrious animal and loves to wan le -tii is fellow men. Th~e oeca- dosfer public meetings of any kind auigthe first few y.ar. were very rare. Th\"WUr no ftirs, coneertq, leetures. or oerpublie entrtaiflments, mot evea a cbree ehol, or politiral meeting, so, in àlI-ý IàoM the early settIUrs devi8G\u003c tii... gath uig, f-r wo-1, Nrk Onithv did, jut, ()Il tIlr, %u uf i! MIl the uts ceýriAr :lpbrd, nt a.r tlem Thy~reof 1(Ities Jbv1 gatimer th'lrlig b y the fealo le- member, e itii the totee luwklieyl ofe e t ue tines. Tii.rf tho~izb. tollodf, tiburln ottf. talIlo, w th-r eousu . lti. the. naur iet the irr. ru,l t o b. i pu n etr r - vrý ri stulu inzi., tlhe suTnd t: ate met tii, ontli leiu.dmt t do. orderly, and ,eclqedi ile b.. mitii eue or mort, druanken figite. Tt waam tliva ten- turc of the loggiag b... tiart maile tiieta to dliseev(,r the. qual etl tii quin i:c ,19 a el.anring-iiea. fer goaaýip1. To thc* CrÛdit Of the. fir sex3, we 9houid a tbut tiiey rarcly made luse o!Itoiat.fa thie ela grannies did eu\"jeyate f trour a b,,fiae rlay. pipc, nt ter tiieir mealu. Both nmea andl woc vere more or les adgdirtedl to ti. usep ot niff \"Wh ik. was Pletiful in the. gond obd daym, but tile drining et it waq nut loei- ed upoa withiiir mahoirrrr nor attrud.d our dayv. Thii. differeuce %vas rebatbly due boi te the. drink aud ti. d1riaiir.\" Sonne peopîle mill net aldmit that gny wbitikey i. bad, wihill, otii*rs feny that auy eau b. gçoed; but the. wiukey et a iiundrefl year8 ugo doge aot appeir to havet iad a1 lierre a serpent ln it ai thé. ii1gi1v- adver-tloed brande ofet tir-set day. Tt po88esl one virtue, an vhR as itu",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE oliespuesa. Wlien a quart could b. pur- .liaaed for uixpence, »a man could liardly b. chargod wit reash extravagance in buy- ing noug whikeyto produce the. douirod tliuîg to drink upon almont aDy occasion, and upon the. allglitet provocation; and, if a menubor of a company reeeivod an overdose and glided under the. table, it creeted no more sensation tiien if lie lied fallen asleep. As the. population moerses- ed, taverne were set up et nearly overy croosstg of the. roads. Soins of theso, epecialiy thie recognlzed stopping-plaeos of the~ stage coachies, were quite impou1ng liostelries; and as thie giieste gatiiere about the, huge fire-plece on a winter'a evenlag aid uiuoked their pipes, dranli tiieir toddy, and .ehanged tiieir tales o! adVentUTe and travel, te sons as one tiiat hanano countrpartin our dey. It was a fom o! sociabulty and entertain- ment tiiat dsparted vitii tlie paosing of thie stage coachi.\" THE ROCKY RGA]) TO DUBLIN By JÀxF-9 S'rxPIINB. Toronto: The Macmillan o~mpany of Canada. a novelist, here gives us in delightful verse terni the. adventures of oe Sennas Beg. This is at leant hi. Bouide li and not reatel n Bo mlglity big lie vas-I fea Turn round, and trampiie do I stooa. I triod tu g et away, but, as Under a busli, lie aaw me, Far down and said, \"WIIOT. cess liidt\" I pointed to a place, and c But vile lie searoiiod I turi Round by the. lilas bushs ba THE QUESTION OF .A BY EDwAItD HUNTnWGTON M.]). New York. Thi Company. T ITEauhr ofti ok pathology in the. Stat. Ui Iowa, sets out te show that inethod than the ordinary \"Prohibitien\"\u003e must be deyi the, censumptien ef alcol materially decreased. \"I test ef this,» ho affirms, '«I theo records of police cour asylumu, and almsheuses. contly made an extensive tion, tho rosults of which",
         "THE LIBRARY TABLE nt to sove the. woman problein, but in ansttempt tW «interpret, informi. \u0026U1, crtan ativitiesansd responni- biltie oftheaverage normal wo- mn.\" Misa Tarbeil is esteemed for breadth of vision aud smne thoughts. It in a relief to have her go helow the srfaeS aud repudiate mnap..Èhot judg- innt i regard to woman's present gttu and probauble future dev.lop- met, Tt is a book of hopeful, eheer- faul tiioughts. It makes an especial ples for the young girl, explains why àli, naturmfly and with good resuit., acquired the. reputation of beiug t.Ik.tivel; advisea a practical train. ing in damestie scence, that women ma ng Wo the. business of 11f. a tandmind; sud, best of all, call. ther ed.r' attention Wo the. \"young air,' tiiougiats aud the. eeity for wàkig them honust, pure, aud hfflty. It in a very human book, worty of careful reading. 4 TII CANADIAN IRON AND STEEL INDUSTRIES D W.J. A. DoNALD. Boston: The RouhtnMimfin Cmay ems n ecn c. Altiough the, ,thr bulieves that the, iron and steel out overaiet aid. h. shows never- tleow tiiey have been built up i nPhnt a wav that manual training and lkouaeholdl w-i. ence in Ontario. Tii. book deals witb sueli subjeetu an tiie eduication of !ounitry chldren aloug agriciltiirâl aud home-makiug lines, tiie trainiug of the. adult fariner in mnethods4 of soil cultivation sud farni manage. mieut arcording We sientifie prin. cipi.., the. condition of the, fris hom, and esumeas of driftlug tW the. cities, and thi. developineut of sonnd business metiiodm in ail farmhug operations. PRINCfl\u003eLE8 0F ARGUMENT By RDwii Buum. Toronto: The. Caii ada Law Book Compmny. cau searcély imaginp a lawyer who would net want We rendi k A great many books have Weu wrlttezi about logie, but this onue dhscme. sud pro. peundh in su illinmiuiativ., way the peculiar kind of logic that inust Ix. the bs of all good argument. In otiier word. indeed1 in the. words of the antiier, the. book aima te '\u003cfa.l. tâte the, proeees of tiiinking *hleh are subservieut tW argumenutatiou; te ensile studeut3 readily tW detect sud expose fallacies; We aimplity logiesi theory, sud make it available for prae- tioui application in maklngz sud ni- tacking arguments-. Tt would mauke an excellent text.boèk, besicles bePing of mnuch service Wo the. praetising: law-. yer, and s welt a guide te journal. ists sud others who engage in tii. practiee of arguimntatiou. The, style is concise, lueld. sud net weakened 1\u003e7 ornamntation. I- MEJ WNAR AND TIIE JEW \u003efBY THE RV 'S.B RefOHDwlth an r. introduction by Prof. T. B. Kilpat. rieCIL Toronto.Th Mamilai.m pau-y of Canada. :i i hsbo fr the esaeta a-they ar. amonRth truted sprlAntA",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE war, that they are loyal to the couni- tries of their nativity, and that they are te be found, by the thousands, fighting lu the armies of the various nationalitieq. Owing tethis fact,mnen of the Jewish race are cent ronting eue another as4 enemies on the battie- field. Then there are the terrible con- ditions under whieh Jews have lived in Russia. The book deals with these varions Jewish problemns in a broad yet sympathetic mauner. LAIJRENTIAN LAYRIOS 13Y AwRUR 'S. BouuIN«yr. Toronto:- The (Jepp, Clark Company. TIs is a small brochure of poenis, sone of whieh have appeared previonsly in The UJniversity Maga- zine,, The Canadia Magazinw, and other publications. They display a fine sense ot colour and a keen ap- preciation of poetical values. The fol- lewing verses. written \"To tbe Menm- ory of Rupert Brooke,\" the superb English poet who died in service at the Dardanelles, are a sample of the work: He Ioved tu live bis life with laughing Bips, ,Ard ever ivitb gold sunlight on his eyes, To dreara on flowered uplands as they rise, O 'er which the moon lik. burnished metal slips; To bear the gypsy song lu snils ot ships, Ard wander o 'er the waves 'neath azure qkies, Beeing the spiendour of tlred i dies And into lone oblivion glowly d But suddenly his country olash,. And peiiee waii cru4hed ard trai p)ale bloom, Beneath the. careless feet of beasit- Tbe world wau tiirmoil, stirred to enet, ~And song ana gladnes had roomn, For drum and bugle called alairma. TUE GLU TESTAMENT LIGUIT 0F 'PO-DA' BYWwÂ FREDERIu BAD~ York: The lloughtou, MIit pany. W IJAýT shail wve dIo with Testament? This is a that confronts many mnen mien to-day. We cannot amy fessor Badé answers thue queý clusively, but the book nt tempts to solve as itedui possible the difficulties of whoxn the Old Testament valuable part of the Bible, find it \"au ludigeatible dlei Biblical rationale of their Hie admits that lu his ow frank evaluation of the mori Old Testament iu the liIh torical eriticisrn han prove4 only effective solvent. The scholarly study of Old Testa tory and literature and oi, ideals and practices.",
         "WICE-TOL A P1\u0026'owr ,iate at an impjortant service ini In. The main enitrance to the was oipened, and a great spaeo ,off so that thec dignitaries ighlt fromi their eqjuipagos urnl!O- When a dnasty four-whee1er 1 the. square, drive» by a fit, oeil vabIY. bobbies rulshed Out 'ilhim)off. t ont of er/ one o! tbemca- skly. \"Tis etrnc is rcscri- the Archbishop.- h a wink and a backward jerký thumb the irrepresble cabby. cheorfully:ý \u003eave the oid duiffer inside.\"- iýos Re.iter. PROW\u0026ý8 the RusMian offiper who. yesterday'sq officiai coin- ceived lui a very short ton thouasand bomibs On cre ~vsa report of the [tiago, publishied by an per, i whieb. it was Udmirul Sampson bad a escape. He was hit on a six-inch shèli, wbich -PaIl M1all Gazette. kiL-Timr?» 1T1\\iQW The fare ait a certain boarditig. bouse wawi very- poor. A boairder whoi had been thevre for %mre tixn, ecus ho could1 fot get away. was standing in thef hall whcn,1 theg laiiord rang the dinner-beil., Whiereupon in oid dogr that was ly\\iing outufide on a rig cornmened ta how] mourut ully. The( boarder watehied hîmi a lîttie wieand thion ad «Whazt on earth aire voit bow1lig foi,? Youl don't h1ave ta icat it - Tit-Rits. Utin pnped",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE SCOMa TiaRUJ (From the 4Argonat) An Eng1ishman, Irishman aud 8eoehman made an agreement amoiig theinselves that wiioover died first sheuld have five pounds placed on hie coffi by each of the. others. Tiie Irishmmn was the first to di. Siiortly afterwsrd the Scotehman mot the. Englishman and asked him \"if ho had fulfilled the. agreemuent. \"Yes,» said thie Englishman, \"I put on ftve soveroigus. What did you put on 1\" \"Oh, I just wrote my ceque for ton pouuds,\" said tiie Seotchman, \"au' toôk your five sov- .relgns as chiange.\" A Nucw AT\u0026cx \"~Excue me, sir,\" said the. painhin- dlr, shuffi up to Dubbleigh's sido, \"but you cudn't lot me have fifton do~las, could yen t» «Fifteen dollars?\" ooiioed 1)ubb- leigh, \"Great Scott, man; do y ou for one moment suppose I'd b. fool enough te give yen fifteen dollars?» \"No, chiot-I didn't,\" said tiie pan- handler, \"but I sort o' iioped you'd regardit as akind of personal ass- mont and awear off feurteen-niey leavin' me witii a dime te the good 1» He got it.-Chicago Herald. SOxu Hmto \"This i. one of my an said, pausing befor. a r fèll at 'Waterloo. Have costors 1\" He suddenly remembei wiio iiad sole charge of a cinema show, and mui -yos, one.\" «\"Did he fall any-where \"Not exactly; but 1 r ing told how, clotiiod in 1 but uxiarmed savo for e he stood boforo an Eater kept a howling, surgiiig si3igle-handed.\" '¶eally! How spl.nd \"Oh, ho thought nothi2 it overy night for yearu LiEff THAi Hui6 Tom, the. country six-y menting himef eue day i than bis usual state of order, was asked by is: would not lik. te, b. a fl and always bouice and el suits sud shoes and stoc: answered soornfully. 1 chlden; heye pt\u0026",
         "WHAT IS AUTO-INTOXICATION AND HOW TO PREVENT IT 13Y C. G. PERCIVAL, M.D. drflthe beat detini1tion I have ever A o Auto-intoxication la \"Self4n1rtoxi- on or poiso0ning by comlpounlds pro- rd frternally by Nec\" bis dfnition isceaî intelligible be- fe t put.i Auitodnt1oxlvatioln exactly re it blelonlgi; taike it awyfron thec .mur and enaily mludrtoand I it intotfli light as an eevtig 1- ou almnt in probaly% flic inost ilnaidious of ai bJjtgxeause its first indications are we fee] a littie below par. sluggishi, ,irt.dd. etc- and we are, apt to delude, ilve that it may lm- the wveatler, al e overwork or tlie ied for a reat lit onoe 14et it get a goo(l hold throligh .attention t41 the, real m-use' alld a nr tùk months to correct. Not aloie but Auênoxcto8 wcakeus the, ,datlony of the entire sYstemn to rsa -w that if any. is prevailent at the tlimel f ay orgain of the bodyv - la blow p-ar 0\" or les spriousdeaneien is suire .ailmen)ts whieh banve been common- simft habitlually. tra-ced to Auto-Tn- rto are: Languoir. Hleadaelhe. Inso- i\u0026 i oli onness. Melang-holia, Nervous grtion. Digestive Troubles, Eruptions bp Fkn Rheumnatisim, Neuiralgia,. Kid-~ Dsrhace, iver Troubles. hefae several conditions wiehl inav SAuita-Tntoxication. buit byN far thef ,O mo ad prevalent one, la the, ne- utinof waate iln the colon1, eauseOd innfret exercise. imiproper food or * d tban nature can tlecaeo erOu prf-cent mode of living. wode if yeni reali7fe how prevaleunt Moemrnef cause of Auito-Intoxic-- rWyis-the claetproof of it is on wou1d be entirelyv safe lin stating re\" are more drugaq consumpd in an rtt mrert this complaint than for Il ,r hmanills eo)mbined -it ia indeed remi and if it were once conquered. in t1c words, of the failous. 1Ifedic al s4ýeatia,41 Profe'ssor. Eli Metellilikoff, -tliv 1(Igtl oif our liveas %%ould lit neaýtrl vohe. Ue hia.speîlal stalvid thalt if our cooswere reinoved in earlv iinfancy %we\" wold l ail prob'ability livq0 to thel aIge or 150 years. That labs as the waste whieh avoiuîuuii lates in the, oolon laetriey osoos and thef bilood, as it flows- through theill of threcolon,. absýorba. thiese poisonis utitil it la prîncatid withti . lHave yo ever, whvii bilious. cxeieed rigilng siei-i lion apparenlt eveni abov 1th dormant se1n Satin i h hiliouirsnes cr1ee 1 ae and thlat is Atitvcio wayabe ft danger po(inlt. Now, if laaiedruga weu(re thorougbi '11 refllaoiv.ig tbi' at, hr coffld lw nu\" ar~ raignument Iginst theml Býut they,. are, at beat only parliallY cf fective and tm rayini their rvsul1ts. anîd if piastdlu soon ceas tO 1 ffiective at aIl. Thivir effiect l, at et the forgeingk of the , svstemi to thirow ofanoxiolns oleinient. and they therefore, 'XJolt nature- inste-ad of aiss istig hier, Thiere la,. however, a inqthodl of eiiniat- ing this- wasýte, whviieh ha, enpefee reeently after mnany years of piractioe and study, he nuight 1w( aptlyv termedi a na- ture remewdyv Tisq i. the denigof the, coalon its' entire, lenigth,. at reasonable- per. iods. b),'v ineans of an i internal bath. 'i1i which simnple warmi water and a fiarmilve, antlaeptîc are used. This syatfem alread y has. over hait a tifl- lion enthulsiastif, usera and adlvocates. who have, found it the onef effective and harin- les refventive oif Aulto-Intoxl(icii and a resulting m nsof ronsistenfly keepingz thepm (,]par in brain, biright in aprts n- thu-iastie ln the(ir work and mio-t capableý in if-, performnance, The one great merit abouit this unethod, aside frein the faet that it la -mo effertual. us that ne one can quarrel witb it, bec-çause; it la so simple aud natural, Tt is, as it la",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE called, nothing but a bath, scientificaly applied. Ail physicians, have for years eommnoniy recommended old-fashioned In- ternai Baths, and the oniy distinction be- tiveen them is that the newer method isin finitely more thorough, wherefore it wouid seemn that one could hardly f ail to recom- mnend it without stultifying blinself could hie? As a matter of fact, I know that many of the most enlightened and succesfu spe- cialiets are constantly pregcribinig it to their patients. The physician who has been responsible for this perfected method of Internai Bath- ing was hiruseif an invalid twently-five yPars ago. Medicine had failed( and he tried the old-fashioned Internai Bath. It benefited him, but waa only partially ef- fective. Eneouraged by this progress, how- ever, he improved the manner of adminis- teringz it, and as this imnproved so did his bralth. Hence,' for, twenty-five y. made this his lifc's study and tii to-day this long experieni sented in the \u003c'J. B. L. Cascade ail these years of specializing readily appreciated, mogt inte valuable knowledge was glean, practicai knowiedge is ail suxui most interesting way. and wil you on request, without cos obligation, if yout will simply a, A. Tyrreil, M.!),, Room 5k6 Street, Toronto, and mentioni this article in The Canadian SThc inclination or this agei far away from medicine as p stl keept healthy and capable. agrce that 95 per cent. of hun is eansed hy Auto-Intoxcati These two factas should b. incline everyonc to at least w littie book and read what is hi he subjeet. NORMAL SIGHT -NOW WITHOUT Becanse your eyes are in anly way 'a fected, it nio longer means thiat you mui look forward to wearing glasses for ti balance of your life. F or it has been conciusively proven thi eye-weakniesses'are primariiy caused by laek of blood circulation in the eye, an when the normal circulation is restored, ti eye rapidly regains its accustomed strengt and clearness of vision. l'le most enunent eye specialists ai agreed tiat even in so, serions a conditic as cataract of the eye, an increase in bloc circulation is most beneficial. It is now possible to safely give the eyo just the massage ('or exercise) which the need, to bring themn back to a norma heaithiy condition of natural strength, an this mctiod bas been suceessful in resto: ing normai eyesight to thousands and mal ing them absolutely independent of eyý glasses. Tt does not matter what the trouble wit EYE-GLASSIES f- your eyes may be; for old-s st near-sight, astiginatism, aso te serious eye troubles, have 3 gentie massage, which i8 c it pie, entireiy safe, and takes a utes of ecd day. d If you wllwrite to th te Co., Boom 537, 257 College h yen wiil receive free on reqi lîghtening bookiet on «Thq e Care, Their fis, Their Cur n scientifie treatise on tic eyes, d details about tuis Nature tre resuits. Ail you need do i, ~sbook and mention haii ,y Canadian Magazine. 1, There are few people wh( d eye-giasses ad.d to their appi r- tiey add to no one's comte ç- prefer not to wear them, thiq ~inform you how many othei plished this resuit safely, su h permanently.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERT1SER Dollars saved by Bovril Bovril used in the Kitchen means dollars saved in the Bank. It makes nourishing bot dishes out of cold food which would not otherwise be eaten. But sce that y'ou get the real tbing. If àit nfot in the Bovril boulie It is flot Bovril. And it mus~t be Bovril. g u. a. Delidioiis and Appetizing In-l Pimenlo\u003e Cheese C.o,i o( lflSt?. o1U Cràm Ch-nse and 8sert Spaisia Piaae.to. ali15C. M\u0026k Your Grocer I IngevoliIngeroflGren Creaum CheSe Chile C:hece -s .pe.nor t., emy ordimary ImuersoIl1 Crea. c~mein f1a'ýor - inrich Cbemmm 6I,,ded creamine-.~ ..tr v . peete. It apmrs li, W but m nir loses is freaL Chile. P-qusttn mm ne\"s and is Liobly f.eoiio u àea deioum. la package@ 15c. and 25c. lu package*u15. M Isprad - -ieRie-Thixr01 Puei C., AI out",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISEB Have You a ByPrblem? The best boy ever born is a serious problemn. The br the boy the greater the problem. And you can't solve it by metic, algebra or geomnetry. It is largely a question of foo giene and exercise. The food problem is easily solved Shredded Whet the most perfect ration ever dev Urowing boys and girls. It cor proper proportion ail the elern building muscle, bone and brair their most digestible form. Th ness of the shreds encourages t] chewing which develops souri and healthy vumTs. For breakfast beat orne or more Discul",
         "CAÂNADIAN- MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 23 Wasted Energ;y There's a big difference between the welI-directed energy of irai nerve force and a \"nerve explosion.\" l'le man with poise and -rve energy, who expends bis nerve power wisely, enjoys life and furthest. The common habit of tea or coflee drinlcing- tends, not only to irritate upset the nervous system, but aise to undermine general health. Tea and coffee drinkers take into the system a cumulative drug 1 its resulting harinful effects upon body, nerves and brain. When the nerves of a tea or coffee drinker cry out, it's time to quit tea and coffee and use POSTUM 's Pure food-drink is absoiutely free from theq ither harniful ingredient. idaya off tea and coffee and on Postum showî L, energy and be rid cf both tea and coffee troublei «\"There's a Reason\"p",
         "24CÂAPIÂjN \u003eMÂGÂZINE ADVERTISEU Roqers Known the world over as the mark which identifies the best of cutlery Look for It on every blade. JOSEPH RODGERS \u0026 SONS, Limnited CumltqTo is AJýET SHEFFIELD - ENGLAND Clark's Pork and Bean 1Plain Sauce Chili Sauce Tomato Sa, M A palatable and nourishing meal pre- PORK pared from the bighest grade beans and fiavoured wlth delicious sauces. EANS i Cooked to perfection and requiring to be warmed for a few minutes ouly, they (Hl Liprovide an ideal summer dish and Save SAUCfyou the labour and discomfort of pte para tion in a hot kItchen. The 2's tall size is suificient for an",
         "CÂNÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 2 ÀFood Gel/s In that Grain \u003cýWheat Many sorts of food cells-about ail we ed. But somne valuabie' elements which we Ln't do without lie mostiy in the outer \u003eats. That's why food experts advocate bole wheat. Those food celis must be brokený' to digest. That's why wheat is cooked or baked. And, to break mnore, celis, you toast'it. But toasting, even,' hardiy breaks up haif. Now We ExpIode Them îat's the fauit whicb Prof. A. P. erson corrected by steazn-expioding at. ich food ceil, he found, hold8 a trifle oisture. So he puts the wheat kerneis uns. Then revolves those guns for ,minutes in 550 degrees ofheat. That erts ail the moisture to steam. Puffed Wh Puffed Ric\u003c ffed grains derive from the fearful a most fascinating taste. The puffing ýs themn bubbies, eight times normai The walls become th and fragile, V to meit in the mouth. e grains are flaky bonbons- food, The guns are then shot, and the steain expiodes. Each food ccii is biasted from within. Thus every eiement ini every coat of the grain is fitted for easy, compicte digestion. Puffed Wheat is whoie whcat. But, more than that, it is whoie wheat made w,%hoily availabie. That was neyer done before., eat E lZcp Far Westl15c confection s-seem ingly too dalnty to be eaten b\u003e' the bowiful. But they are oni\u003e' grain. Serve them as your morning cerel._ Serve tbemn in y\u003cour bowls of miik. Mia them with your fruit. The. Quaker O)ats ompanyI Sole MakersI eugh, Ont. Saiskatoon, Saak. I [1189 I",
         "26 (ANADIAN MAGAZINE, ADVEBTISER OBINSON0 \"PATENT' ----is thë Ideal Food for The large majority of the iliniess attendingf the: child are due to under-nourishment. the resulýt of .np Baby niay apprently have a good appetite but the fa-i1s to nourish gand, baby is pevSh, cries constantly, iý 'Robinsons -Patent- Bar*\u003ey is the ideal food for bo digestil and assimiiated when no other food can be rý wonderfuly nourishing. It is reconimended by leadini nurses everywhere. forery mother should have A copy of IlAdvice ta M ole SO-g2ents for 191 St. Paul Street Wei Magor, Son \u0026 Co., Limited, Canaa 30 Church Street, -o Me \\ 1ý-W THE NEW 310 FLAT BOX An Ass,rtment of Chocolate Covereci -Brazil Nuts, Burnt .Nougatines, Milk Chocolates, Almontinos and Maplee1 qaùu~so oelates",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZilNE ADVERTISER 27",
         "88 CÂNÂDiÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER BUY__ _ _ _ _ _ MADE-IN-CANADA a CORSETS",
         "CÂNADIAN' MAGAZINE 'ADVERTISER 29 VICKERMAN'S Flying, Colors, The ship that bides its identity îs looked upon with suspicion. Its nationality must be de-ý clared by colors flown fromn the masthead. To the passengers on board ship, too, the flag under which they sail means much, for beh.ind it stands the protection'of the nation to which it be- longs. It inspires confidence and assurance of a safe passage. When you order a suit of clothes do you ask to be shown the fiag (the Trade Mark) under which the cloth sails? Those who have worn VICKER MAN'S cloths do this because they know that the Trade Mark IV4 B.VIGKERMAN\u0026SNS!,~ is a guarantee of satisfaction. For a century and a quarter VICK.ER- MAN'S cloths have been the best, and in spite of' the difficulty in securing dye wares their Blues and Blacks are being sold to-day \"Wear and color Guaranteed.\" Tihe VEICERMAN Traie Mfark Inspires confi- dence. Thse cloth Io wisich It lu altache4 wili flot disappoint. N\u003cIS19ET \u0026 AJLD, Umnted, TORONTO Camadian Seillng Agents aLIJE BLACK GREY SERGES AND CHEVIOTS",
         "80 CANADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVEBTISER Canadïan' Made Presto-Phone Desk Telephone Telephone WEmake Teephone Equipmn for àny Service, and we mo it for any person at a reasc able price, and without any conditi( attached except that if it does not wc satisfactorily we wiIlreplace it. Li Why not support the manuf turers who invetsed their nioney the telephone business and made s vice better, telephone equipment lo-v in price and made it possible for you anyone else to buy teIophones if y wanted to use theni. Telephones for the Home, the Factory, the Rural System 01 the Town and City. We can take care of your wal Inf ormation will be suppi proniptly. No 3 Bulletin tells how to build r' systeoes. No. 4 Bulletin describcs the t' phones for such systemis. No. 5 Bulletin iliwstrates the Pr*t Phone, the latest and best syster0 private service. Write us for Telephone Canadian Independent LIM[TED 263 Adelaide Street West - - Ici",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER si QUAKER OATS PREMIUMS Silver Plate We are offering rnany prerniunis to Quaker Oats usez-s, in J.w.lry Silver Plate, Jewelry and Aluminurn CookingUtensils. A Aluminun circular lu eacb package illustrates tbemn. This takes the place of large advertising, and gives ail the saving to you. Each 10c package contains one coupon. Eacb.25c round package contaîns two coupons. Each cou- pon bas a inerchandise value of 2c to apply on any reum. We make very attractive, very libera ofrs. Note them in the package. CeonI Spoon---Dominion Pattern Vini for qa Week in Thair Package Power for a Thousand Taska Think what intensive driving power is concentrated in the oat. A large packageof Quaker Qats contains almost enough energy to supply a human machine for a week. Todo ail the work of a week. Or to start evr4ay in a month, f or one person, with vim- iabundance, The oat isafo o igh is ffodfodh spirits. It is for those who seek bubbling vitality. FoDr those w ho would 1 'feel their oats. \" That is why we urge you to make oat-food inviting. This dish, above ail 'rs, should always be served at its best. QuakeBr Qats The Delihiful Energizer Borne oats Nature gives a fascinaink 'That's- why these flàkes are alwayq large and rWjth Borne oats she ornits it. Iuscious. That's'the reason for their flavor and nie oats are rich and plurnp. Some are aroma., ed and puny. Nou get the Cream of the oats-tbe cream ýýuaker Oats we neyer rnix those grades only--when you ask for Quaker Oats. And you Uit queen grains are discarded in 'naking pay ,no extra pricýe to get Ît. \"a-nd...all but ten pounds per bushel. Please remember that. glar Package, 10 OC Rxcept in Far West Large Round Package, 25C 'W@ugh, n. lbe Quaker O)ats Gim pany Sasktoon, Sask. ijeasn w bNEW ROUND 25c PACKAGE S~aOn . rin ot a new large package of Quaker Oats.I li a round package, insect-proo!. A permanent -4tB . til thela88t ake is used. Thiq .. t- -; -.* *. --. --~,. . A :'-,... J",
         "CANÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVEBTISER \"Perfect Seal \" Quart Jar. hi1 3 pouid Glass Your grocer has £ Crown Brand\" Syrup ini these new wiII get it for you. And be sure and save these jars f( \"lCrown Brand\" is also sold ini 2, 5, 10 and 20 pound tin: THE CANADA STARCH CO., LIMITED, MI mhe iignt, etrong, comi Vf1ELI l FOLOINC Evervone who sees Three Pounds of Syrup. Er",
         "GÂNADJIÂN -,MAGA\u0026ZINE ÂDVEBTISER 'MY baby was so sick that both - -eanu i wer e aimost clead- n'7y mother prevailed on me, to use your- ýrs. Winslow's Soothi*ng Syrup She had raised-her children on it. MY baby- is now doing well, sleeps as sound as anyone, is cutting her teeth and she 1and I f are both Comfortable, MRs. LUEI.LA KgLLIHgR, Woodlandl CaliforniaI. MIrs. Wilow' s SOOthin Syrup For, ChiIJren Teething SOLD'EVER YWHERE W. want every business man and every stenographer ta know how notably auperior. MultiKopy ia to other kinds of carban paper. MultiKopy giwes copies of pCrmansi Z4Sug ilogî. büfty. Theres no *'guessinge'aotMut\" copies, 5-10-20 years will find tar still clenarp an le'ble r n O8fteni MultiKapy givez copies which rival the origi- nais. In black or blue, MultiKopy neer fades. MultiKopy is unequailed fýr manifolding-20 copies offert being; made at one writing. MultiRapy is easily the most ecornical of ail carban papera.» 'Wrîte us on your letterhead: land we wiIl glady send you aSaniple Sheet FREE. Carbori Paper Canadien Distribusr, UNTIn»£ TTPEWMIER CO., US5 Victoria St.. Taente cea. L. S. WIBSTR CG., 363 Cosgr. St. BOSTON, Eau. Makencfihefemsuo STAR BlA ND TgpewriterRibbons GENTS IN CANADA 110CI ZND ;ociaI PIay HOYLE UPTODATE For Genera! PIay tiui art backs in fllH FIII UE Million ls of players in ail part\u0026 af the iew designs. Send for -TIII -- 1 orld use Bicycle Carda because of OFCARO GAM ES their matchiess qualidies. s PInlali Club ludxe SEND 5C 15Ç1 !S~ jvr o% Ai-Cuslon Finias IN STAMPS YEARLY LAYING CARD CO., TORONTO, CANAD AWING FOR MONEY Are you fond af Dravi? Fond A'M M ERINO ~ ets meansi talent. Turn a r stuttering avercanle pasitiely. Our natural methoda talent ino mney.earning channcis pernsiancntly restore natural speech. Graduate pupis by learning how ta illustrate. everywhere. Write for froe advice and literature. wli*t you for this profitableo work. BERLIUNT- CNADAIJ SOur courses were prcpared by 6 aof AND - the ableat Artias an the continent. \u0026-sceuluga1sueyryý8 WNER TOUR EYES NVEED OARE IRCd n u sellntPGsition a a sool 1 dodu thamne for ýoni-S ii nais andtiru .R . M I EE E E E Ldis Ad. ani mia taday. N.o Sma.nî2g -Feels Fine-Acts Quiekly. USPqDENC scnoi. TrytforRed. Weak, WateryEyesaudGrai2. ...... 1.... ......- ..... --....ulaeLOe¶iyIds. Illuatrateti Bo le acs Pack-W age Muinofilcosepouetisal by out OcuIs\u0026- 'ONGIE SV., TrOONTO4. et te t public and aila by DrusMatBs tm T andOc Per Bottd\u0026 ilurile Èyasalve nl As.pi 4",
         "34 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER The Washing done before the day's begun The washing is done and out on the Uine before the day gets started. The MIa-vveU \"'Home' ,Was»Er saves sucb a lot ýof finie. just 10 'minutes for a big tubful of clothes. Washing and clean- ing thoroughly. No rubbing and scrub- bing. The Maxwell does ail the bard work. You'il feel fresh and bright- ready for ironing the sane day. «'HOME WASHER\" Makes wash days easy. Inast on a.uing 'o- the Maxwell \"Homo\" Washer at your dealers. Write to-dayr and we wiUl -nd v u free this interesting booklet \"If - John had to do the. washing. t MAXWELLS LIMITES, Sept. 0., St. Mary,\u0026, Ont. LITTLE THINGS COUNT Even in a match, you should consider the Iittle thlngs- the, woDd, the composition, the \"strikeabllty \", the fiamne Eddy's Matches are madle of strong, dry plne stems, with a secret, perfected composition that'guarantees \"«every match a llghter\". -SixtY- f ive years -of knowlng how-that's the reasoni",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER 35 OLO CHUM TOBACCOI is the \"chum\" of more pipe smokers, than any other tobacco smoked",
         "36 CANÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVEBTISEB jO. DUDA, NTRCNADA MONTEAL AOTVE 72 Dumon BDg.60 BnkofOtaw B WINNIPEGE IF YOUR J1205 MCA'T BUPLdg.",
         "CANÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVEIITISEË 37 WATER STEAM STOVE KELSEY WA-RM AIR THE TEST ur furnace is nowv when the weather is co1d. your housè warrm? Can you regulate the heating of it? 'One of the mnost necessary 3ns of the~ fuirnace is to keep the bouse at the saine even temperature ail the time-on ays and mild days. e Kelseyý. W*rarmi, Air ýGeneratr p your bouse at the samne even temperature ,every day of the winter montbs and will s trouble than ariy furnace made, besides cutting down your coal bill 301%. v' is the timne wheni your, furnace is being put to the test to decide whetber or flot it aCtory. our furnace is flot giving entire satisfaction, we woul be pleas.ed to bave you consuit r Service Departinent is at your service. A potal card wili bring ou, booklet describh..g the KeI.,., Syst., IG COMPANY, LimitedJ BROC THE [ypewv.riter vron the highest 4ward for anical excellence at ail the ational Expositions -(includ-. .1e Panamna-Pacific.) It has also, Ai world's-champion- zontests for .speed and ,accuracy. The present record of net words a minute for one hour's 'wri*ting was made- on Jnderwood in October, 1915. United Typewriter Company, Limited Uudewood Iulidiag 13 5 Victoria Street, Toronto '-ý A /i",
         "88 CÂNÂDIAN MÂGÂZIN ÂDVERTIBSER A/Il oul-doors znvûtes your KodaA No trip too long, no conditions too rough for a Kodak You eau take,. titie and finish the negatives on the spot Kodak system. You can make sure. Kodak calalogfree atyour dealr'., or by mail. CANADIAN KODAK CO., LI-MITED, TORONTO",
         "CÂNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 39 WELL-KEPT-r RECORDS-fç MEANS A. FREE MIND FOR BUSINESS t is better to have each business record in your office ini an Office Specialty \"le in classified order, where they can be located the moment they are required, \"aI to allow uncertain, toose and find methds to prevail because of the Iack of ['vices that wiIl keeu themi ini business.like order. Get an \"OSCO -File in the interest of your busîness 'We unake and selithrough our own Systeni Stores, Fiing Equipment and Supplies Sfile and record eveiykIind of business infotrmation. And more, we show you how to 'ep Your records RIGHT. Let us put you riglit in FiUSn Systens., Largesd M1alerat of Filin# Daioeat in the British Empire Head Office and Factories - - NEWMARKBT, Ont. OU/R OWN F7ING EQUJPMENT STORES: 'tinto, Montreal, Ottawa, Halifax, Wiipeg, Regmna, Calgary, Edmnonton, Vancouer",
         "OÂ~ÂDIÂN. MÂGÂZINE ÂDVEET[SEB CANADA Put Your Hand To The PIow! Every f resh furrow means greater success for you, added pros Canada, increased strength to the Empire and surer victory for th The farmers of Canada are today playing an ail-important part ini the 1 conflhct. Hon. W. T. White, Canadian Minister of Finance, says: \"In meet our interest payments abroad, sustain our 8hare of the burden of and promote to the-greatest possible degree prosperity thwioughout the ID it is the duty of ail Canadian citizens to co-operate in producing as possible 'of what cari be used or sold. For Canada at this juncture th, word of the hour should be production, production, and again pro\u003c For full information regarding farmlag opportunitlcs in Canada writetO W. D. SCOTT, Esq4, Superintendent- of Immigration, Ottawa,C J. OBED SMITH, Esq., Assistant Superintendent of Emnigtafion il- 13 Cbaring Cross, London, S. W., Englanci.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADvERTISER 4 A TOILET TREASURE Murray \u0026 Ltomn' FLORIDA Mltont excetption mhe but and inos populr Tollet Perfume, made [the Bath It je ooollng adrevwling; on Cb o URandkerohlef and for g erlToilet niqe i lB dehghtfttl: ' iter ahavlog à ils ahipty- the very boat tbing t\u0026 U664, - Asi your Druggtst for if Accept n sabsttute I r r The Ore is nothùig qiliteý so0 ,ýetizing for Breakast a.\" Original arnian's Star Brand '~317an d Bacon. Iat the proent priccs rp - is nothing mrc enen tnOmnicaI. In- atons Sol irnan's Star Brand Olte",
         "42 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Pimples Co QuiCk, Sure Stuart's Caloium Wafers--Quiokest Blood Purifier and Skin Beautifler Ever Known. TRIAL PACKACE MAILED FREE. Thousands of people throughout the country owe the beauty and attractiveness of their complexions to Stuart's Calcium Wafers. Why not gain for yourself the blessing these have obtained? Skin disorders-except those caused by parasites-are also blood disorders. Purify the blood, and at the same time you drive out the pimples. Calcium sulphido, the chief constituent of Stuart's Calcium Wafers, is the greatest of blood purifiers, and is recommended by ail physicians. It converts the poisons in the blood into gases that the pores can easily eliminate. Stuart's Calcium Wafers will cure the most acute case of pimples, brash, blackheads and liver-spots in three or four days. Stuart's Calcium Wafers contain nothing harmnful to the systeml. You will never know how glorious it is to live until you have a pure, digorous, abundant blood supply coursing through your veins. -There are not only good looks, but health and happiness in every box Of Stuart's Calcium Wafers. Stuart's Calcium Wafers are convenient to carry and pleasant to take. Get a 50e box of your druggist. Mail coupon below for free trial package. FREE TRIAL COUPON F. A. STUART 00., 318 Stuart BIdg., MARSHALL, MIoh. Send me at once, by return mail, a free trial package of Stuart's Calcium Wafers. Name .................................................. Street...................................................... City..............................Prov.......................",
         "CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVEBTISEB a8 ~ GENUINE ON CREDIT Save moniey on y ou r Dîa mdaby bungrous re Diamond Imorr. TersPuodw.$,$ Weeky jWe guarantee you every n.hrantage in For Whooping CouU1, Ind Quality. Spatmod c Croup, Vrite t4\u003eUy fer Cauhogueglagsgs. d 1)amunc.toa. prt f Canada 10, n. at our Aodhma, Som. Throat, COUSekl BRS. DimoiImtera Coughs, Brouchitis, pt. E, 1S Toronto Arcade, Toronto, Canada. Ue rihy\u003es, Colda Catarr Ac a.leigsâta tios of Watsr. vimo1 Collars iv rJ a. As k - o a. \u0026Bd I INOTON 00 -0 -J-- A mUda, LUI. stor.0 or irect .. '.E AVcENUE irg. List ofNew Professional and Amateur, ays, Vaudeville Sketches, Stage Mono-. lues, Minstrel Material, jokes, Musical eces, Recitations, Dialogues, Make-op- :ods, etc. Catalog fre. L CO.,, Dept. 83 - Chicago. -.upie, sare and effectve treatment, avoiding druga. Vaporized Cresolene stops tii proxysma ofWhooping Cough and relieves spasmodic Croup at once. It is a BOON to sufferers frow Asthma. The air carrying the antiseptic vapor. inspred with evrybreath, maies breathing easy, soothea the more thotand stops the. cough, asauring restfui nights. Cresolene relieves the. bronchial complications of Scar- let Fcver and Measies and is a valuable aid.in h e treat- ment of Diptheria. Cresolene'o hast recommendation iisitsP y30r Of successful use. Send us postal for Descriptive Mo.kie. For Sale by a\u0026l Druggîsts. Try Creslene Antis p tic'Throat Tablets for the. ir. ritate throat, composedl o f alippery aigu bark, icorice, sgr and Cslene. Theyç4mntàargu you. 0f your druggist or (rom us, 10 conte in stamps. The VAPOCRESOLENE CO., Loming-Mi.s Building, Montre\u0026], Canada. TheLghBeî the LîghtBottle Laçer Purntand Be.t ?kdm tzz Il ARL of Oa 1",
         "CÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVEBTISEB IBRAND CÔFFEE tals 2 poun. 1- pulve G.t Good, Pure Wo.taVg jàér4litbifr off LigLior Weight \"CEETEE\" UNDERCLOTI IU AU Puire Wool -Ouarantse Unshîrinkabie Menis Eoonomy plus Cof@t Light weigIht is one of the mal reasons fo~r thle popularity \" CEETEE \" Underclothing. A \" CEETEE'\" garment will ke, vou warmer and more coinfortat than a coarser t1hpugh milch beavi garmjent. It is nitted on spec a machine~ the only machines pf the kcind Canada. IIt is knitted from the finest, pure î and Iongent wool otbtainab@, (Au Stralian Merino). Itis \"leconomy\" tobuy I\"CEETEE Better to spend $5.0 Oonce th' $3.50 twice. Worn by the But P..ope.-.Sold ÊY th Buet Deales In a sae8, for Men, V7e n hiie or i*a GALI 168 1",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER '45 l he best stores 1jou will bce offered to-day as the leadin9 brand of silver plate the saine make, ffat moi-chants of fui9 1 ears and more ago recommended i r bstorners. Il s uit te propeý tih'q Io start hosekeepin Nwith 1847 ROGERS B3ROS. \"Silver Plat chtWar$. SOld wilh en uilified gÀrane maclde possible bij the. -tual test of over 65 je\u003ears. At leading dealers. Seftd i\u0026 illusaadCzt\u0026ru F23 MERIDEN BRITANNIA CO., Llini.ed HAMILTON, CANADA MEIUDZ?\u003c, CONN. NEW YORK CHICAGO $AU FRANCISCO The World'a La4O.st Maie,. Of \u0026.rlhg 811v., and Plat",
         "46 CÂNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER The DOUBLE TRACK ROUT Service. Safety Speed ,y IFE Iy 00 TO CALIFORNIA AND AIL Pacific. Coast Points Floridai Texas, New Orleans, el Winter TouriTk.ts now on Sale, Stop-over privilege aflowed. The NEW WAY WEST Via the Transcontinental andi Grand Trunk Pacifie Railway aflords new scenery, new lnterests. Write to any agent of the Company for adv.rtiing matter, rates andi all particulrs T. BELL Traic Mmuger W. s Comfort Courtesy Convenience TOURI WINTER",
         "CANADIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVEBTISER 4' Coast to Coast Service Toronto to Vancouver, VIi PORT ARTHUR, FORT WILLIAM, SASKATOON AND EDMONTON Connections at Winnipeg Union Station for Calgary Prince Albert, Regina, Brandon, muid *11 impotant points in' weetern cma\"mi the. RPaif;cl c.a.t LEAVE TORONTO 10.45 P.M. Monday, Wedni.day, muid Friday ALL MODERN EQUIPMENT RELIABLE EXPRESS SERVICE Through tickets to ail points, and berth reservations from Local Agent or write to General Passenger Dept., 68 King St. East, Toronto, Ontario, or Union Station, Winnipeg, Manitoba. THE BEVERAGE of a. GENTLEMAN You cannot help feeling that it is a mark of discriminatio n, judgment and good taste when a gentleman steps up to the bar and orders a glass of Cr COS GRAVàe S (MiId Chili-Proof) PdALEtmm ALE In pint and quart bottes everywbere. ïh\u0026t . ~ For oëver haif a century, the Cosgrave Label has meant the bt\"for you. best in hop and malt beverages. (2-U)",
         ",48 CÂNADIAN MAGÂZINB ADVERTISER \"JULIAN SALE\" The namte beidthe goods isyour guarantee for the quality WARDROBE-ýI B-y the time you are reading this many -people will be \"arrangingy for the after- Holiday trip to, Bermuda, Florida, or JA..- San Francisco, to avoid 'the rigors of a Canadian winter, and a. part of the, luxury of the journey will be the con- venience and comfort in which you travel. A good introduction to it wilI be inhaving the right travelling re- I quisites, and amongst these the wvard\u0026' robe trunk -would seem tüo be almost açp iridispensible. And we have, a right to claim for the wardrobÇý trunks we seli that they are the best on the market todayinl points of appointments, capacity, conveniencé, strength, aotl4 appearance, and we would like to have you write. -us 'fd1r,~~ copy of the special Ward robe Trunk Bookiet, telling~,~ them. ~ flhc 'Rite-hite' Wardrobe Trunkp.. $3 3.00 to $75-00' The 'Berthýhigh'-Stçamer Wardrobe Trunks, $30.00 to $50-0 The Julian Sale Leather Goods Co., 105 Kinxg Street West, Toronto",
         "CANADI-AN MAGAZINE ,ADVERTISER 49 FORTNIGMTLY SAILINGS To 'J, 57-9 Granvîlle Street, -Halifax, N. S. Our ne\" \u0026OUokt \"Wintoe i the W.t mndi.. ùs interesting. Send for ii.",
         "50 GÂNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTIBEB VIA DETROIT Z,' CINCINNATU8 WHEN PLANNING. YOUR WINTER TOUR WHY NOT CHOOSE FLORIDA? The Attractions Are Unsurpaaaed. 13EAUTIFUL PALMI TR1E8-WARM SEA BATHING-ORANGE AND BA24ANA GROYVIS - GOLF - TARPON( FISHING - LUXURIOUI H0TELS FOR ALL POCKETS. TWO NIGHTS ONLY FROM TORONTO. WINTER TOURIST TICKETS NOW ON SALE. FAST TRAINS VEOI\u0026 TORNTO DAILY VIA CANADIAN PACIFIC MakIns DireeS Conneof nt Detroitt. PARTICULARS FROM CAwNwDIA PACwIC TICKET AGENTS OR WRITE X. 0. MIUBPHY, D.P.A., TORONTO. I",
         "CÂNÂDIAN MAGÂZINE ÂDVERTISER 51 By reason when in this of the shape motion tire cleans 0 lt- self of ail mud 'and slime. DUNLOP TIRE \u0026 RURBER GOODS CO., LiMited H..40«1\" - - . TRONTO\" Majoers Of Tir., for Autombile,, M4otor age, Ru -bber Belting, Patcking, Ho.., H00114 Mats, Tling, ad Gencral Rubber SpecialiuIn. L. TMB. t/\\.\"",
         "CANADIAN- MAGAZINE ADVERTISER E IN",
         "eqici \u0026, -to ring ofyour sleep 3IG BEN for the man who gets up in 'the morning to, keep his 'te with bis job, who \u003ces the clear, deep toned, anly call that's punctual a factory wyhistle. baby Ben for the womnan who tLnts a clock that's feminine in daintiness, businesslike in its rfornance, with an alarmn whose ntle cal! reaches hier ear only. baby Ben learned bis trade from Big Ben* and knows àt well. Both are hand- some, well designed, well made' well finisbed. ,They're as carefully inade inside as out, keep excellent tîme, and cal! at the bour $et. %1 1 \u003cBig Ben stands 7 înches tail, bas 4,q inch dia!, rings yow up witb one steady flive.minute cail or ten half-mniite calls at tbirty second intervals, Wrind him eyery nigbt, give bimr reasonable treat- ment, and he'll last years. \u003eiaby Ben is Just as fiearB Bg Ben' in quarier s1ze as aaythig coild be. Stand, 134 indies tall and does every -stunt bis big brother doe,. BeBn o, baby Becr, 82.50; in Canada $3.SO. 1o'l fnd temi at your dealer'.,. If he d,,, ,lt ýtock them a mocey order to thie factov wiJI bring either to you postpaid. La ~Western Clo'ck Co. LaSale ., u.s A. e, ri ofW.. frex",
         "r The Average Manj Can Go Higher Ifh keps b~is body strozig, bis brain clear and -inks! 4 FOOD contan body- and bIra'Q- (y\u003eH PA T i~I g maeria homDelig1tful - Refreshing Wheat and Barley scien- Cleaning - AntiseptiÇ tficlypeardafo MEDALS 38 AWARDS JOHN TAY~LOR CO..LTPD Ths Hrdt-et-Plces Ar no one hard-to-getat if there i. an 0-Cear olih M p inyour house. It gets ito evy crm ~itand leos not a speck of dust behind. (iMade I Canada L.TDU cutshouewok i haf. tio Io Oandl n tesDS IL N C N youto eac an whee, ighor owan i t m pico -' H FE F M"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Toronto : Ontario Pub. Co., [1916]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Monthly",
         "Index for v. 46 in v. 46, no. 1, CIHM no. 8_06251_273."
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ]
   },
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06251_276/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "doc" : {
      "text" : [
         "... . ...... elaw f. « Vil, 7à r-w M* 2JLý, fv le fî; K ý-'k 1 tvlî 94 eMý eN.. te.",
         "M M T HESEare the uses for which Ivory Soap Tis rseiaI uîted: For toitet and bath because it lathers freely, rînses vasily. floats, and dues flot smart or burri. For nursery use because ît cannot irritate the teniderest skin. For washmng fine fabrics because it cannot injure anything that water itself does flot harmn. For wa8hing dîshes because ît does flot roughen the hanis. For cleansing better-than -ordînary home furnishings hecause it cleanses thoroughly without injuring. Anybody can a5ford to use Ivory Soap for ail these things because it costs but five cents a cake. IVORY SOAP. 1.. 991400%PURE Iooq.. Soap is made in lhe proee \u0026 Gamble factos ai Hamilion, Canada. IM À",
         "CÂNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISERI alea, white or covered wvitn tollage paper. With blue or g cre4 mu.g wo-awok white; rugi,, plain dark bine centre with fural border; hanging,, dark bi.; picturea, eighterrith centur: 'poritiing peints or reproductiona of Gainsborough, Rc\u003e noldn or umne:. iippe,ïn date 'Dining Room Suite By the Toronto Furniture Co., Ldmileid S~Y A THING DWVINIELY DO!IqE BY CHIPPENDALE AND SHERATON\"-Andrew Lane, *furniture, that made by Chippendale is the mnost beautiful and practical, Beauti- ,cause of its delicate carving, graceful -t proportions and soft, deep-toned color- il because in everythingy pertaining to pendale subordinated al other elemÏents ructural stability. Il In our replicas of furniture, we have reproduced with fine feeling and admirable skill the beautiful simple chaste lines, perfect proportions, ninous finish that make the originals so Fhc very simnplicity which you admire in this Chip- iables us to produce it at a price at least no higher nded for ordinary furniture, lacking its distinction sh. We invite you to view this and other notable ne at the leading dealers in your locality. '0 FURNITURE CO., LIMITED ubinet Shops: 163-.187 DUFFERIN ST., TORONTO, C..n. STRUCTURAL DETAILS lined tra\" for lable xilver, Mýay ha i. witb or -ithoffl miror back. AUl drawvr have duFt1r,'xf bott oi. Talla - 54 i-e., 8 or 10 ft. extenaion. chi. C.laa-- may V b had with or with,\u003ent draw. 5aUM Talb - 22 ins. x 43 ina. W..i- Meaca noogw~, tiniahed antue,be to a d.11",
         "~1 The Canadian, Magazine Vol. XLVI Contents, April, 1916 A cAn % il - A Painting by Brtha Di)e Clayes(- THE GEESMAN WAR WOMA1.N . . Evi Maddi(enl STEVE CONODEN. FICTION- ,N WNTE ISTit. A PÂU\u003c'rae- - A HEOr IliTçtO y - - - - - - PiumsToA PAININ NCND RIil'IN»C UÂlVTÇ[IT: TmrE SPIUT 0F1 vu RAGE --.- A WOANq'S HI1AUT. A PLAY - - - TFiit MTTPC'NOF WENTWQRTIr Iis-DOViX Cip RovoE ;14 -T$ATX\" AN lIU'WÂLi, DAI-01TER----- TIIE DAM4CINO BEAul NIAN. FICTION MOVNT (IAVEUIl. A PMIOTOU;RAPH TUE Hlumouu ANI) P'ATIIOeý OF S-UPR-a ('UlRFZX\u003cT EVENTS,--- TutF TA13LEa TÂ-u-- - Twîcz(ý-Tow- TAuF --- Judith Kingdon Maurke Cullen M. O. Harnmond AT UTTAWA Day Allen Wi1le~ Howard Sornervil . . . .471 . . . .473 le - - 489 Prof. W. P'. Ni. Kenniedy Arthur fi, Phlpe - F'rank X. F'innecgaxi Q. Fairchild - - - - Ethel Cody Stoddard Ilenry Pearce - - - Lindsay Crawford - Book Reviews - - - Current Humour - - $2.50 PERZ ÂNNUMI. Including Great Britain, Ireland and most cf SINGLE COPIES, 25 CENTS. -491 - -496 -5fol -507 * -513 -516 -523 ---524 - - 529 . . . 533 . . 537 the Colonies. Letters contalning subscriptions Fhould be registered and addressed to The CANADIAN 'MAGAZINE, 200-206 Adelaide Street West, Toronto. Enropean Offices, 16 Regent, Street, London, S.W. 38 Rue du LurParis. Copyright, Canada, 1916, by The Ontario Publishlng Co., Limited. No. 6 i 1",
         "CÂNÂDIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISEB JX is the Beést Clweanser for Khalki IEN our gallant soldier boys go out for a route mardi, field exercises or for overseas service, they feel happy .omfortable if their khaki or woollen underclotimg lias washed with LUX. LUX Iea'ves woollens, khaki sweaters oi sock freais and cle. LUX \"Strafes\" D irt aH gocers Made i Canada LEVER BROTHERS LIMITE!), TORONTO",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZIE ADVERTIER Announcement. 4For May Mr. Charles S. Blue, who will be remnembered by his former spirited articles, particularly by the one entitled \"T'lhe Wooden Walls of England,\" gives us in \"John Henry the Spy - a sketch of a most romantic, adventurous and picturesque career. Historians have told us very littie about this strange individual who ýoperated between Canada and the United States a hundred years ago. Who was he? How came he to be employed as a secret agent ? What was the precise nature of his mission ? Why did he betray the trust reposed in him ? These questions are answered in this article of absorbing interest and historical importance. Ç Dr. George Bryce, whose articles on Stratheona have been widely read, wilI have an article dealing with early soldîering in Canada. The first haif deals wîth conditions and practices, and the second mnostly with the battie of Ridgway. g1 Now that the British and Russians are fighting in Asia Minor an article entitled \"The Garden of Eden Revisited,\" by Florence Withrow, is both timnely and interestingr. q1 There will be also, byAlfred Fitzgerald,an article dealing with an American University Graduate who came to Caiiada to work amongst the navvies along the northern frontier ; another by S. P. Macdonald, dealing in a most delightful and sympathetie manner with transplanted Scots in Nova Scotia, with, as weIl, a good selection of choice fiction and essays. $30 PER ANNUM. inclading Great Britain, Ireland «nd Most of the Co1oâW.s SINGLE COPIES. VI CENTS. THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE 200-206 Adelalde Street West - -TORONTO WAT RECOMMEND5 ITS5ELF? MELANYL rHw M\\ARKING INKe REQUIRES NO HEAT. WARRANTED INDELIBLE NEW METALLIC PEN WITH EVERY BOTTLE NICKLE LINEN STRETCHER WITH EACIi LARGE SIZE of \u0026Il Staliou.rs Cb.aistit mnd stores or Poil Free for One ShWling\u003c25c.) from the Inv.atom. COOPER DE-NNISON \u0026 WALKDEN L.TD. 7 r BIENGST.",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER L omoc 1_.o T \"THE TIMES\" says: *\"To the. housewif, of to-day, as to, ler mother, grandmotlier, and greit -grandmother, the. name of 'Horrockaies is a hall-mark of excellence and quality ALL OVER THE WORLD.\" Âwarded the Certificate of the Iaoerp.red lettte of Uygient Obtainable From Leading Stores in the Domnion For inCoroeaticn as to the nearest store wvhere pr- urabke apply to agent , NIR. JO [N E. RI TCIIIE, 41.- King'% Hlal Cliambern. St. Cathexire St Wea, ONTRLA . -J",
         "(JÀNIDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER iLONDON CLOVE COMPANY OHEAPSIDE, LONDON4, ENCLAND Direct Attention tu Tbeir Uwivalled Varictv of Brîtîtb Mlada Glora, at Their Usuial Nloderate Prics Th**ONAUHtr\" Ladis-. Bark Tan Cape Ladies' \u0026up.rlor CoiOs, Pique -ewn, Wool quauéty Coap. Oloves. ii~irw F., Top, liaiIla la i wilh tmp and Prea., lut- Tan Ki.es La\"a t esn Bou par ai sawf, 2Pras ~ oeskln C03es.. Sax to. pr pai 73C h.pe,. Sina sd Pr.,, Ladiee' StrOng DO*- ,ttu it u %1n sl.vea *:,,, it uoft fin 0! îp ïnsPiqua, Pi~ Iiw, in Ta n anliritush mnad. Giey Dsrh C tand Tan, PIr pair 51.34 JPr.55 13,iti5 BUesinl Buck vin- par pair 1 cents ieh V i qu e i-n, -1h -CAADAI.,Ladites uckain Wol Lining, Fiur PtSStS5Ci 5a Nlawalg la TImfau Tops, Writ Liard ~rUa~Prix -ain*slf -111 Pni..t. Fur, in i)ark Tanor j, le, Pa r 51S .0j Gry, (tgasat Writ, Strap, Ladi4ebol' e m.I eerskin andI Prasslfuon, alo 1),,k 'J'. and Dil, , Par pair S1.20 sean- -., Bitiah niJ 1IçXlutti', par p. ir S1.20 1 itt o st outart qual.5yy. Pri N arai ea , ak I nl i. PakGay ritish mtr par pair 8 1.44 \"dl@@' \u0026Irons CO*P ioes% lTan or Oa shata~tt ton, M'gt. idi Atm,,' llutSlSSplat PoIt, Prix sCamscen. per pai r 5 1.20 Ladies' UaAIAR Il Buk Finish n marna inl snbwl Taln or par pair 51I.44 *MIEN hLSYU8 Sten Deeekin 1 OuBl FinieS, ia Tan or Dnr!. U;re, l3ritiiub madIe, -rasan .en. 1 Pr\",. Iluttun, per pair 73 cents Fltel ieO, la Ta or,. di.! Glova for matIe, I rs Buttoit, par pair $1.03 ,-*aB *aiShf OtUscen a la i Taýn or Dar!. Gray, British mada. Prix 5cam sewn. 1 Prc-. But- t., ... par pair S1.44 Real Rolndser. The L. G. Goeaptiný.Baat Quality, Britiait made. 'i. ra.,hanid-sewn. *elf.q,wn Pointa. Vrry Spacial Value. In Tan or Grt,, 1 Button. per pair 52.31 Ladiates4s.t Quallty vsue Skia **Buck Finish\"; gleveu, Lincd Wý%' r;ist Liard Wh ta, Pur. Sa x shapI, wvit i Straý,pPrais liutton, in Doiaxr anl ,r Grcy ..... par pair S 1.69 Fur LIned Ladies' GoelIl. 61 Buck Finlah,99 in Tan or Gre%, LnId 17r. Piqua sawn, as illustration. 2 Pre,. Buttons,' pearpair S 1.34 Ladies' 8uperlor Quailty Chemvrette, Pur Lird thro.gbout, lElatic usa Wrist, ia B3rown or Bilasck, par pair $1.85 Fur Lisisi Laditel' iIJ555fl1kf4 'in Tan or (,rey. L inetI Pur throughout. Piquaaen Gucet Wri.t. Strap antI Pesa' Button. par pair526 MEIS SLOwES Streng Sap@, Prix searm sawa, Doubla Palmý, Wool Linin., in Tan or Blaik, Strap andi Prasa 18Dutton, a.il. tain Par pair 51.20 Mon'@ Sir.ng Catekln Cap. Oiees.. in Dar Tan us.!., meat - ith BCtQ.iyPrarlama Brat, Quaii Ae with Strap andI Pr.,, Button, a.i. uta lion. per pair 1.69 SUPLIPENTRY EPATNINTSLdi-*.MhL- nds Chiliden Hosiery 111111f £W utr May - e b.aiaeo. freeo. application te, tiha Ontario Publislsing C. . Ltd.. 200-WO6 Ad.1 fet.liaes. nld a I Internationsal Moitai Ordar, payable to THE LONDON GI lecera ftiet ff. f.Z \u0026 ad Mail .rdars carefufly xeaiuted and despatdsrd by nazt eta ZZ.r The LONDON COSY COMPANY, Chnapelde, LONI",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVEBTI8ER How to Choose Your New Spring Suit t the \"Egertoit Buirncttt Sty le Blook of' Spring oesa buticb of hà sty'le and mnaterial1 in comifort at home. Il is the hest way-4Ahe moniical way. \"RZoyal\" Serges are world.rernowned for their superb, tuit7, lasîil g newnless, long service, and moderate cost. The Styvle gDk shows the lalest fashions for Spring and Summrer,~ correct andu -omîpng. Also describes dresses, blouses, and coats -girls' and l s-ar an e' er ith book, patterns, and sel(f-sre nt fori, ilt is easy to obtain charmng. well'fitting gamient. *.rlals by the length for homne dressmnaking arc, also suppliedJ aud prices show a distinct saving. \"Royal- Serges cari he boutght froin to S3.90 per yard, double width-superior pure wool Fabrics that ke up well and look exceedingly smat. WVrite loday for the AA~ gerton Durnett Style Book of Spring Modes-, patterns, suId self- asurer-nent formis-mailed prosiptly and post paid to you whevrever jj 1reside, on application. lies' Costumnes as illustration, cut expres-sly to each individua1 J ron'. mneasuremnents, well-tailored sud finished m la high-class nanncrý ýhe \"Blackdowui\", \"Royal- Navy Serge, rich, permatient colour, $23. 40 duty and] carrnage paid to your address. Idres.: EGERTON BURNETT, LIMITED R. W. War.hou.e, Wellingtona, S.uame, E£agIand Tiix'OLD) COýUNrRY'. FABRIIS OF NIERIT ý-T BUSINESS YOURSELF Pascy (Gond,, Pust Carde.Daer.Tboesss \u003eewt-Iler:. Id. 3d. and bd, Bazaar G -id% Tovg. cry, Cudlery, etc, Sample cases £5 suc-i U.,rd, sent by Hl. MICHAELS \u0026 SON I8, Cromwell Hote 11gh Holborn, London, W.C. EEgISdJ ýAMMERINC orngcvtome poeitive1Y. Our natural .,etom. .stly nmeuI saturai spch. Graduat Pupils ber.. Write for fre advioe and literature, VOIE AENOTTr INSTITJTIEI U1EXLIN,4 - CANADA DRAWING FOIR MONEY Are yo. fond of Dra.wiy ? Fond- se.. .inn talent. un rm talent inta mone .earning diannels by learning bow to llsrae A fe.w monthe of your ispore time Wil it You for this Profitable work Ou reswr prepaea by 6 of the abent A rtiats on the. continent .-d s 1t thSo .d ason 393 YOtdGE ST., TORONTO. Oa k ey's SILIUI11IS' SOA? Oakey's Oake.y' 4WELLNGTOIW' UVE MOUSI a\" fet ci\"\"a P\"m catie\" Oa k ey's \"ELLiNGTOr' BUkR UI» Sa\" fer 3\"v«., Me. OA\"Ki,8 C0008 SOLD £YVYUIV)R JOHN OAICEY \u0026 SONS, LIMITE WOOhUas biglb LesOW\u00260 Eue. S.E.",
         "CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER CWANADA Put Y our Hand To The Plow!t Every fresh f urrow mnsgemir ces a or su de vi ro pnt Ui Canaa, Micased strengtb oteEpr n ue itr o h ge The faruieus of Canada are today playing an ail-important part in the Europe.. conflct. Hon. W. T. White, Canadian Minister of Finance, says: \"In order tq\u003e meet our interest payments abroad, sustain oui share of the hurden of thiewar, and promnote to thegeatest possible degree prosperity throughout theDoion it is the duty of a Canadian citizens to co-operate in producrng as iuch as posbeofnbeuca sed orsold. For Canada at this junctue the wath word of the bour should be production, production, and agan pouto. For full information rerding farmiat .pportunities in Canada write to - W. D. SCOTT, Esq., Sui:erintendent o! Immigration, Ottawa,Ca d. or J. OBED SMITH, Esq., Assistant Superintendent of Ernirain, 11 - 13 Cbaring Cross, London, S. W., England.",
         "2ANAI\u0026N liGZINE DVERT18EIZ rcouY MIN~ L UNQU PLAYRES mouaiNTMI4 reaiut 't' 1 TH _ _ _ __T OF MEWC JE S E N a ura R mr ineRT Galen flTt'*1f% N. J. New atone,r tepj il wp lw CLENDEINN IUWi't an_ y.dac I ~P.fo, 12.00 diiiy p., -uit. lUUZiatmWto Ill Modcal8aitaribm j in \"ý tres tit eCIr1t fy, hydriutier- ifM 1 a t,1-lno. et.lue à cuýure wmtre te.hi, \u003c\u003eine,,, h-tt Us insu t \" d d!eýýt Il.mm Il for, bu*lh ln -il3 drus Jaiso lin c i- p Ch p f t i . n ML BUTLERe '. _, box lur sofr car WF1tufo OraldurJ*au IOE NIEPEDEN ORDER 0Fmff FuORESTER fl Tes, Batifz eab , or MOUN -CheEN mene i ae fhstml.aiiy Iutu o eor to he me ebe oni atai in eveuîy Minr Mt M ..g M li. PoNde OfieL1Pal\"Jfrm ýî; gO BU LE aACH oar, f. G.a STEV NSO of.R TE PS.:UW oug. OR",
         "IETTERS of appreciation of the Canadian Magazine corne from far and near. One of the latest from a dis- tance is sent by Mr. A. H. De Wind, of Comber, County Down, Ireland, who renews bis subscription with this com- ment: déWe are ail of us very muck pteased with the Magazine and look /orward w:th great pleasure its monthly delivery.\" $2350 PER ANNLJM. Including (irem Britau,, Ireland and mout of the colonies. SINGLE COPIES, 25 CENTS THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE 200.206 Adelaide SL W/est TORONTO. ONT.",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER il F or Sore Mus cles 3prains, Cuts, Bruises iere is an antiseptic yermicide and liniment- me that is healing, cooling and soothing- Ibsorbine, Jr., is more than a gerin 1cide, nore than a lîiuiiment-it is both. ht means wrompt relief from aches and pains-it O B cceps littie cuts and bri ses from becoming w emething more serîous. TUAIM4IBS. R L Al E ,. e specially good for children's hurts because it is so armiess and safe to use made of pure hierbs and ontains no acids or minerais. t is needed daly in and about the home-for the Ujmerous littie hurts that corne througb work in the itchen and about the house, the stable, the gaLrage and i.grouinds. Use and prescribe Absorbine, Jr - wher- ver a high-grade liniment or germicide is indicýated, ~o reduce inflamnatory condi1tions-sprains, wrenches, ainful, swollen veins or glands. 0ô reducebursal enlargements and infiltrations. Absorbine, Jr_, is a discutient and wSolvent. 0 allay pain anywbere-its anodyne effect is prompt and permanient. o spray the throat if sore or infected-a 10% or 20% solution af Absorbinec, Jr, i. uuling and soothing and will destroy bacteria. o heal cuts, bruises, lacerations, sores and ucers. ýsed by athietes the world over as an inrigorating, antiseptic and soothing rul\u003e. C)%n-keeps muscles right and prevents second-day soreness and stiffness. Absorbine, Jr., is concentrated, requiring only a few drops at an appli-. Wakejohson cation and retainiiig its gerniicidai powers even wbeu diiut.d one part tb, f-. Y. Absorbine, jr,, te i0,0 parts water, ,Ç,-A IM-1 orIT IKJLLS GIERMS 01,* Mwd 1 ave vidcýý-a forty.egbt page boaklet. giwe. ruoitie, doýarcq*, emphatie cV;eno of wbat mme a-i Absorbine, Jr.. bas done and will do. Thi% bMdke. Lthebr -xth dttait taoate repotis. iý f fro, thr b. ak;ng, AbeorbinC J_ . n old b'. bading dnagzgi.t.a ýýf ~. hal a cot3. or sent dire.t, aIl chargr, paid. A Liberal Trial Roiule 'to V. F. Young, P.D.F., 187 Lyman's Bidg., MontreaLCan. rjé,st arMe \u0026*tir na anae. (mrin 60 T. fadd.,ga, u",
         "1! CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVEWRTI8ER STAN DREJ W'S IEA Resilent al Mnd I)ay\u003e SChootl ~J Lfor. Boys. Upper arud Iower C O L LG E shools. Boys' Prepared for TORONTO ONTARIO M ticlt at the U.ni er- The Cle WOnI firSt plACC R.M.C. Entrance Examinations 1915. Sumsusr Tsous Commesnces AprIl 2Sth, 1916 suiîes ; tor entranice auto the Roy» al MilitaUry College, anid for B3usiness. C alendar contaîning partttivla'rs sent oin application. )v. DBrwuMc dncdMALD RJDLEY COLLEGE ý'-i\" f'b -«c.ý-Vsýxpo ml b Si._C.dwrinu, Onst. 193\" oti 1914. RV.V J. 0. MILLER. .- L ST. MARGARET'S COLLEGE 144 DLOOIN Sl?. IL, TOR\u0026OJTO, ONTAILIO A R«idntial and Day School for Girls Foundcd by the late George Dicksot, NI. A., lormvcr Principal of Up1'er Canada CoIlege, and Dr.ickson Academic Course, from Preparatory to University Matriculation and First Year Wvork, Music, Art, Don.stic Science, Physical Education-Cricket, Tennis, Basket Ball, Hockey, Swimming Bath. Wvkt for Proapectiu MER' G\u003cRGE1 fICKSON, MISS J. E. MACDONALD., B.A., pri.ciw.",
         "CANÂDL\u0026N MAGAZINE ADVERTISER I't FORTY..NINTH YEAR A Church Rmsidential and DRY School For Girls Nt\", Buildings-Batu hcalthym t-otc ,t acapLr 'ui , W-1o t,, Mati ulatin, Cur Poesidest. The Right R.sd- The Loid Bshop ciTsrqw. .I\u0026M Vic.Pm.cial.Mise Nation. M. A. (TeyÇok\" Truly Helpful R ~ 3( Environ ment 10El Aeue Roeae oot or your daughter at the period wben A4 RKSIDMNTIAL AND DAT SCUOOL FOR CIRLS er character is being formed, 1N Pxa cr,1 ý ii\u003csa %l. T. Se\u003c Nai I 181ET1 M .S Kt Krt 1 , M.A. * g Preparation for the University anti for _____ examinations in Mui.Art anido.U Science Departtnentun. Thoroughly efficient For prospectuis and term9, write sat ag ~gon, ud~rae the Prilicipai tens bak(al11 rinlc. HealkhfutIcal R .WARNER, M.A., D.D., Primnary School for D)ay Ptsplis ST. THOMAS, ONT. 'O RSoCM APYe '1MPRNIA HOP? BETHUNE COLLEGE, OSHAWA, ONT. A O GRSCOI \"r.ation for Uic Uniyersity and for the exam;.atiws of t, Toronto Coamoevatoey oflusc 'U\"\u0026C\"illren a .iýved. e Musial repartinoen (Pao, Tho ad Hamoy ýl h, -der the~- ni a Master and oi a Siata. -h,, for ycrsugti te SchooJ with marked suoeoea cecluewlll bc iu charge oi a qualified risitren. ouadpatici spis te the SISTEU IR CHARGE, airte TRIi SISTEAS OFST. JU TRI HV,11IB Reil.. tTOBOIT0. IbN Matraret LEaton Zcbool of Ilterature anb Erpreeeton ute S eet, Tomainte. 11- e\u003c. Scott RKaNf Pvikia. r3S.1h Lterature. French and German, PhsclCulture. Voce Culture, Kfterpretatjon. Oratory and Publie Sp8 dg and Drarnatie Art i)HBURY COLLEGE Rockcliff Park, Ottawa RESIDENT SCHOOL FOR BOYS Modern Fireproof Building. Pure Water Stzpply. Smnali Classes. Gyninasium. Cliapel. R. M. C. Entrance 1914, ail candidates pasaed, one fi-raI place. Caed-raPPIY:~ Re. eo P. Woolkcomb., M. A. (Oxon.) Headutr ttawa Ladies ColiegePr.-tySntyfte OUJthL eve odrn ovenc ,mic work up to the. first year university, music, art, domneatie science, physical cuilture Th'is is one of the inost up-to-date collegea in Canada and possesses ail the advantage of a uce in the Capital. For Calendar Appl, M.- R.y. J. W. Fi. MqiIUe B. Ai. D. O,, ProIsidet. VJ. Robetàsn LL.. D., C. M.G., Cha1rmmnofard.",
         "14 CANADIÂN MAGAZINqE ÂDVERTISER A BOARDING SCHOOL FOR BOYS iHnmaster-A. G. M1ainwarii), %I.A., Trinify College, Citribriige. I4ousiater-J. J. Siepiheris. MN.A., Duiblin University. Visitoer The Lord Bithop of Ontario. Separalo houises for Sonior and JunIiLor Boys. The School groutids cover 24 acres. R.eet R.M.C. Suc....: 1913, 4th, 6th, 7th, ilth, 13th places; 19)14, 31'd, tt, 7th, Sthpacs BROC-KVILLEP R. N. C., 1915, 1%, pl1ace, FOR PROSP'ECTU(;S, ET7C., APPIlY TO TffE HEA*ý-DMA.,STEbR. Trinity ColleeSchooI PORT HOPE, ONTARIO Rosid.ntial Church School for Boys Covcoed Ri.k. foý ared ,rb Uve.tuRyal MhUtaey Colk-e F(,t Clda pply to thc liradmamtai- REY. F. CRAIAU SOCHAI, M.AL (CM,\u003e jLatc Hoad--ater St. Alban . SdioolIrcvI. Royal Naval College of Cal, T HE next exami4ustion for the, .atry of tres of the, Civil Service Commission in 1916, sucessftil canddats jilin the. ( on or about ist Âugust. Applications for will b. r.eeived up to 15th Apif by the tary, Civil Service Commission, Ottawa, whom blank entry forme cau now b. oi\u003eq Candidates for the. examlnation ini Ma3 mnust b. betweeu the. ag8 of fourteen au teen on the. lit July, 1916. The, sciieme of training at the Collego is on that in force in the, Englisii Naval CI at Osborne and Dartmouthi, but it in noi pulîory for caes to follow a Naval 1 wiien tiiey bave completed the course, Jues tiiree years. McGill aud Toronto 1C sities allow the. College course to count 1 year ut the, Sceonce School. The Admirait tuke a maximum ot 8 cadets Anually ln Royal Navy, wiiere the, psy aud prospeet@s b. identical witb that ot cadets vii. have into the. Navy from Osborne and Dartmo Furtiior details eaut b. obtalud on a tion to the, undorslgu.d. G. 3J. DESEARATS, DeuyMWniteo-thet Nâial S Depart-e.t of the Naval ei. Ottawa. Januafy 111h. 1916 UJnauthomozd publication of tij advertiseenwillu -ai for.-901,94 HOME STUDY Arts Courses only SUMMER SCHOOL IUly a\" QUEEN'S U NIVERSIT KINGSTON, ONTARIO ARTS EDUCATION MEDICINE SCHOOL 0F MINING MININO CHEMICAL MECHANICAL CIVIL IELECTRICÂL ENGINEERING GEO. Y. CHOWN, R.glstrer.",
         "CANÂDIÂN MÂ\u0026GAziNi ADvERTISER 1 ~SECURITY HIRSt HUNDRED AND THIRTY-SEVEN DOLLARS Of Assu for cvery $100 of Liabâities. 541513S ONE REASON WHY YOUP SI-OULD INSURE IN C AC A THE INSURANCE COMPANY WHICH L PROTHCT YOUR DEPENDRNTS FOR Y YEARS AFTER YOU ARE GONE. o ý ,- qk I ply to-dayfor a Mot tl) Incvme Policy 4SIOE UVUI OLDG., TORONTO, CAN. The Royal Military CÀ'oliege EZE\u0026 feu' national Institutions or more value and Iate.st to the. country thonu the. Royal Mlitar' Collèg of Canada. Notwithataadint this. its object and work it is aucomplaigaeDtOfilnl undertoo bYthe ieerai pié-o 'ii Colge a Ia Goverament lJLtitutiOn. die Primrnazti frte purpose of giving ructIon ln ail branches Of rnilitar\u003e science to cadets and officera of the Canadjan Mliua. \u0026et It correspondu to Woolwicii and Sandhiurst. r. Commandant and militar\u003e' Inaructors are a»l offlcers onA the* active lUst of thie liliperial iy, lent for the purpos., snd tiiore la ln addition a complète staff of profa»ors for the aujecta whIlch form aubli an Important part of the Collège course. Medic\u0026l att. nus. Lo-rde4. YMI et thie Collège la orgtnized on a strtl militar\u003e' basis. the. Cadets recelve a prac.. aud.seientifle training nsbet sete to a~ sc n oer dcai hoa cours. Includes a tiiorougli groundlug ln~ Jithratoes, Civi Engineering, Surveyinjç, gics, Ciiemistry, French sud Englsh The strict discipline maluntained h Coleège lis ont of the miont valuabie features of 5oune.and lnaddition, the, constant Practice of gymnastice dill and onidoor exerclee. il mmus, onsue he su ad excellent physcal condition. ... .1d annuaIl\u003e'. 'ho iploa ofgradation la considered b\u003e' the. authorites conducting the exzanlation Dominion Land Surveyor An b. equivalent An a University' degree. and b\u003e' the Regulation ie Law' Society' of Ontario. It obtains the marne exemptions au a B.A. degrueo 'h. i.ngtii of the. courue la three yerg, ln tiire. termset f 9monthas each. ltotal coet of the course, incudn baria unIfornt tntutous material. sud \u0026Il te la about $800. hoe annal competitive examnation for admission to the Collège takee place ln May' of yaar at the headquart.rs of the seversi militar\u003e' district*. or fwu atca regardlng tufs exaniination and for any Otiier Information. applica- mut Roa ~tr olgt'c hMltaCud.tawa, Ont., or toi.Vm.",
         "CÂNADIÂAN MAGAZINE ÂDVEETIBEZ Must have a Ck Do not postpone the. open- ig of a savings account siroplybecause of tihe smnall- fCss of your irst deposit. Ail things must have their begunnig. The big things of to-iay were the little thinga of yesterday. W. have man\u003e' large accounts which have grown to their present proportions gradu- ail\u003e' frein ver\u003e' mail be- ginrnngs. For ibis reison we cordially wekcoie the depouit of:a dollar, knowing thii in most instances the incentive to sive, and the regular addifion of intiest, wfll ensure a steady inces. in the balance at the depositor'. credit. You may deposit by mail. Canada Permanent Mortgage Crporation TroUTiro sTrRKT, TORONTO . ........ . ........ ..... . M' 77 M7 ' L I O/ Investment £mbodym hroe metil neqrd 6Yca fui andé.W4UOOBtr safUe, Proflt. MOUSY am yoUT attenio is directd tu an xeon\u0026, I0oc 7 nes inpaeo 3% that you are tino Tliom Bo\"c carry ahoolut il[. a u .a..tid intes of 7% pet amamu. and th rf4 of withdrawig aIl orany part o 7ou inuutm atany tîme a.hor uneyoawon 60 da oltice. $500 and $100 cc, and ae a tY.\" Mttable, and alord au uzCIlutopmtoU fo te. iav.1m oro. a imE una $ui fMuoe Write (ot fllE particulars tu htiOiiI SecuillosCo CONFIMIRATION LIPE BUILDING TORNTO CANADA MUTUAL SERVICE mREMiatual eo4.ovoras t. a th lrest amoun t of V ', ctio fortheleaiL The Mutuail isan Odinle@t t.a.TYO lite CcomPa*i,estRbl' .4.on the baula of i.utualitY. The. Mut..1 âoea not reamyt oeodollir of ils hui~zm1.ari for Oiiaftiiold«0' 41iens The. Mutuai ia a demociatic orui iztion~ owned and admin- Iutered by ite p.Icholders. The. MutuaUot a1,SaItyFirst\" Coi*pamny nd putt aecuilY b'e- logo .ver otiiot coemaldralion. dia. Company estabie o th. basi of mnutualitY. limitei poymi.mt lige, and en- âowmSt p10100. The Mutual Life of Canada WATERLOO. ONTARIO",
         "UNAùA IUU./.NI AI) A r- --- -- 1915-A RECORD YEAR 1-OH THlk LONDON LIFE INSURANCE COMPAj\u0026NY LONDON, CANADA New Business Written. Gain in Business in Force. Increase in, Cash Income, ini Assets and i Surplus. Ail reached High-Water Mark i 1915. Profits to Policyholders excerded Estimnates oee-hird and a tunther increased scale gor5 lrl r6cct for 19 10. The following comparative sîaiemnent shows the excell1ent progresi mnde in rrceut ),cahs: 1909l 1911 19)13 19l5 k.sursancein Force ...... ..... $14,189.613 $20.37.984 $27.118 375 $38032 iasurance Intadý .., ..... 5,011.227 7.36,18 U3 8.828, 19 MI) 605 1T0101 Asset, ... ..... 2.927,055 3.589).797 4.64S,695 6.075M23 Pobcy Rerve ........, ., 2M57.513 3.27S,016 4.2M6.152 5,459.242 Ptenium and Intereit Incomne ,.. 754,307 959,185 1,295.840 1,,2 2 R~ae o Iwe*reEaroied * . .. 6. 57k 6 . 6,S 6 . 81 7.0s Ouar -Emd.wmeut st Life Rate\" is one reason for the remarkable pbogress of the Comp.ary FULL1 1INFOP.MA TION GLADL Y f*FVUO REQUEÉST JOHN McCLARY DR. A O JEFFERY. K.C, IGC RICI4TERF.A.S E E RED. HA ,A iA pr\"i\u00261 %I.aget A,, Maa.f«T Aciuwy BOND OFFERINGS Luis a/ bonda wiah we offer sent on appicSation. Eitery Securltu posa. eaises the qualitie., essentiali n a jound hwvealmcnl, combining SAFETY 0F PRINCIPAL AND INTER EST twWa THE MOST FA VORA BLE INTEREST RETURN. Oovernrnent -municipal Oorporation ancd Proven inous'triai Boncis. YliId 4% to 60%, W. aoli bc pleosed Io aid WU n thlie aulectwn al a de3irable unvr,51menl, DoeMOft SECURf s CORPORATION - UJ¶ITED firve (rnim fadai blemlý,% and wlith a clcar. ioft, rcarIv-wl ikupen (biat wV11 lie the crnvy of yotur friends. Gouraud's Oraiental Crean dosti, tefha.fy 1 Yrt 10 %Oti , l Vm iLS 1n carmot . ewfrd N4 e,à - x M e I..-01l , . 0 l,1 e.1. 1)I\u003e « . iloiK1IS \u0026 S1ON 3\"4 Wgst St. Pl' St- M-mtrcal. Qure, I 1",
         "('AN1AL\u003e)IA N MAGAZINE AVVER11SER THE ROYAL BANâK 0F\"'iý C ANAÀD A SaPItal Autbodzed $ 25,00,0 S«W»V FUIIS 13,23,000 Capital PalIS Vp -11,Sf0,000 Total Asut. - 0,0,0 HEAD OFFICE -MONTrREAL DI RECTO RS SIR IER BERT S. IOLT, Pridmf EL.,PEASE, Vi\u0026Pruf4mtu K I B JOIINSTON,IC.C,.*u4ifl.*dMet Vile7 Sukh Ho-, Dâvid Madem G, R. Cr.w. jante R.iucod A. J. Brown, K, C. D. K. Elot« lion. W. H. Thora. 1f ugh ?atoç, T. J. Dnuamd Wm, Roberta.m C. S. wilco W. J\u003e Shefflrd A. E. Dyuent C. E Neil Executlva Offleors. EL. %Ier anagi,,g Directu E. Neill, Genetal Manager W. P. Torrawf, Sitperntendrrit 4t Br.och\"e F. J, Shermtan, Amdtart GetexaI Manager 828-BRANCHES THROUCHOUT CANADA-SUS Ako BranhesinCubaPto Rio omncm Rap.blk, Costa Rica. Antigua, Bhrées, Domiçs1a Gmaaamjaaica St.Kitt, Trnid DanBahama admds Brdtu Guiaaansd Btish Honduras. LOU, m D ank Bidesn., Pinte\u0026 St.. E.C. NEWYOR , William \u0026Gd Cudar St. SAVINOS DEPARTMENT Be,%NWU peu-go mpIff- T$aW R» l'un and udo\" PSfit - 7,248,140 a lindhg fr.rm l ho Adlant tutIho pAcôfr. 8avîms Deswt t at au Branhes. D*vaq remvd d $10 .\"o mmd pwmJ -md ioloeet .11-,md ai b\"i cu\u003cvrM rate.. Csoemi D..\u0026iu us.m The Report for 1915 of The Gra~etLIfe AsNur- anjCe moTp~1 prntW int and will he mailed to anly iii- tvrvýtted peniori on request. It rcord a eMr Of ri'Markah011 ~wcce -~scCe~ Iouded pon twenty.bree yar'i of remuark- able REFSLT 'IS TO l'O 1 1C Y 111.1)1 1R S Ov er $11 (),0)00,00X0(i 1 iisuirance is nlOw held In force by THE GREAT-WEST LIFE ASSURANCE CO. Head Office Winnipeg",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE VEL1R Many Benefits cone, to the Depositor ini the Saihg Department Toronto of The Bank of The. atndly inoueating balance rives a feeling of con- lentaIent and satisfaction wIi thi. presnî. and aiso givra as3urance tisat want cacnot inva\u0026e tb. uncertain future. Thei kno'wIedge that The. Bank of Torooto ta meroog and scurt, witii the experience of slxty yes, and la carefully maaaged, riveu$ cettainty that a\u0026H onoy en- trutd to its care will b. safely guardd and cao b. ha4 whcn rcquirtd. luterest ia added to all balances evcry bail year. Deposehoes in thi, Bank receiv. rvery coun.esy anod such assistance in thhir bmnklug as may bc required, Paid-up Capital Remeory Funde 6,439,382 YOUR BANKING ACCOUNT AND BUSINESS SOLICITED",
         "Nowýrth Am--eýrican LiE e New Business issued during thie year 191 5 exceeded that of the previous y car Sby One and a QU-arter Millions. Total Business in Force at Decemiber 3 1 st, 19 15, amounted to over $5 69200,000. FRO1SFEROUS. Net Surplus hetd on Policyhiolderis account increased durirg the year by $385,927, and now atnowiîs 10 over $2.50.000. whiir As5eta aniunt t0 ovr S$15,7 16,O00. q hli sa Pollcyholder9 Comnpany. A *SIld as the Continent~ Pollcy ia s..k and profitable one tobholJ. Nortbi Ainerican LiUe Assurance Comipany U~ N~T P ..\u0026.i , lN ~t 'd %M,. ,;\" o",
         "'rhe Canadian Mîagazin",
         "IronItm jiU~ \u003eI~rh~i~~~a AIl cirrlrd seene in the Ani)apolis4 Valley. NovaI -cOtia.",
         "ANAIAN YIALiAZINE TORONTO, APRIL, 1916 N. 6 'HE QL\"«RIvAN WAK WOMAN 3, wlien 1 wus reiident Lt for we11-borzi daugh- iany, that 1 was aaked question, strauge in e more se by the. ag er. rag up and down the It was a pretty, 4oId world scene the anclent village witii ita red roofs and fainous eiiurch at Our teet, the wooded hills for our background, snd, beyond, acrosa the valley, the, turreti of the old custi. of a town whleh to- day la full of English prisoneru. Peace was everywhere, ln the. gar- den o! girls, ln the, summer breese swaying the, fruit trees of the. ter- races, in the cackle of the, wanderlng fiens, in the voles re-citing Shake- speare in a distant clasroom. Had anyone told me that aught wa going on about me otiier than the. or- dlnary life of the, iappieat schol imaginable, 1 should have laugiied in derislon. Yet the, war has revealed te mne tiiat there, in that innoeent spot, were working ln secret tiiouo tiiougit-out procees wicb were auun- ing to, mû.e actual aud triumpiiant the. great German drea of world- empire. But as I, an ulneikw uotiig whatever o! Imperial serts, MýiC",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE I was more than startled by Herba's question. \"Do you think,\" she asked mne, as she strolled by my erido, \"that lb in rlght to break a commandment, if by so doing you cau aid smre goulus (this w.. ber English for superman) in a greut work of acievemenb 1\" Astonished, 1 buru.d and fac.ed iier, bo ueo a ioveiy girl of sixteen in a pale bine Kummer govu, her soft throat outlined by a lace-eed kerchief, one bond fingeriug a rfid dimity apron, dsrk ebestnut hair swept back froin thes noblest face I know or, ratiier, kn.w (for thai Herba has been oblit- erateâ\u003e, aud falling lu two iieavy bralde almo.t te the hem of ber akirt -the, very visual embodiment of the (ierman berolue of my former rom. antic novels, sud as well the. daugiiter of a vry olfsboned, orbiiodox When preied to explalu, shé chsuged the, fom of ber luquiry, firut aking meif kraft (tiat s,power) were not tue ilghest goal of effort, achievement the. prise. \"Good tiien,\" oh. went on, \"what 1 ssk lu this: If a youuggirl, suohas I amn, founcl out that by any act sha oenld inerease the. power of a \u003cJous, even il tuat at were to be to ]ive with hlm, tiiongb b. lxad a wite, wouldn't ahe b. dolng more for tue woYrld, more for ber country to perform it, than by keeping a commandmently I b.d neyer been asked sncb ques- tions by girls of uixteen and seven- teen, and, buerefore, wiien tue ides, kept cormlng to me, açain sud again, lu the. b.d-tlxe baika in my roomn, lu the dicuions lu tihe garden, about the winter stoves, Itried tofind out *iiure lb iiad starte-d, but witiiout suc- eess, Herba putting me off wlth the. anever tiiat ah. had read of aueh ideas lu a Russian novel. Nor could I combat lb with appeals te Lubiieruzi teachings. \"W. go te eiiurch because w. must,\" mid eue, \"but we fiud tuat kind of religion very fbolish aud suited to old ladies. Nature lu our religion.\" Wiion preamed on this point, tbey told me that thie foresa were the. true cathedral of the. German, uand, in fact, 1 dlscovered several of tiiese girls, et difforent times, standing wrapt and silent in the . alte. of Odin's \u003c\u003e1\u003c for'- \"Religion,\" sud Herba, \"is for the weak. Men are not weak, and, there. fore, biiey have no need of lb. Nor have omre wornen,\" ohe added. \".My fatiier isorthiodox, 1 know, but Imrus feels 1 feel.\" Ths went on ti strange $alk, snd, evea' tiien, I flt about me that riBiixg of smre unseen leaven. I know now that lb was the évolution of tii, Qerman War Woxnan, that woman who bas thrown ail iii. posesses into, the, maing of tue Im- peril kraft, dreaming of that world- empire achievement, frou\u003e the. senti- mental girl of the. peusionata who dreamed of thieacrifice of herself lu the service of tiie superman aud wio, artificially, by suggestion sud educa. tiona kilwas being ained tobe torin l tht gigantie (Jernian acharne to accompli world domiuloei, bT making, as Frank Vanderlip put. it in bis \"Business and Education,\" each individual member of the. corn- monw'ealth the. most efficient of indus- trial and économie nits, 'tue gréât- est artlficlal experimout, iu patniotim the. world bas ever seen, an attempt r.ndored abortive by the. war aud whiose ultimate posibility the. world cau neyer now know.\" ginning o h rnfraino idealistic you-ng girls into war wmn busy over p'ropaganda of the. war spirit snd iiate; into spies, op.rating before my eyes, even lu my hiome. in buhe Italian clty wiiere 1 later resided; int commercial, indutrial, social agents of tiieir Geverument. giving tiiemselves, their talents, their boueur, breaking commaudments, if uéecury, for the. sake of that power aud acievement about wiiich we b.d talked in the. quiet old gardon. The whole story i. lik. a novel, snd",
         "TUE GERMÂN WÂR WOMÂN ben pâmsions cool IL will live as a ro- ance of womau's blind devotion, )wever futurity may eâtimate its orslity. That the impulse was education4l ,ere eau ha littie doubL Of al nds, Germany alie aaw what power % for a nation in the achool-master. er trade sehools, lier educational ad- ,ntages commercially, lier continuous ade achools, ail were directed te- irds the one end of elevatiug Ger- Bfl7 as a power. Siuce the Kaiser owed endiesa interest i them ail, i. hardly possible that a girl's pen- muat, drawing pupils from every -tion of his Empire, was neglected. Sthat the better te understand tbhe tr woman and lier work, let us lin- r s moment longer in the garden. On the balcony, that day, as I aaid, us aitting the Countea. von Moltke. )w and then se diseussed the Ger- mi woman with me. 8he was diaeeuraged,ý iu thosa days, thi the German woman ever slaiig r shaekies, and she told me a story berself to illustrate. ~'Il lid dreams once of bettering 1 ng,\" 8he conflded, \"and thouglit it, wlth my name, I miglit influence mudards. 1 looked at lier inquiriugly, but aok ber Ihad. irh. Kaiser had interfered, sh. told -Wh.n the Field Marshal died,\" w eut on, \"lie left his old bomne as esidence for my sisters and me. Lt in a garrison towu, and, as we are ne of us young, 1 eutertuiued the sa Of mailng social lite essier lie- em German men and wonien. A in, yen know, youig Gerinan men i eut off freux desirable female so- ty by the fact that attentions are :en te imply a desira for marriage. r idea was te have ouir time for nking ceffea like au open reception, ing taose young officers, some al- et boys, a littie teste ef home lite. ,w they did love to corne!\" she aiied entliuaiastieally, II ud at plasure for us to have eakes and coffee ready and te enjoy their lively company. Lt was humaaxizing, tee,\" sha added, \"anud good for themn. But, ene day, came a message froin the Kaiser: 'Unmarried wemen did not receive officars unchaperoned,' lis Imperial Majesty would remind us. Our naine was a German heritage, our lieuse, national property, sud so it auded,\" ah. added aadly. Agan he told me how, when for ecouemy 's sske, she, not being ricit, had travelled once .eco.ad-clsas message lied corne quiekly from Wil- liam (evideuce that his spies vere everywhere) to inforx lier that, as she lived in the. Field Marahal's lieuse, for the. boueur ef Germany she must travel always flrat-clam. lie did net, 1hewever, offer te pay the diffwr- ence. Her various male relatives were a\u0026l in the army or uavy. Oue, of vliom 1 heard lier speak, vas that young man, killed i oue ofthLe battles of Ailgust in France, hâi bead being blowu te pieces, whe vere, uader bis uniform, a suit et armour witii the V'on M.%oltke arma embeoffed on it I'hat the. work of masterinq details of the lifaet fther countries for cem- mericial or military ends must have led its agents te the pensienate, I corn- clude freru the tact that one day, un 1903, a certain person, iu autlierity i the aeliool, (lrw me aside aud asked me to go aleug the village atreet, stop the. postuxan, and ask hlm for the lettera coming te a certain Englieli pupil-teacher. I was then to open and read them, reseal and slip them i with the, other letters, *heu later the petanan slieuld arrive at the pensionat, The contenta ot the letters I vas te report, since, I -u tOMd, 'it was desired to know if the. Euglisli girl were happy. But wliy, I iuquired, vas I, a stranger, selected fer such a taêk, snd vliy, if they wishe-d te ascertain iu sueli a fashien if the. Eziglieli girl were hiappy, did4 they not read the. letters that she liersel! wrete, and not letter eomiug te lier!",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE For answr 1 wa told thai ber family woul'd comment on ber confi- denes auad that 1 waa asked because, white they all knew English, I alone could underutand tiie Iit.tie id lois, and tho\u003e wanted to unfdertand ac- euratel\u003e'. Upon my declilnng politly\u003e, on the. ground thai Amnericani standards did not sanction the opening of otiier people 's lettem, no offence was taken, but1 wapatted on theback and told tt 1 waa a dear, goodl cid, and tt after al] wliat dld it inatter whetber the Engliah girl were or were not bappy' t 'Piatit dld matter, I bave realized since the war, for lie Euiglih girl wu tie dau\u003cbt-er of the Britli vice- consul ai Dunklrk, Franc. and the. letters I wua to read camne dircti\u003e' frein British beadquarters i tie ver\u003e' F~rench town go craveýd for by Wil- liam. Tiiere were many otiier English woinen and girls redent during my sta\u003e', but 1 wa asked to inspeci lie letters of oui\u003e' tbis one. The. girl lis'. self was made muci of b\u003e' all; sie wus aked as guest te mny of et hir houses, and easier termes were made for ber for' a second year. Coming and going frein is Pe- sionat was a certain Herr Profesor, occupying smre off0i.la position i the \u003covernmeMn mabls. Ther\" waa a resi- Odent, a eti e pailti andri aud old teacbeea, whoee brothr a abhabit of cominq andgoing to and frein Belgium. often wiii bis close friend. a young Alsatian inember of a fmil whchflgured in the. Dreyf!us cas. TibIoter bad ne business i Delgium, but b. made bistrp purel\u003e' for plessure. Tii. sister, wh was kindness ibseif, finIt iniereted me in German bistory. At tiai Urne I was writing books for cbfldren on aàked me to chiange from ngls to grou)\u003e ail clauoured for me to wrt a book for American girls on hbeir beloveýd Queeu Louisa. Wben ni\u003e pub- iher agreed, endiess was tie help given to me b\u003e' every girl, and when the bock was under discussion, the, Hlerr Professor had me informned tt he would wuse tiat my bocks should b. inircducecd into certain Gerinan qObOOlR. Aimost dail\u003e' girls of tie utrong pro-Germsan par\u003e' (lier. as in the. scbool tie cuit of the. English, as fasi. ionabie, and alao the. cuit of ever\u003e'. tblng Qerman, and Kaisrlick, such as th. new speliing) aaked me viether if a war came beiween England snd Qerinan\u003e, 1 w-ouid side veiii Ger- inany? Exiremel\u003e' suti-Englilui vws one teaciier of great influence, go mucb so tiai, tbough Engliah iL thle advertise d languiage of the. sciiool, aie preferred to suifer incessant inron- venlence rather than learu thal bated tongue. Revieving mn\u003e lite in Ibis school, taking mbt secouni wiere its beaeb- ing finailly led, I ftud myseif face to face vith Frank Vanderlip's state- mnt, liai tie explanatlou of tie re- markable German progresa is to b. iraced in tie nicet direct manner to the German systein of educatien. Re speaks, of course, of tie Geven- meuh and hechnical échools, net of lies. perionats for the teacbinç of bousebold arts snd aceompliahments 10 Germai minadens. Still, the mna- ioritv of lies. aizrs bad zone firt tn",
         "THE GERMAN WAR WOMAN There was iu that school sentimen- tality, littie or ne ethical teaciiing, and religion was perfunctory. Wbat Ilbsrved of the. results of the. brade oehoola was that wiien the. pupilB b.- caen workers and sold me thear wares, tee oftexi they fr11 te pieces alinost in Fitteen years ago 1 went to Eu- rope with an entÎrely new wardrobe. Soin. of my \u003carmeuta were bought and made in Louisville, sud certain mate- riais, made later iu England, iu New York. Iu Germany 1 entirely re- plenlshed it, but coutinued to make us. of thinga I had, as one can, abroad when in out--of-the-way places. Wiieu 1 came to pack my belong- ingp to return to America, I fottnd 1wore a slkgarnent made inLouis- ville, Engli#ii lon\u003ccloth, bought in 190W, I atili could pack. Blouses made of my New York materials I gave te My maid only becaus. eut of style, and a tuile blouse f rom Leuisville wu sill without a ment, theugii I amn bard on clethes. A pair ef Eaglisii evemiig gloves had lasted ten years. As ta my German things, of thein \u0026H I foumd only a lace dress of lghi uet. Calling n'y maid, I sked ber wbat che had left of the. garmenta I had given ber in 1906, after I aettled ini *ve, uignorina, the. gray suit,\" rnied me. \" I have wasiied it ,ring, but it neyer wears out. \" a the. Bnglisii tweed, made for ondon. 1 mentioned the. Ger- ngs one by eue, sud ail wee ;ie r.tain.d two English flan- .ses and nmerican old sboes. r the Chier things in, my pas- 8uch as bags, trunka, orna- rtc., I fiud my former things, ýteoeu years, abill iu use, but d@ of n'y Germa» dlock have off, n'y cii.ap German watcb go, aud even s German cruel. falnto pieees, beinig glued, ied, as Iudrs d whe I artificial forcing of patriotiam for commercial, industrial and military ends, as at a plant of human mowing and tending, whose fruit. b iii val- ued acuirately, must b. studied out ini the. werld of international eompe- tition and its merit appraiaed accord- ingly. 1 1.ft Germany in 1905, and made my home, wftil now, in Italy, and tee I met my pe. omiat girl as the (icrîan wsr woman. As the. world knowu, in ail l.ading Italian towns ther. are foreigu col- onies. Of tbem alil the, Germna» dif. fers in flot being casual. The, Angle- American, t, illustrate, consista of the, leisured clam, its members b.mng tii... moviug in. wiiat we term society. If some member bas enterprise euigh, there is an Arnêrican clLurch. Privâte individuals also, if enterprising or forc.d te work, start achools. The. Germa» colony, on the con- trary, in a busy hiv, of workers, its members, from the baroni bank pret- ideuta dowu to the iubiquitoiia walte, living in Italy for commercial re- Bons. Tiiere la alwaya, tiierefore, a JAtl- cran ciimrcb, and Herr pnstoe, a Gjer-. mani doctor, a German sechool and a mari'nAMm, The. Germa» colony celébrates, en' masse, the. Kaiser% birtiiday; it gathisrs about thie ycarly Christmas tree, aud its members cf all grades of society apparintly know one anootier. German royalties appear during the season and entertain at dinuer the, consul, paster, doctor and ohrimpyortant member. Out of theecessity of sucii a col- ony was organized thie tmarienk..m, a hostel offering accommodation et very low price. to Germa» weme \u0026r- riviixg to u.ok work: govenee, nurses, niaids, cempanions, seere- taries, sales girls, typewriters, ser- vanta ot ail clase. Attàcked to the. one 1 knew wa»s an inflruàary, witii good traiu.d nurses, the. charge being lower than any Eugllùh arsng hor» andth acomoatonbeyond any",
         "460 TE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Tii. German sehool, also, wus éieap- or than the Engliàh ont. Prices at Arnerican ochoola being alwaya pro- hibitive for Europe.ns, tiieir choice o! foreign schoola was always betweeai English andi Qerman. Becauise of the. edutcatiouial ativantage. andi prie, the, Qerman won-anutil the. war be- gan. It waa thon di.acovered that ità litle \u0026lien pupils bat been systomatie- ally Germanlzed, tiio.. achools being subsidizeti by the. GOrman Qovern- muent. The, charge. at the. ,n.rie,.kim, as 1 say, vere vei7 smail, by eourte\"y also of the Goverument. In retîurii for sucii charges, the, women who went out, througii their various occupa- tions, into .very walk o! Italian life, wer, asiied t. make a returu. They were girls4 andi women, as we have meon, obeod Kducationally with the. idea of self-acifleo for Inperial power, and i t vas easy indeed to ex- cite their sentimentality, by talk of fImperial achievemnont, to an exalta- tion of devotion peculiar to the. Teu- tonle nature. Thèse. women, thon, so the. war ha» revealed, were askedt W gather data froua conversation» ovenbeard ln the. varions houses vie-re they worked, eoncernlng Italy's commercial andi indiistrial neetis anti e*iterprises,ý a tilng eas t. do, ince Italian men digus ince.antly their business. 'Their reports were thon sifted, sys- teniatizeti, and sent to the. proper Ger- nian bureaux, anti thuia began that great aciieme o! commercial, military andi social espionaçe of Italy *hlob hati abnost O.rmiz.d ber andi whleb mlght bave led her t. Germany's site in tbe war bat not Baron Sidney Son- nino happenot t. have been boni of an Znglah niotiier or decended froua an English grantimotiier. 'ries. Engliah mothers o! foreign- fatiieret chiltiren, let me say paren- thetically, are changing the world's history as nothing e1.. bas changed it. AÂ0erman saying has it that \"a treo nevor quit. grova to Heaven,\" andi, lu the unatter of th. German tree in italy, it wss the English motiiers with wiiom Germany hati to reckomi. That fact (3.rmaziy forgot. An Engllhhwoman always bas an EngIish baby, be, that baby Turk, G.er- man, Italian, Spsnisii, or Duteii, in law andi father. When the. day of the. expuluioni of the (lermana came in Florence, a cer- tain German business man saiti tan- ing things as ho leit. 'Nover mind,\" remarked a by- atander, \"he's çot an Englih baby. Ie iarried Min H. That's wiiat hie'll have for his future redkoning. Lot hlm go.\" But to return tE\u003e the m\u003crin4im. Besides tho women going out into the. familles of the amali tradoemen andi the. well-to-do merchants, thèire woe also the, goverese andi nurses, who.e avocations took téhem into thi. palace. andi villas o! the. nobllity andi forigm reaidenta and wiio eould brlng back reports o! armny, navy, court and iiank. It la just to those women to say that probably tii. word eaplonage wu never mentlon.d t. .them. Traln.d to obey, it was only logical that, b.lag obsesseti wlth the. Idea o! G.rmany's greatnes thoy shoulti become part of iLbiat spirit of inaking each indivi- duaI memniir of the oommomwealth the. most efficient o! induatrial said eco nomie units. \" Wiien the. expulsion of \u0026erman spie. came i Italy, wiiou ev.ry adi- vertisig sigdiaappeared, from every lanscpe orfear of German secret land guides, wiien Teutons vanished from baink», shops and restaurant@ overnlqht, the, publie o! one city wa aghast wiien it heart that the. police hiad ordered ouit a certain high-born admirable governuas, living for tirty or more years lu oue o! the highegt Italian familles, on the gromiti that ah. had aequaint.d hersel! and, by lut. tiie Society o! offleers, syndien andt even royalty. A sera\u0026t was old to go *ho bat 460",
         "THE GERMAN WÂR WOMAN remained by ehoice witli ler Engliali mites who believed lier old, harm- les, and knowing only lier owu lan- guago. One, Sunday, iu January, r came upýon thia Frau B-, amid a large group of Itauians. She was speaking French wi.th great volubility and, te my surprise, had ýgot rid of seme twenty or more years by au ereet carrnage, in place of ber Usual steep, witli quite youthful movement and toues replacing her rheumatisni. Wîtii the war mainy of the. German governeaie8 in Italy tlirew off reserve and came iute the open, distributing papers te humbler Germains every- wh.re an'd teaching tlie littie ehildren that \"Germains aire good, Frenchi or Engliali bad,\" acarding te the na- tion of lier employer, and that when the littie eues played ait \"trenchea,\" asial European children do, the. Ger- mana always must win. The great figure, liewever, was the \"'Lady of thie Salon.\" ,This was a Germain woman, an rtiat, *lie, knowinýg the Italiain nobil- ity, hud set up a salon ini one of the leading cities. Here, for two yeara, we te, be seen princesses, princes, Voenntess This, Baronesa That, literary Yghts, artiatie lights, Frencli, Ger- main, Itahiaf, Enghli, American, the. great social bait being the. Priucemof e Lippe Detmold and ber tbree charming daugliters. Like mothu about the. proverbial can- dle, levers of tities clustered about these ladies, tlironging the saloxi. The ,carda of Prince Lichtenstein, of a yengprince of Saxe-Meluingen, now kiUld, 1 tliink, were in evidence, and the. \"Lady o! the. Salon\" isoon knew ev.ryedy. 8h. declared herseit to b. that ambig-ueus thing, an Interna- tiounal aud a German, net admiring the. Kaiser. She waa everywli.re, in qverything, and painte-d, li odd mmen!ts, in the. villa gardens about RmVonice, Florence. German roy- aliscame snd weut lik. tamiliar finste and frem lier liome, snd ehortW' after the war began this lady dsppeared inte Germany. First, however, ahe had viaited Americana, te draw theni aide frem Engliali groupa and~ whisper, \" Eng- laind made the war. 8h. would net give us acolony. \" When sher.ýappesr- ed it wsa te consort witli the. Amei- can-German eleinent aud relate the. German aide of it te win t-heni. lu the. mean season, Italy, alarmed by Ezie Gray's warning againait apie. in hia Belgo Sotto la Spade Tedues,\" began thie publication of a paper called \"La Fiamma,\" or Tke Fiame. Each issue et thia paiper relat.d the, secret hustory ef suapeecd Germain spies, and eue week it told of the. ex- cursion of the. \"Lady of tii. Salon\" te Gerrnany, declared that her chil. dren hiad received fre oducatien ait the. Gerrnan scheel, hinted ait ether perquiaites, and the. lady disappeared, gosaip said, aecompanied by the, police; and the. habitués of the salon~ sait down te review just what they had incidentailly revealed there. \"lIn Germany, \" write.s Franuk Van- derlip, \"every encouragement i. giv- en te a mani to devote time and tliought Lo new waiys of doing things,\"1 and tiiese new ways were otten put in'to -the liands o et rmau woen to promoe la foreigu lands. For sezue year I liaive aced as cetr- respondeut for a certain well-knowu Paris paper, sud, as correspondent, 1 was approaehed by a German lady- I use this word iu the. European sense-about a seheme ot apartment liouses, in whieii, if I took quiek ad- vantage, I eeuld have stock, se told me. By suother I was intervi.wed about a bandage invented by a Germain wo- main and whieh it was wished te have int-rodgiced inte À.merica. This society lady mignt have. been an agent, o ready was ah. with data, eireulmr aud note-booksi. Aaun, I was off.r. a present te ixiterest me in a Germaui art sale, this by a weman whose hus. band, I have discover.d sluce the war Franlcfurter Zeituag,\" that paper wiiieh, w. are told in \"Buie and",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Education, \" csi keep you thorough- ly abrat of the. currenta of Euro- peau commercial 11fr. lier buahani, iiowever, who wezAt oaly witii Italiens, pa.sed for an art critie, for art bau been a zuost effec- tive cloak for the Germai worker. Every yew Germai girl artiste in strange costumes bave poured into Italy, I.ading the. frei lite and sketch- ing wiIdIy. LiIMerin at Viareggio nd Forte dei Mirni, as maiiy did, At Virgo it was discov\u003e.red st winter that nearly al the. pin. woode emeircllng the bay we owned by Au\u0026- tria and emaay. When actuaily the, land pa.»d into Germai posees- sion it in bard to ay{ aIl transfers iiavlnq been made i lia nes. Anotiier aotivity of the. Germai var womau in 1$.y wu what ws humoroualy dubbed the. 'Pro-Uxori- bus Club.\" Lat autuma article@ began to ap peri ertal Italisu papers i favur f G.erauy and uigned by leading Itulien\u003c\u003erofesors. Also, un- der the ne o oe, were published -xert traidlated from The Londoa Timug, but wltii meaulngs altered l\u003ey the. omison of ,rords or phrss, Th. Piama let the, public into tii secret thiat all the Germanophile profernors were poessed of Germai wlves. Dubbed \"The Pro-Uxaribus Club,\" they were the. butt of infinite ridicule, 'but ne well had tiiese wlvus vonbeci that nôt a husbanil leserteil the, \"Pro-Uzoribus\" eoloura. ing of an extremeIy well-written page or two on Izidian 11fe, the Indian, stilU readiug bis carefully prepareil manu- script, auddenly began te mak, pro- paganda againat British rut. in Iu- dia\u0026 This wasin1913, and, when on the proteat of \"a loyal subject of King George,\" the matter wua in- vestigateil, it was fouud tuat the, man bail been introduceil by a certain Ger- man member. Recently, in New YrI waa inviteil to a lecture on Tagore by a Hindu, wiio, lu a wo- man'g club, aise attackeil the. Britishi Governmeirt, màking propaganda. Almost the last persen 1 saw, before I left Italy, was one of tbe.. club war womeu, wife of a 'Pro-Uxoribus\" prof eor. Dropped ileftly fromn ber position on the board o! directers by ber fe.- low-offleers, ber buabaud scorneil and attacked by bi.s s-tudents, sbe wu standing in the club-room, ber be- Iongiups, as manager o! the tea-room, about ber. No one spoke te ber, some violent Italiens having spôken ai ber, making a scene before I apea,. ed. The maids obeyed ber ilaty and the. littI. page boy stareil. Sue was gpoiug, as iiad all ber race, for Italy hait declareil ber war. Banda of girl studeuts lu w*iite dresse, beariug baskets of flowers aud ulug- ing the. National Hymu, bail saluted the British Consulate, bande et boy studenta, wearing the. Tri-colour, bel ton down all Germau signe; the. for-. eigu colonies bail huug out the. Itaiena exloi and thpir nwn -%nthe in..jaf",
         "THIE QERMAN WÂR WOMAN thfes. German war womaen crumbi- and feli into nothing, whereas the ýrk of the Italian women, the. out- owth of the. practicality of that acticai race, is bearing certain f rait. When I lived in that pensionat of iold garden I was asked., one -even- rt W talk with the. girls of the. akuspeare class, as zheir teacher à indispomed. It was the time o! i Russo-Japanese War, and4 as 1 *w, the girls had heard nothiug out it, 1 began to expiain to themn causes and to give them an idea of ante outaide their Fatherland. \"Stop, my dear American lady,\" d the. head of the school, who waa t.aing, \"German girls are flot igiit j\u003eoiitics. Listen, children, \" d ah. turned to the. group: \" the. tians are Christians, the Japanes. e heathen, God will sc that the, Lians win. That wili do. Let usa In Italy, on the. contrary, Italian ,men are invited, to hear lectures [ivered by leading iawyers, arrang- by the women o! the General Fed- ition o! Clubs or the Suffragists, the property righte o! women in dy. In this hehasthe approva. d willing eo-operation-.o! Italian n. The Italian woen\u003e's movement, [eading woman toid me, is unique this eo-opratiofl with man, the two flworking together with the mu- tuai airu of advancing Italy through the eunancipation and elevation o! woman. Italian statesmen, she told mfe, (*lisult wiligIy with tiie ad- vanced women, and both sexes arrive at a muttual agrement as to the. suc- cemsive strides for wvonan to make. The German and the Itaiian metiioda are being put te the. test by the wsr. The German womau, who served the State by letting the. Stato mould and direct lier standards. rermainis to-day with the resuita that I have described. The. Italiau wo ai sering tue State by advancing hersel! with man's willing aid towards self-reliant use! ulness. O! herself, iii. las intro- duced trained nursesl into Italy, teseli. ing nursing lierseif Wo banish a tra- ditional social stigma from the, pro- fession. Siie has chauug.d the. abuses o! the Casa di P.,.. for girls; the has introduced clubs, ahe lian r\u003e.vived and supported \u003c\u003e14 industrie., by tliem bettering the whole race of wo- men peasants; she lias battled \u0026gainât tuberculouus; iii. ha. organized usai,. ly ail the, working war plhilanthropies; she has moderuized into tuefuinsess many o! the. old ez.dowed eharities; and st, but not lea4t, ahe bas magt invented, in bier school for teaeblng the domestie arts, a nsw kind of bread. And nearly all this, alnee tue day wheuu Herta aa*ed me ber que. 1 .",
         "5TEVIE CON QDEN ~73.JJudt ngdon H MESTEADIN4G in Northrn Ontario ia nothing but aakin game. This counry is alt voiy well to viuit, but if yon'd lived bore sa long as we have, you wouldn't like it any botter tlien I do.\" Tom Benton waa very much in earns \" Yes,\" supplemented bis wife, \" by theend of March we bogin to get pretty tired of ueeing mnow, anow, anow. Two montha of summer, one of .prinig, one of autumu, and six months of wintr-4t's tee mu\u003cch. Then think of ail the. tumps ther. are ýto the acre. \" \"Just the urne,\" said Bot eheer- have an ides, ail yenr neighbonrs are- n't quit. 80 bad as yeu think thom- though soino of tlhem may bc.\" Bot was Tom'. aister, enjoying lier first iiit in the North Country. \"Well\" Tom cenceded,, \"I guess they aron't. But tuia la a hard Iuck country. No one's making n inoney, and it makes us alrital and touchy, no we fa114» s\u0026rapping oauily. ' \"But I ca\u0026't understand, \" nid Bot, \"why you ahould say a man' Iazy because ho trap% ail winto-r in- stead of f.illing bush or getting out pulpwoo\u0026. You any yoursolf ther.'s no money in pulpwoodi unlew yen ssii grew the feed for your toam. A\u0026nd 4M. if a man tends bis trap8 properly, ho ean't bc very hqz.\" \"Why, that mani Steve Oongdon la utterly shiftlesa. Hoe ]ives on porridge threo time. a day, se they say.\" Tom waa obviously dlagusted. \"An-d, o! course,\" ho went on, \"b. enarea rabbits like the reat o! n. The. niceat fellow te talk te, as plausible as you lhke.\" \"But what have yeu got against hlm 1\" \"lle's juit no good; he's Iazy.\" Tom had strong convictionis on thia suh jeet. \"I',d like te see hlm for mymeif,\" Bot laughed, walking over te the win- dow. \"I beliove VIIlgo out with my anow-aiiees,'\u003e ah. adE\u003ed; \"it in muci a perfect d-ay.\" Thore ws very little whnd. The. snow wss dazzling lin tho sunlight. Soe settiar had brokon a trai u the. road, The. 'orthi seemed t» cai to her, and sh. follewed. \"How beautiful it is!\" sh. aighed ln sheer delight. \"IIew beautifufl Think ef grumhllng ever hiaving to livo iiere. I don~t ever waut te o hoe again. \" Tihe sky waa wonderfully bln.. The, apruca and balsam houghs were tout- odý witk 8now. Thora waa a fteck ef chiekde i the. edge of tho bush, and twe whiakey-jaeks sailed aro the read li front of her.",
         "STEVE OONGDEN The. light wind soughing in the spruce tops lured lier on and on. By te time she h\u0026d gene two mies a lew clouds drifted up frern the west. In another heur the sunlight had van- ished Then the wind dropped, and the soit, elinging snow fell thickly aedi allently down. Bet laughed and lifted her face te the. wet flakes. They elung to bier qyelashes and the edge of lier white wool cap. She laughed again and went on. She feit as if she belonged t. the. bush-one with it. Tiring, she sat on the tala of ber siow-shoes to rest. Then, aiter a litIo, mie d.ecided she must return if mie were te b. back by dark. But liere Bet lost lier way. The tliought of going wrong did not occur to her, no-r was there anything to sug. gt it. There was no sun. Fier own tracks in the time she had stepped we as well obliterated as those .head, bcoth looking -the saieý-the bhiwr of a trail. Jnstead of returning monthward, site vent on northward. As the. dusk came, the trail entered a .trip ef bush and a clearing heyond. 84t nov realized ber mistake, but \u0026ho vas tee tied te turu back with- out a rest. Just theni through the tfallin suow a liglit ghene out from a log bouse in front of lier. 8h. fol- frv.d the trail in. Taking off lier 4lAow-he, site thrust the tala into theimov beoide the path, tli.n rapped oneiti daor, feeling certain of the ever mad bush hospitality. A pleaant veice ealled, ' Cere in.\" Sit. pressed, the lateh, and te doer @wm ope», revealing te lier inquir- in eyes simply a ma -and a big, olek et. The man did not look round for a moet as -h. vas vory caret ully tun eones iu a frying-pan. When tie, bowver, h. straighten8d up and tured, a set t exclamation eapiug \"I'm afraid V'ye got lot, Bet expained rather hesitatingly. \"Net exety luat, only 1 kept on going n'ortli wlien 1 theuglit 1 waa going meuth again. So 1 tbeught 1 miglit cerne in and rest a littie; and perliapa 1 could borrow a lanter, to get back with.\" \" Why, sure!\u003e The mani beanied liospitahly upon lier. \"You're just in tinte for soine tes. 1 gev bsck miysei-lf an heu r or so age.\"- \"It must have been yeur trait 1 foliowed up the. resd, then.\" 'That waa my trail. Great luck titis is xny niglit at titis end. Sit down here-best chair I've goeL.\" Fie peinted te a block of vood turne'd up on end, with a couple ef boards naile-d on fer a back. \"Rather primitive, I'm afruid. and very buàhy,\" lie apologiized. \"Wiier. de yen livet\" \"I'm staying with the Bentone djown en the Porcupine. l'ni Bet Betuton, Tomn Benton's sister.\" \"Great Scott!\" the. mani exclairn.d. \"Yen've been travelling smre. Tht4m six miles.\"' Bet wss herrifled. It lied net seeau- ed su far. The id, of six miles back alene in tedark did notappal t lier. \" VII go down vitit you, et course.\" The. man hs4 notieed lier expra.. sien. 8he thanked him. \"My name la Steve Congdýon,\" hse sai4, a momuent alter. '«I have heêlrd my brother apea of yen,\" Bet «eknowledged. Steve smuled. «l'man frsid 1 vas net very favour- ably. Tom Benton and I don't seeni to bit .ft off very well. 1Iguce ur ways et loeking at lite are tee, dif- fereait. \" Bet evaded. \"Pehps it i ut m ee ar net all alike.\" Site glanced around the. bouse. It vas the regulation ise, sixteen I\u003ey twenty feet. In ige corner otood a stretcher. The. th foot, round-bar- reled heater stoo\u0026 in the. eentre. A amali eook-stove vas lu the. far, eerner, adbeside it a table made offour",
         "THE CÂNÂDIAN MAGAZINE baisai pole@ for lep and for top the boarda of a paeking case. The flor wa of flatteii\u0026Iloge. The. walls were coved witi white building puapeoe, wifh here sud there a gay picture from \u0026omne magazin. It looked much nester, iu tact, than ah.eliad expected the. abude ot a bachelor tu b. \"Dues it corne up to requirementt?\" h. asked, quite aware of ler inspec- \"I1 iAed i t dues,\" she Iau.iied, flushuig allghtly. Steve open.d a big trunk whli stood agaluat the wafl at the tout of the cot. Lifting out two tras, lie brouglit forth a paper parel This he very earefufly uiwrapped, briug- iug to view a white table cloth. Hie c au l traces ot fleur from tie table and spread the cloth. \"My married oister semt me tbis two yearsa go, I have been saving it fer a psrtieularly apecisi occasion, and evldently At lima arrived. Then h. sighed with purer1leasure. \"Imn't it 1Isppsyou'r. use Buthm. \"I'm atrmld 1 nee quit. appre- ciated one betmr. 1 suppose it'. tie wsy witli other thinps toi.\"1 iY,s,\" he agrd. \"Se. this tin of peara 1 bought duwn at the. puet- office to-dayt Il'. not otteii I blow myséit like tiaI. So uow they wi11 tasfte just twice a good to me as they do te ye. \" \" Im a fraid I iadn % better est any an odpinnd laid it by testov \"My est tollows me around like s dog, and always go.. P1t~h me to my trapu. -One day 1 go over my trap trail sud stay that niglit, thi. iext day and the. next niglit at that end. 1 have a littie log mhaek there. Then 1 corne back ana tay two uights and a day at thus end. My trail 's about fttteen miles long. Quite long enougli when 1 have traps to re-uet and some- times a lait one to trail. -Where do you goV\" \"I1 go north-eust tu the Frederiok. houa. and thon parallel tu the river.\" \"But do you think you are gettlng any farther ahead reaily? Do you t.hink it paysaV' Bat was doubtful. Steve smile\u0026L \" I eau se. Tom lias been ftuuung yeu up. Now, it'u only fair to beai' yuaide of the tory. Tom andlIare completely different. Tom is always worrying about sorneth,.ig, aud h. 's very mucli imprcaed wlth the, ser-i- *uiues of lite and hi. msion in the world. But 1 muet coiit.m I neyer worry. Tom .ay. it'à becaiue I have ffwt an.ough braina. Hie thinks that if a mn's mostly always happy and doesnfl take the world toi muci in esrnest, lie eau 't b. auy good. \"Tom lias more lanid stumped tisa 1 have, but h. has very littie more bushi d.w-.nd lie isn't anuthig like so contetd and happy as I amn, au 1 reckon I have the bust ot it\"1 \"I didn't know you had so mueh clearinz done.' Bet interrunted.",
         "ME~ OONGDEN Ilsz's' worth of furs this winter, d tliis la only just after the midle February. V ve sold eight mink [ns for froiu llve to neveu dollars iece: twenty weasels, at sixty to riety cents, aud twenty muskrat at irty cents. There were three mar-. i at llve apiece, and 1 got three red xand sold them for six dollars each. \"I'm tryiug to convince von, you mwhat a very respectable person am! One hunderd and flfty dollars Il keep tue more than well for a ar. And,\" he amniled rather mnsU- uly, \" I don't have to eat porridge ree timnea a day either, my neigli- urq to the e-ontrary notwithstand- g. ' \"Row di4 you know?\" she que.- rned rather faintly. \"Oh. we .111 of us hnow what ont iglibours think of us up bore. There alwaya some kind friend to tell us. b any rate, this ife suits me. I do ,e it tremeudously up here in the ts. I'm sure 1 waa born to be a eneer. My father wauted me to be lswyer, but I couldn't stand the ougbt of being cooped up lu a stuffy tle offce ail day. \" 1Hew do you like it up here?\" -Why, I believe 1 s born to b. pioneer, too. I thiuk it's great. It ikes me feel like going ont aud sit- ag under a tree and taking ro\u003c\u003et, wwig to be apart of the bugh. I tve neyer iseen anything like the oolgt niglits up liere. The snow ok se white, sud the bugh looks io ack And then maybe an owl cornes )otaong ail so melaueholy, up the ush.Its great, sixuply great. never wsaut to go home \u0026gain. Tom,\" ith a si\u003ch, \" Tom says 1 arn a fat- Steve laughed. \"Ton mustu 't Il him se, but it's my private opin- un that it's Tom who!. in the wrong. e lacks -mgntien, frem my point Steve blushed with sheer deliglit. \"Oh, I'ai sure seme eook whenI get worked tmp te it,\" h. smlled. \"But I musat cozifess they aren't always no good. And I say, ini.gination'a ail very weil, but it is awfulty fiue having smeene sitting at the other end of the table. \" He Iaughed boyishly. Bot felt mildly flattered. \"I amn going te show you 9me- thing, \" Steve said~ when tes wua over. \"It's an absolute secret, sud you mustnfl tell anyone\" He brought out f roi the. ever-use- fui trunk a folio of sketches. \"\u003cI oecasionally indulge in being Fui artiat,\" he explained. \"Them, are ail bu-sh scenery and log bouses sud a stray settier or @o. They're reelly not awfuily good, but 1 do like doing them. \" Bet looeti. theni over, thouglit them very good lndeed. sud ssld me. \"I wouldu't be at ail mrprised.\" Steve ven'tured. \"if you did morne. thing of the sort yourself.\" \"Oh, I couldu't draw like that if my life depended on t. But I will confu to writing au odd poemn now aud then, if yen wll slow me to dig- uify my verses with the nsme.\"', \"Vnsure yen neyer tola your brother you had such lapses. \" '\u003cCertainly net. H. would be dis- gusted beyond words. Why, the other day 1 8howed hlm \"Motha of the Iimuberlost,\" the most beautiful book 1 have ever seen, aud lie sid lie eouldn't quite aee the ebject of sucl a book, that ail the mnutha had been already caifled. He is hopeeiy practical. Andl yet when lie wa. finit married h. msde up a peem, te bis wife-uever wrote it dowu, you kuow, and eitiier forget it or would neyer own up te rememberlug what it us.\" Steve laughed. \"I suppose the. best of us depsrt frein the path of virtue now sud theu. \" \"1 *isli I comuld go dow-n te f yom, but I know Tom wuld ehaf mue off thielot. You \u0026 dI »em otink",
         "TIIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE alik. inso many way.. WiIl You corne up biere agalu \u0026ud have dinner with me some day?\" \"Oh, I couldn't pouuibly do that, you know. \" Bet was perhe Vthe leant bit ohoce\u0026 «,WUl, w4iil you meet me nmre plaIe \u003c1h. ftrgt oezt fine day aud corne for a walk t\" Steve wa p.iwevering. Bot gali she couldn't think of do- ing anything Vo dimpleaae Tom. \"W.»l, ýthen, wil you marry met\" His leau, brown face aud elear blue eycs wers v.ry sroez \"V.r-tain-ly noti\" Bot was very mucil atonahed. \u003c'Why, vly\" mile etammereti, \"I u.ver saw you Vil! just nov.\" t\"I really oau't 500 viat difforence th at makes. I doa\u0026t believe in pro- iiliymyselL You eau get to b. on falmoat any old Viing if aile's half-way doceut. But, aomebow, vilen you came i here te-igt1 toit that you vere thle gi I'd awy fairy of the mmow-torm. \u003cTheu wheu you sat arrow the table froni me, I toit a. if you belonged tacre. 1 don 't thk 1 canitat the table bynyseUf auyamore. I believe youVtobe just th. smre sort of a porson 1 amn, ton. I dou't see wily vo wouldn't hit it off ever oo well. Wouit you change your mindt\" \"IV'a quIt. nthinkable.\" Bet was very digoifte\u0026. \"Adif you'I» b. se good as to tend me a lanteru,\" ile ventured, \"'l'Il start for borne. Yon neoti noV trouble comilng with\u003c me. I'm sure Tom wili b. out lotoking for me. I daresay l'Il meet i before Vve. gone vexry far, \" ilo ended rather breath- '-'ly. \"Do you know,\" St,.vo said, witil intena s eriounee, \"vilenever 1 bave read atonies of a feilow vile ilat thes \u003cvillain' in -his power and lot hlm go, Vo have hlm turu up later Vo p- ter bum again, it ulways madie me mad Vo tilk ho ilsdný't finiailed him off vihen il ilad the chance. I think thle principle applies to this. If I let yen go, I ma hae eridess trouble getting you fial. 1 have been tilinking it over. So I 'm going 4,o keep you nov I'y. got you.\" He looke, ti hier gravely. '\u003cTou may have sorne difflvlty.- Bet's voice was like ice. \u003c'Well, it's wortil a little irouble. I -don't expeot Vo get aometiling for nothing. IVts possible Tom may landt up ere before a great vile, ne I thn '1take yon te Vile other endi ef my trail. \" Fi! teen miles ou a dark snowy nigilV \u003cHe'il b. abie Vo track you, ,joitm quite uuelep,\" argueti Bot. \"Oh, no, ile won't. My trail acrou thle clearance will be pretty vo»l cov- eroti an heur alter I'N,, goes over it, and ne ene kuovi vilere my trap trail ils., \" I wonlit go, that's flat, \" naid Bot angnily. « Yon can't ilp your\u0026oelf.\" '\u003clI11 refuse Vo walk. \" \" I'm going te put yoou on my to- «Ill screai.\" 'rYou cau. My neareat nelghbour la two miles away.\" \"TYon ar. a rasesi and a acamp anti a brute, \" ad, Bet, fairly chinIg. \" I hope not ail that. Corne, uow. I'm going Vo wr'ap you iu Vil blan- ket and tieyou on tetboggan. If y'ou don't struggle V'Il leave your fraude loose. If yen do, l'Il Vie yon ail Up. ' Bet struggled. etev. waa litho arti strong. In a minute aile vas rolleti ln Vile blankot and snugly ieti ou Vhs toboggan. He fasteued her mev-. ailoes ou top. Tilen b. lit thle lantern, put everyting iu shape for leaviug, anti thsy wer. av..y inVo Vile night. IV vas net always Do geo in Vilrough the bush, as 8teve ha no troubled Vo eut ont uiauy of the deati- falls. H. ila to hal! UIt thle tobooe-",
         "STEVE CONGDEN ovor these. Then the soit anow Lhe trail inad-e the pulling harder. , the trail iras not; so hadly snowed ,er as in the open, and was aunken nk travel, and well dofiued. everei tinies ho qesteo Will you let me waJk?\" said Bet, iciclualy meek. If yOU'll give me your promise to try to rua away fron -me.\" I promise..\" le untied ber, and ée. atuggled er feet. You had, botter go ahead with the. ern, snd I wil pull the. toboggan cornie behindi,\" ho direeted. h. put on lier siaow-shoes \u0026Wd How far have ire goens?\" ahe About tie mniles, 1 should say.\" Then I think we'l stop right ~ie laughed byaterically and ag the lanteru against a trSo, iiing t~he glus. A lbreath of air ,the. ligiit out. kvs jumped forirard and oaught arnL fou needn't grab me,\" sh. laugh- iuutingly. \"I promi.sd 1 would- run aw8y. Noir, what -do yen k you'Il dot Yeruae to be a DII of great resource.\" VIn going on, \" he said. Phirteen miles in the. dart\" nIiirteeu miles in the. dark-if kes me a year! \" h. said, rather gely. Take your snow-shoeog off. \u003eediently e wriggled h.r foot Di the twistod theugs. c wrapped bar in the blank.t as h.e culd in the dark, and tied )nthe toboggan. i and on lie irent, 6lowIy, dog. r, often tumbling over the dead- h. oould not seo. The trail iras ucb botter packed than the aneir Le it that he iras -able te koep to r carefully feeling bis way with giowulioes. Ho plodded on al t. 'The storin cleared toirards king. 'Wh.n the dawn came the riras better. But so slow had been the progreos in the dark with- out the lantern that it was weil into the ýmoorning mien thoy roaced the. shaek Wb.n Bot mas untied and unmrap- pod she f.et very inucb mubduod. There ira a amatl heater lu this ahaek, and a collapsible slieetiromi stovo for cooking. The. islsa mers chinked irith day, snd the. roof iras of polos covered ith tar-.paper. It was only tirelve teet square. Tiiere iras no clearing around IL Stove firod up snd proeesd.d to mû.e soins breakfast. \"You'd botter walk sround a littie sud got yourself wsrmed up. \" Bet fe\u003et ahivery and took bis ad- vice. \"l'Il have breakfast ready lu about tmenty minutes, and if you're not back thon l'Il go look for you.\" \"Very ireil,\" Bot agreed, \"but re- momber that 1 iror\"t; zarry you if they neyer Oind me.\" \" I'm, going te marryyou if I have t\u003eotaoe you all the isy to Nom Post. \" In -a short in.m tiiero 'were por- ridge, pan-cakes, and a serap of ba- con. It's smno ira good, and Bet iras hungry. «'I will nût eat a bit. l'Il stsrve myself first.\" Bot was on. etriko. \"It looks ais if 1 b.d a suffragette on my hande,\" aaid Steve, iudlixied te bo amuseê Sît4ing on the edge of the. bunk lie commeueed his meal. Bet iras sorry she had refused, but did not lik. to giv. lu noir. \"Corne,\" h. said, aftr a whfle, \"tis on't do at al You must eat somothing. \" Bet's rfflolution collasd. Sh. was too hungry to resist. \" If you'Il xnariy me, l'il go to Coirane tus afternowx for a clergy- mlan. \" \"I ivon't,\" s aad dselsively. '\u003cI'm afraid Tom will b. worried to death tbinking l'ru loat.\" Rer fore-. liead wrikled in suxii-y. \"The. sooner you inarry me, the sooner b.'Ul b. pu~t ouit o! bis misery.\"-",
         "TIIE CANADIA.N MAGAZINE '4Tiat's eut of the question.\" ,41 believe 1,11 start with you for Npew ?o..t to-merrew moruing just the satiie. Tom might get tlirough $0 1W D tl o une, itot if yeu take tue ail the wsy $0 MNooe.\" \"Weil, we woii't argue about it Uow. 1Ithink wre duefor sep. Yom lie, ou thie btunk there, and l'1111. on the floor.\" He rolled himiaif ln a blanket aud lay down iu front of the door. Bet could not gleep. but Steve had haalong nght of 1$ and alept Af $0r a vile, feeling ebllled frein the. araft uude the dont., lie rolled nearer the s5tove witliotit wholly yak- l ng. fTmu, as lie feît, the wartnth fromth tirefl, h. vent sound] a8leep Bet watcbed lilm for a minute, very quletly crs*led off the bunk, put ou her sveatercoat, ber wool cap, and very, very quletly opened the 4or. Once sfely outslde, she clos- ed the. dlor again, picked lip her gnow-êeoes sud miade off along the that se had not the .ulightest desire to go home. 8h. could scarcely per- guade lier lialting feet to hurry. ,lit la so besutiful here! 1 want tomstay. \" She gave a ittle flsp. \"4No doubt 1 have gone mad.i My brain inuit le tipset f rot» belng kidnsp. ped. Y Sh. had struggled along for meven miles. After a prolonged rest, ah. stood up to g on. Iler ear canurht the swish, Rwlah, of gnow-qhom. Steve came .wlnging round the bond in the, trait. IiI. cap was piiahed well hack, sud hi. mackinaw moat was flying open. Hie came up o lier, flushed snd panting. 'Well, what are you going to do this timel Yetu've forgofeu your toboggan, 1 see. Are yon going to sling mne over your shoulder lik. a saek of flourt\" Bet amiled irritatingly. Steve 's face pictured diumay. He had not thougliht of how to take bier baek, only how to overtake ber. Very suddeuly lie went down on hi. kuea iu frot of lier, putting horth arma round her. \"Bet,\" he begged uoftly, hiolding lier tight againut hlm. \"Betty, won't you corne back wlith mei I want you. I eau't sit at the table aloue auy more. Betty!\" He preaed bis face",
         "A WL\\ 1TER STREXM,% Frotn the paintîng by Maurîce Cullen k the Can~J an An ~",
         "The Canadian Magazine",
         "ASHRESAM 0F' Ht5TORY Events rcè1e~d by thi Pu\u0026Liî â utbuiuLngs tire at C)tLwàw JT6yJ~'QJ6imond BRITAIN bas its Westminster, the borne of enlighteried democracy, France its Versailles, breathing a, fragrance of nationalisx, the 'Unit. Pd States its Capitol, with more than a century's precious memories, and Caniada had until a few weeks ago its Parliament Buildings, the foruim foi a baif eentury's political combat, the soene of its development froin a tixuid federation to a confident international eommonwealth. The wave of flaine *hieh swept its corridors on Febru- ary 3rd destroyed precions documents, met back a great legisiative machine, but it also wiped out vapours of party prjdice, united a people i national feeing and fortified themn in their wartime endeavours. A session that .pened with omninous political runi. blngs, with party jealousy sud mis- trust, was diangcd iu the hour of national disaster to one of unity aud serious purpose. An election that hevered on the horizon threatening was swept at once beyond the ncsiyof immediate calculation. I short, calamity, whieh has so often Wen the solvent of difficulty and dif- ferenc for a virile race, put a new complexion on the polities of thc en- tire country. There ii -;omething signiflcant of nationhood in the faot that the, Par- liameut Buildings were opened at s time of stress and tlxey vere destroyv. cd at atime of world criis. lun18M6 the country was in dispute with the United States over the reciprocity agrcement then about to be abrogat- cd, and a few months later the, Fen- ian raids oecurred. To provide for emergencies $1,000.000 was voted for national defeneec. Fifty years later Pariamnut was voting war funds by the hundred million. There is a long gap between, but it ia studded with mileposts of national dcvelopment. Not national in the sense of indepen- dence, for the Imperial tic ia nov strouger than cirer, but national li the sense of self-consciousne, pride in douxestie affaira, eapaeity li self- government, progress i economie development. The straggllng federa- tion of four provinces, at last one of whîch was even then almost a con- script, bas growxn to nine province%",
         "TFE~ CANADIAN MAGAZINE,' div-ided perbaps on detala, but unit- ed in one great national feeling. The. fortum on Parliament Hlili bas been the, battle-ground. Ite corridors have sounded to the. tread of nation build- eMs its ratters have echoed the elo. quene of successive leaders, its rooma have secreted the intriguer, the lans lobbyiat. Its history is Canada's lus- tory, its succeenor will bouse a new forum for a changed people, for no participant ini the woiid war can ever bcth isam again. Tii. Parliament Buildings opened a new epoch, and] their end came at its close. e e 0 In a country as large as Canada, it is doubtful if any considerable per- centage of its citizens are familier, by viqit, with the capital and its \"crown of towerm\". The. mere selection of Ottawa by Queen Victoria in 1858 as the. capital of the. Province of Canada was one of those compromises so frequcut in politics. Experience had shown that the plan of alternat- ing sessions of Parliament between Quebec and Toronto was not satiafac- tory, and when the. necesity for a de- finit. choice was clear, Kingaton and Montreal added their dlaims, thus furtiier romnplicating the matter, Qucen Victoria selected a «ds.rk horse,»1 a llttle-know-n town on the Ottawa, thus avoiding the. jealousie. 'whichf any Cther choice would have eauscd. The site then known as Bar- rack H11l was chosen for the Parlia- ment Buildings9 in 1859 by Sir Edmnund Ilead. Plans werce prepared by Thomas Fuller, a Toronto ardui- teet, and a ye(ar later tenders were ralled for, and acceptedl with smre haste, the contractor for the. main building being Thomnas McGreevy of Qu.bec, Much confusion, alteration and recrimination followed, and it la characteristic of the vontinent that TiUS PARLIAMENT BUILDINGS, OTTAWA, WIIICH WKP.B DESTROXED BY FIRE ON FEBRUARY 3\u0026d, 1916",
         "ASHES 0F RISTORY THE PARLIAMENTARY IHRARY AT OTTAVA ore the buildings were even finish- a parliamnftary inquiry was or- -ed, The original contract with 'Me- ,evy, who was heard from again ,nty-five years later as the con- etor for the notorions Langevin ek, was for $348,500, but thia was ltiplied several timea before the rk was flnished. In apite of this, s probably true that the work was costly, judged at least by Anieri- i standards. %, story told by the Hlonourable )rge Brown long afterwards la il- trative of tI'is. Brown aaid that otly after Con! ederation Sir \u003e)rge Cartier, the idol o! Quebec at ýt time, visited hlm in Toronto. rtier said that American tourists re eoming to Ottawa to see the new Iding. One day he was showing ýarty aromxd when one o! the men, .eh impressed by the aight, Baid: \"Mr. Cartier. this la a pretty fine builtling. It must have cost a* good deal of money. Ini our country such a building would have eost $10,000, 000.11 \"And, do you know, 'Mr. Browni,» added Cartier. \"I was altnost ashani- cd to tell imi it had cost only $2,000,-. (00.\" At flrst only the main building was erected, with its front o! 472 feet, and eompleted in 1865. The archi- tecture carried out by F'uller, whose design was accepted, was almost pure Gothie. Beautiful as wua the facade. the library, whlch was flot eompleted umtil 1877, was more impressive, and, as Anthony Trollope said, wortli crossing the Atlantic to aee. That its architectural glories, its octagonai design. flying buttrees and eircular galleries escaped the. flames ia one of the compensations o!",
         "-1 IF- SENATE CHA'MBER AITY OTAWVA the recenPit disR.ster. Tine brought ad- ditions te the main structure without altering its general appearaiwe, the mnost considevrable being a ncw wing on the northwest corner comipleted several years ago. Even with that, buiesoverflowed te the corridors, and theo building was crowded and in- adequate for its purposes. Fromn whatever point the buildings were viewed, they dominated Ottawa. Whcther een fromn the gate of Sir Robert 1Bordn's residencne on Sandy Hlili, from the Experinental Farm, from the deck of a pufllng lumber tug on the Ottawa. or fromn the forested Laurentians, they were ever the lur- ing cluster of towers wvhose points ap- pealed te the eye and stimulated the imagination. Thaide, the Parliamient Buildings were a mass of straiglit lines, arches and right angles. Long corridors 476 mnade dimly lighted vîstas, and on either side low doors openied into roo)nls for commiittees, roomes for lesand roomsq where mseiu business known only to practical poli- ticians was icusd The Gommnonsq Ghainbcr was a higli cube-like room, with gaileries on ail sides, and light- ed !romn above, day and night, the ai'» tificial light being a close imitation of daylight. On occasions of important debates the galleries were crowded, special scats faeing the Speaker beting always reserved for the wives of Mu isters and of the leader o! the Op- position. At other times there were only a !ew stragglers, sucih as -visitera to the city who must sec Parliainent in session, or men te whom polities ia as the breath of life, or youtbs who adore the political atmosphere, as W. T. R. Preston confesses concerning his o'wn boyhoodi ini his «Life» of Lord Strathcona. Party headquarters rooma were",
         "THE HOU~SE OP C0MMNONS. MTTA\\A Louking to'vard,. the Iw' bai, frnu tht otnwn , nearby, the' farno\"S, \"Room A, just acrosaý the corridor on thc wevst sie, being thic inheritance of the party lin power. This ,vas a spacious place and in its dIimi reces.Ses alrinot evcryv Poli- tician of proinrence in the country bas chatted at one tirne or another. lIs naine in political history smcks of triumphs, and of the confidence of entrenebed power that cornes of an efficient -Whip and a safe mai ority. The. Opposition headquarters, 'Rooxu 6,. was smaller and less marked by confidence. But its air was ever fuil of hope. The politicians who \"have one on the Government,\" and those who are sure their party wii wiu next élection, wcre eneaxnped liere. Other rocins, chiefly upstairs, were given over to provincial groupa, and there the Nova Scotia mien. plotted for a larger fish market, the Prince Edward Wsaudera for a tunnel, the -Western men for a better wheat market, while it is, altogethier probable that if youl fouind a dozen Quebee mienibers iaayv from the smoking and card roonis. they would be wb-ilînig away theev- ing with chansons fromn Parier dlays. .\"onga that recalled flhe simple lif. of flie coureuir-de-bois andi other ecriçe thinga of the wild. Net so was the 11f. on fIc Senate s-ide. ller. one passed front noisy linioleumi floors to heavy carpets, and red at that! OnQe padd(edl along the, corridors with lic sme uila as the Last Leaf hirnself. lu these almost empty crimaon quartera, to -peak ýaloud seemed a sacrilege. Paint. ings of grim stateamen o! the pa8t looked doiwn from the corridor waill and aeerned te impose tii. reverene o! a sterner age. Octogenariun Sen- ators basked in slippered ease in comnfy roorna or delved gently into curreut literature in the reading- reem. but it ail seerned unreal in the.",
         "TEE CANADIAN MAGAZINE world of an energetie and pusliing na- tion. i session thelIir spehwaa mensuired, respecttuil and slow, coi- pared with the. fends and seriiiiiiages of the, Houa., exept oncve in ade cade or se, when one Nova c(otian dar- .d to cail anether \"an old viper\". And on1 eitiier side, wiien thie incmn- bershup ehaxiged the, traditions of the building wverv nobly upheold iiy the offt(iiais thereof, Lieuit-Col. Htenry Smlth hns mat in the chair o! the Ser- geant-at-Arma since 1872, and bis threatening ex\u003cterier is but a cloùk for a genlal sou! that relisiies to recite \"JTim Bludmo» on occasion. l)oor- keepers at strategic points were fix- ttàrea for years, and were ev-en ac- quiainted with the. chlic lobbyists. Tlhe Commons' reading-room waa pl- cd withi newapaperm, which furnish- cd exýtracta for mnany a hot debate before tiiey kindled tiie flame that l1k. ljatimer's fire was feît for inany a long daRY te coule. It woiuld b., however, a whiolly in- adequate view that would dwclýl only on the, architctural charrn of the. lest capitol. It hils been tii. centre of the. country's history ever since Canada psed tii. \"feundatien\" period. fiere the. policies were made, legislation shiaped on the. stateamen'm anvil, here moved at one time or anether almost every Caniadian o! the. era wiîth any dlaim tQ national prominence. Just s every American boy is a potential president, me in Canada every mani wiio entera public life by the, way of the, school board or the, townshiip council niay smre day find hi. way te Parliament Hill. fier. is the, acid test ini fitriesa for public affairs, and many are tiie reputations, local or provincial, that have p.rished ini the. procemu. The. flse o! Commons, witii ail its demoeracy, le a jealous body, and it loves notiiing botter than te de8troy, or at least set back, the. faveurite mon or the political bully, who coùwa determined te \"show them\". On the. other iiand, true merit tinged with modesty is quickly recognized. \\Vh.n the. Parliamnent Buildings were opened, Ottawa was raw and the. country was raw. On wvarm aixm- mner days cattie grazed on the square in front o! tii. buildings, and on alanin galloped acrema Wellington Street aind Sparkis S-'treet to the. fields b.yond. Nova Scotia iiad been an un- willing partrier in tlie federation, and for years aifterwaýrd flirt.d with lier old and adjacent friends of New Eng- land. Tiie construction of tii, Inter- colonial Riailway. openedl in 1876. an4 almost always mun at a loss, wua oue o! the prie.. paid for cementing togetiier the. string o! flshing roda which, as Goldwin Smnith uised to say, constitutcd tii, scttled parts o! Cari- ada. ,Just hivre it mazy h. poînted out that railways coustituted, even more than the. race question, a serions Cari. adian problcmn. Ilardly was Cenfed- cration aceiomiplislhcd b,! ore Britilh C'olumibia wais knocking at the door, eutering the. union in 1871 on the, promise that a railway would b. buit to the. coast witiiin ten years. Tii. corruption known te history as the. Pacifie EScandal, resulting in the defeat o! Sir John Macdonald, andi the. siiufIling and iiesitation o! years before the completion of the. Canadian Pacifie Rallway in 1885, are part of the. prie paid by the. young federa. tien for its expansion. Repeated fin. ancial crises occurred, and the cor- ridors on Parliameut Hill were fflled witii the, railway lobby-ists appealing fer more aid. Tii. stagnation whieh !eilowed the. optimism o! the. eax1y eighties chang'ed te tiie golden era o! development and the. full flowering of the railway proxuoter. Charters were as9 plentiful as kuigiithoods are to- day, until on paper tiie country waa gridironed witii steel iiigiiways. Tiien came the. prodigal day. o! the firat yeara o! the, new century. Tiie despair and ciieese-paring o! a deade earlier was suceeeded by optimism and lavisinesm. '¶Notiiing cari stop Canada; full steam ahead,» was the order. Western granaries were burst-",
         "LOVER'S LANE, OTTAWA Showing in tii. backgrournd tWeTow.er off the. Parliaownt Building% 2ig, and Sir Wilfrid Laurier said 'anada needed a second transcontin. rital, if flot a third, at once. The ountry took hirn at his word, thougli bhe legisiation produeed a momentary riuis. The Hionourable A. G. Blair, fi2ister of Ralways, differed with ia chief on the construction of the Waional Transcontinental and quit he Cabinet. He announced ha would tump the country against the cheme, but he neyer dîd. The Con- ervative Opposition critieized the \u003eoliçy in sorne details, but it went hrough. Before the. rallway was fin- shed the Quebec bridge feU, the war ame, immigration almost ceased and h. publie la now anxîous a to whe.. her the railway can be profitable for rears to corne. Meantime the third ranscontinental came to matnrity duirinig the succeeeding Conservatiy. regime. The people were apparently tiring of corporation demanda on the treasury, and thougRh the. tireleu Canadian Nortiieru Railway agents secured the aid aaked, because fail- ure, it wss feared, would hurt the country, it -,as only on a basais 1by whieh the country became a partnoe in the enterprise. Thus has the Dominion railway policy evolved and1 become a prime factor ln deve'lop- ment. Lobbyists, in fact, might b. terni- ed tiie Fifth Estate on Parliament Hill1. They fiourisii tiiere as the promoters of private legislation. Some of them are Ottawa Iawyes and are always near by. (\u003ethiem cOrne froni distant cities viien need- ed. They are attorneys for the. pro. ..................",
         "THE CANADJAN MAGAZINE secution, as it were, and toc cften thie defence is not represented and judg- ment i% gziven without a proper hear- ilig, TTn nany cases their achieve- ments are prejudicial to the. public iu- tercets, buit they hanve been part cf thef ena cf Caxiadianl expansion. AI- mcst anythuxxg that woiffd develop the country was forgiveyn. Some of the 10obbyigt4 wre wonae than othiers, but they wenc il «good fellows\". a a s ?ings anid princes among the nul- crs of moen have corne and gene with the muitability cf huxuan things dur- lngz the lhaif centiiry uinder the «crowns cf tcwers\". The epoelx opened with a residue of great fig- tires fromn the, days cf the old Pro- vince cf Cnada. MNost cf thiese aire known Wo hlstory as «F'athers cf Con- federation\". The. construction rra through whieh they had passed de- vrlcped their capaeity in mauy cases liud enhaneed their reputation. Smý John MTacdonnld, the outatanding fig- ire of the day, was invited byLord Mionck Wo form the. first (Jonfedera- tien Cab)inet, and bis star shone re- splcudent uintil his death iu 1891, except for the five ycans cf tiie Mac- kenzie regime following the. Pacific Scandai xevelations. George Brown, his great rival, whcse co-operation hadl gone far, W make Confederatien possible, was defeatcd in 1867 and withdrew from the Commons, to lie appoiritcd Wo thc Senate in 1873, but took ne prominent part iu its deliber- ations. The human qualities cf 'Mac- donald and Uic earnestness cf Brown mnade thexu contrasting but mnemor- aile leaders. Josephi Howe, whomn Laurier de- scribed the other day as «perhaps the brightest impersonation of intel- lect that ever adorned the halls of the. Canadian Legieature,\" had been thie idol of Nova Sectia, and when Sir Charles Tupper was Uic only proý- \u003cJonfederation member eleeted in 1867 front that Province, trouble tiireatened. The masterful Tupper, bowever, found a solution, for xi 1869 Hlowe entered the MIaedoiiald Cabinet. le seeured better terms for his Province, buit the hostility lie met nt home broke bis heaflth, and he re- tired th lie tentG errsi of Nova Scotia in 1873. Sir George Cartier waR a dominat- iniý figuýire iii Q'1(IN ('. fin-! ii \u002b11c dýavc leading Uip Wo 1867 had virtiially fore- cd thiat provinice Wo acept Confeder- ation. Though Sir Nareisse Belleau. a mediocre Frenieh-Caniaýn, was Premier from Anguast, 1865, Wo 1867. Cartier was tendered a great welcome wben the Governnment mnoved Wo Ot- tawa in October, 1865. In an addreos at that time lie said of the new Pr liament Buildings: \"Theyv appear worthy of being the meceting place for the wise legisilators of a conntry vieph will extend from the Atiatile te the Pacific\", le afterwards, witli the Honourable William McDouigail, arranged the purchase of the North- west frcm Hudson's l3ay Company i 10.and iii 1872 piloted the first Canadian Pacifie Railway charter through the lieuse of Commnons. Tiie Pacifie Scandai revelations later proý- bably hastened his death, in MINay, 1873. Sir Charle Tuipper similarly had been the champion of Confederation i Nova Scotia and later was con- spienus ini carrying through tiie Canadian Pacifie Railway projeet. Hie was in public life almost continuouuly from 1855 Wo 1900, was ini the Comn- mous for years after Confederation, was Premier for a short time in 1896 duning a Conservative break-down, and was famed above ail else for his downrightneua and courage. lus death i 1915 removed the last Father of Cenfederation. Sir Leonard Tilley was another provincial champion of Confedera- tion, having been Premier of New Brunswick. He was in the, firt Con- federation Cabinet and llved to formulate the National Policy as Min- ister of Finance in 1878. The. Hononrable Alexander Mat- kenzie, the only Liberal Premier",
         "A SITE 0ý,F lllqTO'RY iuce Confeýderation, exeept Laurier, was sa simnple and honest stonemiason, a good Parliamentarian, but an ad- ministrator wvho wore Iimiiself ouit b)y tuixeeessary atteýntionl todtal Sir A. A. Dorion, Sir A. T. Gadt, the Hionouirable L. ýS. lluintÎigton, the 11onourable E. B. Wood, and the lionourable Williami McDougail be- longed to the saine ers. Dorion -was a great lawyer, but a quiet, reserved mani, who did not seem at homie in polities. Gaît was one of thic great- est Financ Mlinisters thie country ever had. Ile was a perfect wizard wlth figures. Huntingtoîi was a well- lnformned parliamnentarian, a clear thinker and an attractive personahity. Wood was a iman of grreat talents, espeeially as a camnpaigner, and on a9c- counrt of his strong oielie was popui- larly known a.% \"Big Thunder\"\u003e. Mce- t\u003eeugall was a man of uinexamnpled poise and a keen, incisive speaker. Thle Honourable Edward Blake psesdperhaps the greatest intel- letthat ever adorned the biuse of Cemnmons. This was lis strength as, well as his weakness, for whule hie compdlled mue)' admiration M.Nacdon- aid commanded keen personal aifec- tien. Blake's speeches were 80 exhaus- tive that h. left nothing for bis fol- lowers te say. Rie lived in a remnote mental atmosphere anid had none of the graces and smali talk whieh are ncsaybetwecn maxi anid maxi. Sir Richard Cartwright was a more popular orator. R1e appealed te the cowd in Opposition days hy his smsigarraigriments of the Gev. erriment. Hie was a dispenser of dis- tilled Englisli, and a parliamentarian oft capaeity but not a popular leader. The Honourable G. W. Ross was a still more popular orator anid was probably the best eampaigner Ontario ever produeed. 11e had the gift of poetic imagination as well as qualities of constructive statesiiianship. A list of conspicuous figures in Pailiament li the last generation migiut be ixidefiitely extended. Dur- ing ranch of that time the taIl spare f4iure of Laurier* ceNtqs its long9 Sha- djow. Frntering forty years age ail- rvedy with a reptaýition for elo- quei(nve, the image of tii. orator gra- duially mnerged into the larger imiage ofa constrtwtlive *ttsaa lead0-r id mni, a world figuire. The, eoolinge shdiles oif Opposition, the trials of war have but rcvealedl the temiper e! ls ettle, axid hie remnains a counll. ]or and suipport te his muceessor. Ouitstandfing moen of the Laurier regimne havef largely passed frori the seene. The meýtiieulous MIowat brouigt the p)resige of more than twenty years as Premier o! Oni- tarie. Filing after an unirivalledl carver as Finarie M\\init(er, with miounting revenues and the. mainfaef(- turer and farmevr both -oten-tt witb his tarit!, went down on the prineiple of reeiproeity with thie Vinited States. Sifton, atter organiizing the. greateat miachine for tlhe eelopmneit o! the unsettled lands the couintry lb.d ever seen, digiappeared lin thc pursuiit of lis private enterprisea. Muileek, aif. ter rescuig the Post Office Depart. mient fromn its aecepted career o! de- ficits, and establishing two-ot'nt posit- a ge, retired te tIe Bencli. 1In Op- position thc Liberals are sceking to reconstruet their party and be, ready for thc places of responsibility that they believe wilI conte in a few yearm as sure as cornes to-morrow. lIn their raxiks are thc llghtixig Carveil, the efficient Pardcc, the persuasive Liem- ieux, the brilliaxit Boivin, the. epi- grammnatie \"Red\" Michael Clark, and many others. While the Laurier group li office was heading, unconseiously no doubt, for its downf all, the. Borden party was as steadily preparig for ita «Cplace li the sun\". Mr. Borden as Leader o! the Opposition had all the. troubles whieh that office i sucs sive de! cats invelves. TIpatient hendlimexi eontexided after eaeh fail- lure that h.e would have te go. But lie remained, axid bis day camne in 1911. The meni whomn he b.d school. ed for years li Opposition by asign-",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE ing them Wo watch different subjeets and d.partments were now at his dis- poqal, and hi. Cabinet was soon con- struecd. Looking back at it now, there eould bc only one Minister of Militia, for Sir Sain Hughes, wvith ail hi. irritations, breathes powde'r and i. the, incarnation of the. Canadian war 4pirit. Sir Thomas White lias risen Wo the gret responaibilities of finane- lng the war withi resouireefiulneýsa and ani appreciation of the. faet that lie represent. ail the people. Sir George Fauter, a painstaking admitilstrator, has carried the, magie of hi. eloquence far and wide to a people deman\u003cling ligbt and leading on the war. But if the. charred timnbers on Par- liamiient Hill1 were sakd to yield their memiories they would not speak only of the mnen whose famne miay bring them laating bronze in the. Pantheon above the. Ottawa. They would whis- per, too, of personalities and scene8 that will not b. recorded among the deeds that made Canada or saved the. Empire, They would tell of rougb and ready Joc Rymul, a real charac- ter of thieseventies. They would speak of 'Williami Paterson, whose roar againat crimes of the. Tory Gov. erniment cxclted rigliteous indigna- tion in msny a constituency, and whose role as a defender in office was neyer quite a happy one. They would recail the. consequential Bourassa, 'whose golden voie, magnetie gesture and pitiless logic neyer lacked a full House, though isi course was ob- vionsly i the wrong direction. They would not forget a hospitable soni lik. Prefontaine. ready ta spil money's liquid equivalent for ail and sundry who migt be gathered inthie accu.. of baccanalian reveils Nor his antitiiesis, uilent Thiomas Greenway, former Premier of Manitoba, o! whoni someone said that no one could ever b. as wise au lie looked. Nor another sombre figure, John Charlton, master- fui i debate and the, articulation i Parliament of the Presbyterian con- science. There have been many memorable episodes in the. Ioua. o! Comimons and non(e more so thani the criais pre- eipitated by the. P ac ifie Scandai charges in 1873. Tii. Honourable L. S . H1untington rcad luis allegationa withi an air of exultation sud timid. itv, and when h. sat down not a sourid di:stunrbed the. silence of the. place. Months of jockeying and inquiry fol. lowed until at the, end o! October the debate close.d. Sir John Maedonald spoke withi con(ffdence, even bravado. Then Donald A. Smith, afterwards Lord Strathcoua, a strong supporter of the. Goveruxuient, wss on his feet. Ilis first words were non-committal, and as lie neared luis conclusion hoth sides were on edge. Hie did not think tiie Firat Minister took the. monxy 'wvith any corrupt motive, lie sua \"Hie would b. mnost willing Wo vote confidence in the. Goverumrent (loud cheers fromn the Govcrnm.ent aide) eould h. dIo se cotnseientiously\" (great Opposition cheers). Tlic die waa ast. The Houa. was wild with ex. citement. Iu a few hours Sir John Macdonald was out o! office, and the. Honourable Alexander M.Nackenii wau Premier. The icident had a tiirilling sequèl five years later when, on prorogation day, the feud which began between Smith snd ii eratwhile associates. broke out anew. 'Wiile the. fouse awaited the. summons of Black Ro\u003ed, Donald A. Smithi rose to reply to soine remark prcviously made con- cerning iiim by Sir John Macdonald. A violent row foilowed, which was only closed by the. repeated rapping on the door by Blackc B.d himselt. In the. course of this unseemly scene Macdonald, Tupper, Bowell, Dr. Sproule and other Conservatives join- ed i iiurling epitiiets at Smith. «Coward,» «\"treaeiuerouu coward\"' were siiouted at hlm, sud the, colloquy ends in Hansard witii a renuark by Sir John 'Macdonald: '\u003cTiit feilow Smith i. the biggest liar I ever met\"~. 0 a e Race and creed troubles have rais..",
         "ASILES 0F HTISTORY cd their hisslug heads on several oc- casions at Ottawa, but except for the agitations of Bourassa and Lavergne iu Quebee they were latterly thought to have died down. The rebellion of 1885 and the panishment of death meted out to Louis Riel, its leader, provoked bitterness among his coni. patriots ln Quebec, but it soon passed away. The Jesuit Estates bill ln 1889, by which lands were restored to the Jesuit order, caused strong resentment in Orange Ontario owing to the prejudice thought Wo be suf- fered by the Protestants of Quebec, but Sir John Macdonald, who always bail good control of that Province, re- fusel Wo interfère. There le a story that at this timne Premnier 'Mereier o! Quebec, pale and auxious, came to 0V- tawa Wo ask Sir John if he intended to disallow the bill, and mnet the re- Iieving reply: \"ýDo you take me for a danin fool ?» The same force of orange Ontario had much. to do with the. defeat o! the Conservative Gov- ernment lu 1896, when Sir Charles Tupper insisted on passing a remedial measure for the relief of the Catholica in Manitoba lu sehool matters. The Pwlianientary term, was exhausted by a Liberal filibuster lstng a full weèk, night and day, and the courag- sous Tupper was wiable to stemi the adverse tide which swept the Liberals into power. Once again the ereed question showed itself on Parliament JEUt when lu 1905 the new Provinces of Saskatcewani and Alberta were constituteil. The clause lu the auton- omy bill permitting sehools for min- orltiem eaused the resignation o! Mr. Sifton from the Laurier Cabinet and raised such a storTn of protest that the Coverniment to avoid a wreck made a compromise and the agitation eeased. Aýs a social institution the Partis- ment 13uildings were pre-enunent. They forxned a gigzantie club and the disappearance of this cauaedl the greateat inconvenience after the fire. Sessions have grown go long and many meiners travel so far Wo attend that a member o! Parliamient now han very littie other life. 'WVork and con- genial conipany resuIt lu almost con- tinuaI attendance. Party rooms. rooms for groups sud for individuals stimulateil camaraderie, whieh la that priceless quality for thc man who de- pends on the votes of hig feilows, Whether lu the noisy café, the stately dlinlug-room o! the Speaker, or amnoug the. slippered elders on the Sonate ie, the spirit o! good fellow- ship reignel constantly, overstepping party lines. So wvhen the bitter windm of Feb- ruary, 1916, swept down from thi. Laurentians and stirreil the shes of the f allen capitol they mixigleil strange tales o! a young nation's bis- tory. Tixnidity hal given way to con. fidence; provineialism bail been re- placed by internationalism; party rancour had been succeedel by the struggle for a world lidea o! liberty, And the leadershuip of Parliament in the country hal been regained, and ail parties went forwarl lu chatened anl sincere publie servie..",
         "PREHISTORIC RECPAIN S IN CANADA JôyZ'd~$1kIîWdLQ J iIST north o! the boundary fine, in the South central part of Al- berta, iq an7 area of level land dot- ted hepre and there by small lakes and uintil reeently covered by Ilixiir- iant grass. A few years ago it was fouind thiat the soi] would produce enormous virils of simail grain, and ine then settIement hans. been so rapid that now very littie homestead land remains uinoccupied, exeept re- mote from railroads. These fertile prairies are drained by many simali rivers, which unite to formn th'e Saskcatchewan. One of its ebief tributaries is the Red Deer River, riqing in the snow-clad Rock- ies just north of Banif. IJniting with otber lesser streamns in the foothilla, it forms an irresistible force which bias eut through the soft sediments of the level prairie land and formed a nin- iature Grand Canon, a mile wide at the top and three to five hundred foot deep. In places the walls of this great gorge are nearly vertical, and the river winda in its narrow valley be- low, touching first one side, tben the otber, but ever eutting and diselosing te view treasures of prehistorie life -fossil boues, sheils and leaves. 4 By the qtudy of these remiaina it is, posbefor ie,Ytists to deterinifie thic formas of flhe varions animais, te reconfitruct their skeletons and pro- bable appearanc in life, and te re- picture the conditions under which they existed, in those remote perioda. Species of the saine genus frequienitly differ in accordance withi thiair positions in the rocks that entomb them. They may show different enigins or formas o! deposition, so that for the sake of convenience the rocks arec lassified and n'ailles have been given, somnetimes in keeping with the nature of the locality where they wvere first recognized. The extensive deposits were first discovered bY members o! an expedi- tion of scientists sent te this region b%, the American Museumn of Naturai l'listory of New York, in 1909. An expediin bas been sent frein the museuin every year aince then te se- cure the literai horde of feusil speci- mens, and as a resuIt tbe Museumn han one o! the most complet. mounted collections in the world o! the skele- tons o! prehistorie animals. Travelling dewn the Red Deex. River four distinct geelogical forma. tions may b. recognized, one overlap..",
         "COýMPLETEi SETO F THE BRON lO SAURUSECLV A peîtr~m1,v ig aiiother like ahingles on a roo)f, aI each coutaining eharaeteristic isils. Were the canon deeper nlear Smountains, these divisions wvould )w one on top of another. As i t a jouirney of three hundred miles wn~ the river la nleeesary ini order sec a fiill section of the different -mations. I those swamnpy glades of prehis- -ic days dwelt a host o! reptiles, -ge aud amail and o! various forms, ýh-eaters and herb-eaters, but all .4ing certain characteristics in eom- on and known asi dinosalirs. They re the dominant creatures of the y, for the warmn-blooded mauuuals re as yet smal~l, the largest so far own not exeeeding the aize o! a use eat. The dinosaurs were inot closely re- ýed to any modern reptile, but they are some characters lu commorn th lizards sud crocodiles. Some, if t all, laid eggs, but the very young e rarely found. One of the mo.st abundant of these remarkable reptiles la the trachodon, a creature well knowu to muaeumwiii visitors. It was a herb-eater of large size, resching a maximum o! thirty-five feet in length and seven- teen feet in lheighit. It was klangaroo- shaped, having long hind legs. on which it walked chiefly, aud shorter front legs, with feet probably webi- bed. The body was covered wvith seales, like some of the umodern liz- ards, but they were not ovrappiug. l'he headi resembled thiat of a uk with a broad duek-like bill, covered wlth a horny sheath, heuce the name «duck-billed dinosaur», Probahly thie inost strikciug feature about this huge ereature la its teeth. of whieh there are more thami two thousamd iu eaeh individual. Amoug living sauriaus, the snali Sonth Amerieau iguana aumbly- rhynehus may best be eompared with the trachodons, uotwithstamding their difference iu size. Their feeding",
         "TIIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE habits probably were uimilar. llav- ing no meanu of deeethey lived in the. water, where they were free frem the. attacks of fleahi-eaters. It is evident that great numbers lived iu the prehistorle marshea, for there are nuimerons quarries along the Red Deer River, in which boues of these creatures have beexL found. The, akeleton of a new genus elose- ly related to the. trachodon was re- cently put on exhibition, iu the I)in- osaur Hall of the. museuirninl New York. Iu structure it closely resemn- bleu the. trachodon, but it is distin- gulsbed by a great bony creut which exteuds upward tram the baek of the. skull and whlcli in lit. evidently sup- perted a flexible membrane, siiuilar to the living basilicusq. On shore thero were other hffoted quadrupedal spele, with large heads protected by horns -the mnonoclonius and its allies. They were remarkable for their enormouqs kuils, frequently live fret iu length, and four fret ac.rosa the fr11 portion. with a long hemn surmouuting the nose, and al smail hemn over each eye. The brain waa smailer, in proportion te the size o! the. skuil, than in any kuown anii- mal, above the claffa of fvqhes, and of' a very low type of structure. But mnost striking and grotesque of all was the ankylosaumus. Covered with armour-plate fromn nose te tip of tail, it was the veritable Dread- uought ot the. swamps, and it could bld deflance ta tiie contemporaneous flesh-eaters. It was a herb-eater, with very smail teeth and a turtle-shaped bek It wallced ou four short legs, and was about flfteen feet long. Iu the middle o! its body, it was wider than the mastodon, and se cov.. ered with large Rlat plates that it eould well have been ludifferent te the attack of the flesh-eaters. The. ribs were solidly united. te the baek boues, and the tail terminated lu al penderous, eliib-qhaped affair, m-i ilar te the. gylptodon, which it resem- hIes in many ways, though lu ne sens. related. SKELETON OF PREHISTORIC ELEPHIANT. AS FOUNI) IN NORTH XMERICA",
         "MOUNTINO TUE FORELEGS OF TITE I3ONT0 SAURUS EXCELSUS i. carload of fossils coilected last raer in the. Beily River formation ides nixie skulls and three partial -tons, with sufficient supplenient- material to mount these thr.e ,tons. A fourth skeleton, now b.- prepared, was eoilected last year. wonu as a new hall ean b. pro- cl,in whichto exhibit them, the cum ean exhibit skeletons of the acteristie large cretaeeous dino- 9--prosaurolophus, monoclonius, rlosaurus, and dry-ptosaurus. )me of the skuils represent new ýra and species flot heretofore v'n to science. Otiiers were known iously only from fragments. oiean musetam parties have col-. ýd tbree carloads of fousila frein 1lity, yet the fild ia by no ui exhausted; there erosion is so il that for all turne the Red Deer river will b.e a famous huuting- grouind for eretaeeous dinosaure. Broken fragments o\u003ef bone washed clown the hillsides are traoed up to where the remaining parts protrude from the. bank; ail pieme are careful- ly collected, and when the reinaining bones are uncovered they are bard- ened with shelse. If the. speelmen is any considerable part of a skele- ton, it is next determ.ined where to break it with the. lesst damage, and the. various sections are eovered with plaster of Paris reinforeed with bur- 'Sp. The various sections are then num- bered, aud a strong box is made for eaeh large hlooek, *hiehii l paeked carefufly in hay to insure its safe journey to the~ museum. In mounting tii... prehistorie creatures, two processes are required",
         "SKKLE1ON OF AN~O MER ILREHlsTopIC MONSTER preparing the akèleton aud model- lus it. lu eolleetiug fossil skeletons it la ulsuali\u003e' necessar\u003e', as sorne parts arc inissiug. to have themi supplied lu dlffercut wayq. 'Sometimes it la possible to obtain these parts froin another, and perhaps lcas coxnplete. skeleton of thc saine species. If these natural boues canuot be aeneurd casts are made o! sneh bones as are necded to eomplete the skele- ton. If neither the boues thexuselves or casts o! thein are available, the methiod emnployed la to model ont, iu plaster, the misaiug parts, the plaster being tinted, nearl\u003e' the colour of the real boue, but left a shade or two off, so that it msy be rcadlly dlistingihd The natural boues are neyer eolourcd. Sometimes a eompiete mnodel la made of modcliDg dlay, ou a Prepared franie of wood sud iron roda or sometimeas, as in the. vagse of lifrsize nmdela of the. hêad,, of large fossil animais, an exact model of thie fossil skuil is first made. and then the flesh andI skin are mod- eled ont on this artifielal skufl. The. eia\u003e' modela are east ini plaster as 50011 as the artist completes thein. B\u003e' Ithis plan thie artist ean readily ad- just the pose of these miniature niod- cia, in a natural, satisfactory attit- ude, and then emplo\u003e' thern as a guide for munting the actual skele- tons themeselves, whieh are very heavy and unwieldy, and not as easy to experiment with as to pose. As the illustrations show, the boues are placed in Position to be set together, b\u003e' ropes and pufleys, steel bracea and other wechanism, to lift aud keep the heavy weight of thi. fossil sections in position while the. parts are being joined together.",
         "JOY CE ov Howard SomervlIk One of he Briliýh Iani exbIlitdat th, cindian Nat\"oi E\".hl",
         "The Canadian Magazine",
         "RICHIARD HA ýLUYLI Tite, SpitrLt o? Our Rac, M A, P.R. HIST. S., (ENo.) thos adventurous ûnes who 0Went rth ovess, and, melf-exiled. ight from far ilei and coutiatnt other England in the. wild, r wliom no drum8 beat, yet they fought mRe, in courage of ai thouglit itch Rn urboiuuded futiirp wrought. -Lawrence B3iuyu.. NE deep calleth to another.- )The. sea is the greatest and moet comprehensive symbol mrng. It conjures up for us al omnance of adventure ini literature ln histony. We caxuiot gaze on ithout recalling Merlin and the tu, King Arthur'a Knights and IoIy Grail, Abraham goiug forth ring net wbither he went, the Men led by a star. The past present and future of human en- Dur corne te us from the ocean. miystei'y of bygone generations gs to its secrets: the glowing ; o to-day are its burden, wbile the. coming years will be but dif- t forma of the great human fact men are adventurers, are gain- to whomn the inscrutable sea ,, the cal of the unknown, the )f life's age-long gaine of chance. e sea and shipping are in 'British most of ail. They are part of ace. And se it lias remained for ~iter of foreign birth--4oseph a.d-t~o give us the lirst real lterature of the sa in the Engliah language. «W. need lin such litera- ture, heas eavb one of us bas the, spirit within hini. The most unob- servant o! travélIers must have flot. i-ed howv different mnen of our race are f roui thos o! otiier races. For exam'Ple ]et us reeall smre orean voy- age. What a vital interest we take in the sbip aud ail that belongs t. bier. The log!I The boatswaixi's whistle I Thie changiug of the wsteh! Tbe iiavigatingr officer at werkl P ire drill! Lifeboat drill!I Our travelling companiona of other nationalities are frankly bored by these things. To thern they are o miucl detail, meaninglessa sud unreal; te uis tbey are as intitmate am our owu personalities. We find emotions witbin uis te whieh they make an irresistible and immediate appeal- It ig just the sarne wheu a distant mail or a tblu trail o! suieke darkens the long verges of the sa. W. rash te the. ahip's side. We chatter of enterprise and o! com- mnerce\u003e of hazardous deeds and stem struggle. We go back to the. ordinary routine o! the voyage, conscious that w. have touched hands witb kindred men, that from out the lirnltles wat- ers a message that we eau underatand lias reached us, more reai thas \"fiq,- signal\" or \"wirele\".",
         "THE CANADIÂN MAýGAZINE \"Ont, deep eaUleth ta another.» And] thore are our companions fram otiier lands-istless and uncancerned. W. cannot undergtand them. A Iacka- daisiral hand bas tifted a pair of glau.. to sail or amofro, and a mut- tered 4\u003cwe're in thie trade routes» or some sucli platitude lias accamipanied thie eonvenitional action. The. deck- chasir bas not been throwni aside as bometing whliih besets I Tiie deck- quoits continue uninterruptedi For un--we cannot understand it-we have heard a calt! A hand bas man- tioned us 1All else yietdsto thiespirit of romance Tii. sea-the mes is in our bImod! It la the smin when w. toueli a foreigu port. To others,--mtrange faces, strange fashions, strange eus- tome are the, predominatlng interest; but we love to watcii the. sipp1ng. 'We love to study the Unmes of boats and hiiq and steamers. W. conjure Up pletures of lonely vigils, of lieroie endurance. of garnubing chances, of buman skill at war with tiie atluring ocean, and spel-struckby thiespirit of the ses. 'W. puai amide the lae merrhant, the. bead vendor, tii. curla retaler-who, crowd the. siiip's decks tbrough the, traditional courtesy of thie captain. W. bave no interet- more than pasng-in such tiiings. There lies a «tiiree-master,» where banieors ring, wiiere paint brushes w\u003cobble. wiiere knife sud shears are busy on new ropes and new sail- elotii. Siie bas iiad a long adven- turp,» w. uay ta, ourselvels, aud w. MI1 out the. stary, not really with aur ima- ginations, but out of tiie racial tradi- tions stored in our own inuer cou- scioiusuess. There lu a battle-ship- emblein of greater darlng stlll. And we pietuire the eeasele.s watcilngs tbat go out like electrie flashes froin of storin and tiie glooiu o! starleu, mnoonlea,,s b)laclcuesa witii a battleship at fuit speed and all lghta out! Others cannot understand, others eau- not share our lfe. We are o! the. ses. Adventure la iu aur blaod. Tii. unknown ealls uis! A iialf-devetoped school boy holding a lonety post on the fartiiest reaciiea of the world; a rougl sten mnari figiiting tiie temp- est, or manaeuvering te, catch an enemy's ubmarine; a panama bat, a kiiaki suit, a iiand-aiiake, and the clos- ing doors of the. pathies forcit or of the. jungle pregnant witb fear-thes. are aur heritage and aur jay. We do flot reason of them-they may be foÔl- li-but wiiat of that? They are the warp and woof o! tii. heroie web. A Gordon; the. Berkshlres in Afghianis- tan--«It's all up witii the bally old Berk.shires\". Hopelees bravery sud hazardous gtory! W. canuat iielp it. W. loge Spian Hop yesterday, to- norrow we shall loft again; it is the spirit of the. ses, the truc insigula and armorial bearinçs of aur race. The. real origmn of this spirit la to b. found in Elizabethan England, sud many af aur modern writerm and artists have tried ta reprodu.. it wltla peu aud bruali. \"The youtii of Ral- eigh\" ia au attempt ta embody it in clu.Tere la the. long law beacii at Bud-leigh-Saltertou in Devonshire, sud the artist bas cauglit tiie fai' away wlstf ut look lu young Raleigh'a eycs as he peers out acroa tii. Chan- net and plans bis future lu tiie world oi sdventure. It la tiie sarne inspira- tion whici lies beiiind Henry New- bolt's \"Drake'a Drum»:",
         "RICHARD ITAKLUYT: TITE SPIRIT OF OUR RACE Elizabethan England was the Eng- land of visions, of dreams, and ini tho\u003cse U5pafj\u003c»u5 days\" we must look for thie birth panga of the spirit of our race. Elizabethan Literature wlth ail its magie admnits us but feebly inte the. new atmospliere, sud for myself I have s.lways found it ,uost fascinating, mo8t alluring, moat wonderful ini Richard Haluyt's '\"Voyages\". Uer. la the. true imnperial idea, liere la the true Elizabethan spirit, lier. is the eradie of our ad- venturous nation, the. nursery o! na- tional daring. Everyone knows the occasion which produced lUakluyt's work. During a visit to Paris lie was ansnoyed to find that bis countrymen were slighted as inular and spiritleas, and lie deter- mlned to use his Pen \"to stop the ,ioutli o! our repreadliers\". In tact, bis determination joined him to, the army of national defenoe. But this visit to Panis was only the occasion of the \"Voyages\". There lies behind a @tory iiot so well knewn, but as roman- ti nita way as the voyages which he records. And lier. we must bring Our historical imagination to bear on Oursubject-ter without it history la more or less a mner. chronicle. It is Elizabetlian London. Tih. -ns the. collages, the. drawing-rooius, the streets are f ull of a new spirit. Enlsmen are more alive than ever before. On ail sides we hear the pro- blems of a wider world being discuss- ed. W. listen te rounantie plans for clnztion. We feel tliesalt ofthe *@@Sfl in the sir. W.%T hear ail arotind more adventnrous than ever b.! ore wltli tihe lurking magie of discovery, richer, fuiler Englishii l spoken. Eng- land lios buxrst lier bounds. Along tles palpitating streets of the. newer Làondon, cemes Saturday by Saturday aWestminster schooboy-Riejiard 11akuyt.He la just an average Eng- lier. and tiier. on the edge o! golip- ing conversations. lie sees shlps and sailor folk aud inerelhants, snd nobles and courtiers as h. lengztiin his walk \u0026long tii. Thames, until lie flnds him- self shyly inovlng amid the quiet and reserve o! tiie Middle Temple, wh.r. his ouisin lives sud practices law. This cousin deserves our undylng thanks. lieseens tohaveh.id the heart ef a boy-a true Elizabetha, heart-and lie took pleasur. i pro- viding a weekly objeet for young Hlakluyt's Saturday wrnderinge. What a room that wus i the. Middle Temple! Wig and gewxi lie car.leu on a Spaulali chair, the treasuire-trove fromn some soutliern ses. lier. are Glanvill and Bracton rubbing shoul. ders with Cabot's mapo! I Here a hall. nuastered brief lies acr.ms a gloibe fig- ured out witii the. New Worild 1 Uer. a work on navigation is lield open with the. Eli7zabethan Act o! Uni- formity! Rler. Peter Martyr'. -De-. cades of The. New World» le propp.d on Foitescue! Uer. are eomnpauu« sud charts snd ail the. parapliernalla o! sea crs! t iningled wltii the lite-lu. death o! legal lore. Young Hakluyt eoeu as no bud- ding lawyer, full of visions o! the days wien b.e would meet M1r. Secretary Cecil\" in the. Court o! Higli Comm ission, or Lord Treasurer Bacon before the. Commit. tee on Privilege. 1 lik. to thlnk o! uis cousin, too. a a very me]dioce lswv-yer witii a not very remuneratlve practice. But what high pleadings lie did in geograpliy and cosmo. graphy 1 What eus. did lie wn in ~the Bhigli Court ef Navigation!I A \u0026enclier iu the. Temple o! AdventureI And se, w. imagine a rooa-ust 'a step r.mnoved fronu the. bustle ofEl!.- abethan London-full of globes and charta, and ail the literatur. of nen seenesand new lands, and ne imagine an Elizabethan scliool-b~oectchiug the uew spirit, and a lzbetlian gentleman full o! the uew enthiiug",
         "THE CA14ADlL.\u003e MAGAZINE \"re \u0026bread in thoas eider days. Thiun the loueq go on week by week until Richard Hakluyt becoms characteria- tic of bis, age; uintil on. historie Sat- urday *hen the humnaa lawryer reaeh- es down thie Great Bibie, and opening it points te hie Young nephew: \"the.\u003e which go down te the ca in élipi snd ocnupy the great waters; the\u003e' use the works of the Lord and Ela wonders in the. dcep. The epeli iuun tbe lad. Re telle us that fron that day thînge ot high and rare de- llght rnoved hi.q Young nature. He refflved to glve biulife te the litera- whr -. or thn ? careut hie renolution. H.e red everytliing which he rould obtain, net oui\u003e' in Englîeh but iu other lauguages, in thi. now romantie literature of eea- rmsulip. If. lecturedl with zeal and enthuegiasm on hie wotk, snd at timea rnoved hie audiences te practleal Pit\u003e' b\u003e' hie ples for the teaching of navigation througb whieh «mniat\u003e more of luis countrymen mlght not lue drenched ln the. see\". What a pic- ture it ail makes! The fetal lights lu Christ Church Hall, and Hakluyt lendiug the. glanieur ot romance te the dinner-table conversation. What a breadth of vision moved acrees the i-w Oxford lit., as the Young en- thugist worked up hie companions with glowing tale, of adveuture and daring. biterature tooli another codeur; histoiy expanded inte liuit- leu mealins et endeavour;1 srlence bresdened out from its conventional round, whe» Hakluyt became, as it were, Oxford'\u0026 point of contact witli the. dreatus an visions of Elizabethan ]EugIand. If ever student-lite had ita «lgnred fiames.? it vas in these ilmeet ineconceivable days. Tii. age of knighthood hsd corne bsek ln an ititenser form. The crueades were again possible. And we cari enter in- te those tsr-off Oxford days, beeause the\u003e' are in resut\u003e our own. W. ca» pictuire tihe Elizabetha» atudents moved to high emprise by Hakluyt'u tongue, or matured in the idealised atmosphere whieh hie studies creat.d. The. palm-lande eailed thein-their own adventurous sails grew big-bellied in the new spirit's breeze--the lone ice-4ieldu beaconed thein. It was aoïne- thing to b., a youing mn lien. A thoueand projeotq were abroad, and the cali went forth te young Britona: Quirkly aboard beitow you,. And with ri meTrr gale Swefl your stretc 't sail, With vows as trosE As the wlrnis tihat blow you, Hakluyt's \"Voyages\" breathe the very spirit of national pride. Notb- Ing is too minute, nothing ia too insignificant lu connexieon with any voyage et discovery. He approaehoe hiq mubjeet with real love. He wrtes as a lover, and as a eonuequece he takes a lover'e deliglit in reeording mmali episodes and eaeual remarks which te another man woiild appear of little moment. Thus, fromn titis point ef view Haklnyt's wor\u003c belongs te the literature of affection. Her. ia a man te wbem adventure le a mis tress, and his joy ig to write of her troin every peint ot view. He uaay be only a collecor and an editor, but titis tact enly enhanes our conceptien ot hlm. Prom another poitt of view fisitiyt is a tyia Elizabethan. W. try t ho our mind baek, to catch his outtooli, te torninlate an idea of Elizabethan England, when the na- tional horizon had beoome almost in-~ coneelvably broad. Tlhere exiated in Hakluyt's day a new spirit of dariug, of taking rieke, et answering the eati et the sa, of seeing visions--a spirit impossible te the. oider generation. In the midet ot ail thia, Hakinyt lived and worked. Yesterday bronglit to hlm a new island, or a new ea; te.. morrow -might bring te lii a new continent or a new ocean. A ship was no longer a mers convenience for portent of a great romance. And so, from. titis point of view, Hakluyt'a",
         "RICHARD HÂKLUYT: THE SPIRIT OP' OUR RACE \u003c'Voyages\" are a glowing panegyrie of adventure. In them, 'vill b. found in ail its simplicity, the secret of the British spirit. And it is for that atone that 'vo must read thein. H¶ak- luyt lid little t*i.ught of literary faine, and h. never tried to develop originality. Hie work is an artless and composite epic, and oecupies Doe place iu the devetepxacut of Engliah pros. I places, however, tbare in much dignity, strength and vigour in bis style. He has caught something of the. seaman's character, with its busineesIike qualifies of energetie re- serv. There is the. touch of the. Eli- aiuethan captalu in his forin. These aspects, howe'ver, need net worry or distraet. We go toHak- luyt because 'v8 feel lu his «Voyages\" w\u003euiethig 'vhich is our very o'vn. Ne brings te us example after exam- pie of all our own permonal feelings -vends 'vhich 'v conquer in thought -sas whieh w, sail ini dr.ams.I1 know nio ainer book for the, young studeait. If he gives hii. days and nights te llakînyt h. uiay not, oer- tauuly 'vill not, learn an Engli style (if that can ever be Iearned), but h. 'vill find hie outlook 'videms4, le 'vili klam something of the insatiable t*rs to fid ont, whieh is an eseen.. tiad in ail education, an~d above sMl h. 'vill lear» te 'valk 'vith pride lu tih. national nursery of hi.e race's adven- turous spirit. He 'vill le.xru that pro- gress is more tii.» prosperity; that empire ie more thaui oRtisfaction~- that everything of value demanida self sarfedemm»ds nlsks--in a 'verd, that lie belengs te the ancet stock of higli adventure, and that bis plaee is on the high meas",
         "Aà WOMýAt S HEfART J5y4rtuwoLf'J'e4P5 A SHORT PLAY IN THREE SCENES CItLURÂOTER$8: Thomnasa ard, a mano hard ckeeked and kqeni eyed vt muck safami,. but geffisg old; onIre.le wsllca îoi(h a pcuila(r twcopaningtuùtof iskead forwr4rd and Io one aide. Mrs. Jane rlazzard, Ai e, a beng tin are. broeooking womêoo. Mary, their daugkt or, utlm-fcatured,, SaIl, fairMhaired and oleare'yd; of upright, resolute bearing. Burton Godcr\u003ck, th. fri.ssd of Th#mff au Hard, a besot but alert old man w'ko tualka tvilA a cante; he is confinualUy lapping wtoil te cane. Bherwood Dunalk, a tall yovsog seamant. Other people merationed ino the play. Jansi., gA. soie of Mr. and 1,rs. Houzard, and Hlerman Poldoso, Mary'. oneo-lime louer, wh\u003c\u003e k.. lefi the istand and has stot up Io the presesot rot ured. SCENE I. SCXJZ: Tsoo oWd mens are cowsing up a path from the sea on the Noew- Iow42.ssd cooat. Fartàer up the patA, by the sid. of the kiL4 Î8 a amatil brown cottage. Ruddy light A.ow8 /rothelà wmdows. Il is just afler sonse Ototo",
         "A WOMAN8 IRÂART the week. Se corne along up the hli and to the hoiiae, Buirton Goedclroek. You'll not b. starting for Broken Cove- this niglit. You'l si ittinig in chat hy the- fire awvhie. and then you eari aieep in the loft with the lald \u003clo*king, hond over his oges). 1 wish he'd rompe in off ilhe ses. ý1y age 1.a rna:kingi Ill full of fealrs, iurtenl. For whn was a lad m yei ail tiines I mweuld hoe on the. le,ý aridcrla of thef wviid. But itarislng liard to-niglht, Coralen 1fg in te the bouse. There'll lie -upper under the larnp. Burtoit O4odcruek (pýaisiing( althek doojr o 'f th(, cottage) : iiin it mi taxi, Tb\u003eornas, anid rio nwiddler. But, the gir-l ' heart ý l aSa'd heart this 1dtyv S he loves the lad Ilermnf, and she has his promue-;f to lie cexningz bliak agi And she's net wvanting te mlarry ' Sheýrwood1 Dunialk, theuij it's al very gv o match evexry offtward waty. Buit love's ani iniward thing. , Toias. Anid it 's a 1umari 's% lioart that kiowA\" it ail the while. 1I'd lie lettinig lier have lier hvari~ 'svy a bit longer Rnd net lie urginig ber even it la a poer year. and the ineuiitha. ha.rdl t fred. A wornan s heart la a strange, strauige thilig. It's as Strangeý4 a1S 111e Mes ~And th(\u003e sea will have ifs owu meods, and no mani wilI guinasay thein e-vten lie would with aIl lis strengtl. Thomnas llazzard : It's riglit yen rnay lie, Burtoni. Buit it Fseuln like nonsense. What fer weould le be coining bavk? It sfosns tinlkilng li. would after thpes. twe years and ne wvord at Rli-e l ead promii:se eay in our hands; (grm:mly) theugli mayhap ah. keepa it freali with lier 4alty te \u003cthere îs li-ghtinig and Ili under, andI a spiasçh of rai? flU\u003e- Corne , vaine in. Tbere's the. storm lireaking. And the lad not ini off the- sea. (They enter the cottage. The night has btackcnefld cown aboi4t th.mn as fhey talked, and the door opeving and closi\u003cng raakes a fleeling goilen aploieA of1 Ziht in the dirk as they pas. iihin.\u003e SGENý-E IL. TIJtK: Next msornisg. SCENE: Outside of flic cottago-. 0rotiped about the door and lookisg every noiv and then unea-sily out Io sea, are frs. Hlazzard, h.,' daughtler. Mary, and Thomas Haaaard iih Burton 6'oodrrock. There c.,. be h.eard the xlileis, sodden booming of abating seas along the rocks besiel the peah. Burto\u003en Gooderoek: It's a raw rnerning yet. And the. yellow eloudzare~ ragged before the. min. Thomias Hazzard: Yes. you'd better net b. away yet, Y@xi muis wait tiUl the. lad cornes. Maybe le spent the night in Silver Tiekis. Jane Hlazzarc, the. wife: But would lie not run around home now in the rorning whexi the. steru is clearingi f. Ie oild have been long heme (thAros her .pron to her eyea). It's lost h. à. He's lost! He's lost! Tho. sea las tùkeu another oe! Mary Hazzard (apeaking $indsy arnd coolly) : Mothoe, mayhe the. Sea lia noL. W. have no surenes yet. Father, could h. b. piek.d up by onie of the. fleetl They started out st evenixug and tliey did xiot \u0026Hl put back viien the sun houxids thickened on the sky. Burton Gooderock (who ha. been peerinsg clown \u003co the shore to som.ehing hsees to the lef t of the %ts and the losding beach) . That rnay b. juat what hnhappened. Yeu ail stay lier. if rnaybe lie rornes aiung Iy land, snd l'I go -e if there.s any w\u003erd by the. shore. Mary (to Aim as h. passes her goiupg \u003clou-n) : W1it do yen se Burton Gooderoek (hurying by) : Wait! Hush! Thomas azzr: There goes afriend ef lite. But he'is alwayis tee rnueh givn t hpesan -deas. Depaiinly lie lad ilst. Re was lone ln \u003etelittle boat wheu the. storin broke. Pool that 1 was not to~ go Out te him JaneHazzrd:Yen could flot go on thei sea in atorm. With your srma",
         "TUE CANADIAN MAGAZINE goe oweould yout And al[ tii.other men were witii the fleet. And Burton Gdcrock in tua old for brooking storms. (In.a sort of abadepd. gritnn) Jamaie wasin God' bandson thie se\u0026 Anidif tiiere's urtAo\u003cd did il. (lot loves the. »es, 1 think. It'a a ting lie keepa to break atrong men and boys with. * lIt'a a thing H keeps to hurt women witii, wii.n He lots it whitenover the rocks in the lac nighit with only one star shining. Mary: There was one star high up over-thiesea laat night. 1 aaw it rock. ing in tii. Watek wind w*ile 1 at by the. window. Jane HazArd: Ont atar, diti you aay, one star?1 Then it ès truc. Tiiat wvaa Jaiaiie\u003es Roui. Go4 took il for 1h.s Heaven, anti le's left us lonely now; snd no ad rowngup to a trong bringing in the. fish iarvest f romn the ses. Qoti's selishthewayHeuffs theoses. 1 osuiiot cry auy more. My eyes are the cyff of a dry oki woiiin. 1 eau only talk about tii. mca and the. 1lste of (3od (A.r voic. ri-qng in hksteri.). Tiiat'a wliat it le, the. lste of Got (ker eyes are staring uqtk a digiraugt look in# them. Thomtas ia beut toit/ face avert.d f rffl th. nea, leaniug hard .goinsi the cottage door). Thiomas llazzard: 1 waa born; rigiit yond8r iu th, tumnbleti houa. bouide theos. And I 'y, follow.d tiie ses \u0026Il uy day. I 've seen one lad go overboard oi a ulippery d..k in thei blac4k o' usidnigiit; andi anotiier die of fever on the aisud. Andi now tiie lsd himasit i g oue, the young lad, jzoue the. way uf tht. ses. Coine mugid., Mothe. the. morning'a rsw andi the. way ther.'. sobbing of l vaveR down slung the rocks 1 don't lik. to hoar kt Mary: You're tau certain of aor-row. T'eu siiould wait avile lu b. ati Jamuie\u0026s msyb. safe anti wsiting sornewbere ouly te b. let hurry home viien th. sa'. dowu, or the tie'. eut along the patii by the. shiore. Set yen the. lire golug, Kotiier. witii tiie wooti ii gatiier.d, to lighten the. boua. anti wsrm the. corner, snd l'Il watcii by tiie door tli he surel' coes (Thy g inand asMary, watches, Burto. 0oodcrocc appeara cosimg (iwy pthe pahfo h e. ay: Any newwt Burton Gooderoek: Wii.ro are thcyt Mary: L.side. What have you heardi Dit! yen see auything down hy the. shor Burton Gooeck: The seas took hlm. I vas seing before viien yen were all tshking, a litti. boat by tii. lft shore. Andi I elimbeti \u0026long the. alippery rooks, and it's isi boat. Mary:- Then Ged liais ou. tirne bas been erued. He took uur Jamai.. Our telling tii.m vill b. no ucv tale. They'r. believing at trutii alroady. But Burton Gooderock, God is ual always cruel, in He ? Wmi't He moud my lover bsek agmin, snd won't -h. follow the sa for us ln Jamies.' tadat Burton 43etirock: I 'm tiiinking He msy, Mary, tiioughii t's s md, sat werld thia rsw mrigwith the. yeilow cdtin thke aky andth le wavus aob- bin, ad he in stllcrying. (Tk.y turus and enter the. cottage. As the. d*or opens, th. fi.. of Jamties ga*Isnwd sticks i. wen crsekiing ceal,.) sCENE Ili. TINI: À ,pee Lafer. 8CENE: In the. cottage. The t?\"Àer ilionth4ebed. Thmm sHoew\u003cd standing by the. fire on orne side; Burton l,\u0026,id.kbeM hi.. I. the centre of the roui. Mary is standing toit/i 8A.rwood Du,,alk wea t. ker. Siiervooti Duuslk:. Tien vill you net marry me, Mary? Mary: Bii.rvood Dunalk, hov ean Il 1 hated you once for yo-ur forevr urging viien yuknew my beart vas withiml aw. But 1 don't hat, nov: I bel.,.e yen lov'1lv'e, impomibly; aud 'ti.s a ard way to love, and Iîam",
         "A WOMAN'S IHEART soi'ry for you. You're a good mani, Sherwood »iualk. luit how can a womn wed with the best good mani whien her heart 's away ixi etlwr placeis? 'tiu \u0026ee- ing cilles ail whiles and] hir in the streeta of them, and ini *fie stores, ant(i in the businieus places. It 's flot that l 'in wantixig rny heart te b. seeing such things. But my heart goes its owxi way, liko a womnat's heari, fi auppooe.ý a'ways. Thornas llazzard: A womn's heart ia a fool's heuLrt, Mary; that. I'm thinkixig, is true. Why eari you not take thie mani who loves yout IIU be kind to yoxi, and te usa all. Aud lie's a strong man, Gqd grzwe Iiiii, witli iana madefor he ea and the liauliig of nets i the, chily veather of Jawn. Mary: I'd b, wanting te Ke his eyes iin tie iuada of your chidrxi, 8her- wood Dmralk; and te trear iris voiet, whejr your ciudreni talked lirst te nie in the niglit heuirs with yotu away oni the sea. Woiild you b. conitent wlth à woman the like of that ini lhe herse? You 'd ire hurt teel inuch by niy watider- lng heart, Sherwoed, I'm thinkixig; in the, night tinie alwaya, sudi ili the. day when the suri la briglit andi shining over far citles, and Unai rem.renb.ering. Jarre Hazzard cal and speaks froux the, bëd: Mary, Mary' , heaa*en; Vve. awonan 's heart, and its love is for Thomras Rassardi, yr\u003eur father. Buta luma in ome cases has more te do thrax follow the. love cf lier heart. That often happens li our ialand wlren thre sea talc,. first loves away, Marry thre lad, Mary. For he loves very greatly. anrd he's a truc, strong man., Ard a true strexig mani makes a good life for a womnax always. Anrd sur.ly a.v.r th. ether lad wll b. comixig back again. Mýary (8p.o/cing v.ry stowIi, in. a .ar, l\u003cow voire) : 1 alwayas said h.e wotild andbeieedhle would, Mther, tll the satook Jamsie Ood se.mto ielet tiug the. world b. cruel since then. The,,., was ernoller than 1 thought 'twould bc. And, nrybe b. is crueller, tee, than 1 think lie k (3od il Ittfg hlm b., But that's ne matter! I amn his wexan always. Burton Geodcrock: He wlll net corne, Mary. 1 have her. a bit ef a news- paper. It travelled frein bis city. And it says lie will net e. Mary: Whatl Let me see! Is he deadt Burton Goodero\u003cek: No, b. is net dead, Mary, bt- Thromas H'azzard: Ma.rried, is 'lie? I thouglit as mauch. And why airei4dxi't het He's get the. taste of cities in has mlod. Mary: Pather, don't- Sli.rwood (ioitk hi. head bowed and spea\u0026irg v.ry s*1114\u003e: A wemnan'x ).art ius a trsxige thing, Thomas Hiazard--st range, inde.d, au th.e~ ae;a un- certain anid as sure. Let lier be. 'Tis thre way of lier heart that eompuh. ber, But fI b. thia boume'. mani. And you'II not starve iry the. winter shre. in the cold mentira. There'l] ie lire and food. For ury love alse la the. love of a man ferever. And though she'fl net corne te me--beeaue pire cwanut-yet I'm her ma~n la my own 'heart ferever. And V'Il care for lier and for aIl of you here in the. cottage where yen live. (H. goc. ottt,) Mary: And Ire'Il do it, tee. For lie is a true strong mani. And you woa't ned te fear famirne and eold because rie maxi is for yen on the sa. Ad r, da, m, day, frein tihe far cilles lie will ceerne-penliaps-anI, if b.e doe. net coethr'J b. niglitsa yway wlien he'l l ie wanting te eome, and te hear th ea. A maxi neyer fergýets thre sea. ?liereIl b. niglit. he'hI b. wantin Lo ear the ses. Tliere'hl b. nigirta ie'll b. rernembering our taiks together ythe. shoere inthe red sunset, and wliex thre moon was white in the. aky, and whnthe sars were whispering. What niglits lie dec. that lie'» b. my man even in the. far cities. He'1I b. my man then-i An m bist woman toreer.",
         "THt M~Y5TI VICATIQH ôf WENJWOR1H ,Y raFrnkDG5 ýPnecan. AlPRI WENTWORT11, youing, Rhandsomle, twenty4Lix\u003c mat in hie bachoelor apartmentu star- iug in auamasit at a letter h. bad jus open.d and at the. oleek which lieddropedfroin the euvelope. With puzzld brow li. Io\u003cked froia one to the other, but there %va. Dothing ther. ~~to e flinhi Tite letter was ad- dremd inhi»nainean d te his rooms. The. checÔk wam made out in his favour -botii were very .vidently mient for im. But the. puzzled expresion of his face omly deepenodl wh.n ho rea4 the. letter through a sceond ie; Office of Tho Plamot. DearBir-We rc ladto inform y0' that yotaf story, entered in our prize com- petition that closed N.vember lot, han been awarded a pria of *350, and we take plsure in aS*i*\u003cJOUIer.witL our check forthâ amun. oingwewll b. fav- oured with otber contribu'tions from yotir Pen, we are PLANET ULIGC. Mr. \"s~ph W.atworth. What dld it all mean? W.ntworth huil nÉ\u003evpr written a storv in his i.fe at Ieaait, %% a. real. Thev Planet Pub- lishing Ooiupany h. knew to be a aub- stantial1 corporation with a big baiik accotant. The, check was macle out in hi. naine on a reputable batik and wa evexi certifie4, that there iinight bc no doubt of its validity. It looked to Wentworthi at first blush as though he were two hundred and fifty ahead vithout any effort on his part. But the neit moet he f.It ashamed of the. thought. \"I V belongs to soin. oth.r Ralpb Wentwortii, of course,\" he said to himself, \"some oo fellow wiio for- got to coe i d di ms inhisi- elteinont when sendili¶thexu hi. atoey, and the. FSewt people probahly pot my addrea in the directory and de- cid.d itmuet b.me. l'Il moud the chek back 'with a note of explmna- tion ', He feit 80 vlrtuous over the reun-u dlation of the. substantial priz. that",
         "THE MYSTIFICATION OP WE;NTWORTII ,features, try as lie would. It med ridiculeusly simple at first uneo-h. had flot written al story for !prize anid therefore the prize ild net belong te imii. But why i lie ree(eived( it 7 That was the ýnt tiret vould net bie sxpIained off- nd, an(d befere lie reached thre news- per office lie liad decided upen a mn of action tiret would set al ibts at reat. [le weuld ask te sec the manutscript Lhe prize story-merely through riouity, lie was forced te admit te aself. By no process of reasening ild lie bring himacif te hope that mission might resuit in prefit te amIl. 1~t thie office of tire Planet Publish- SCompany lie w-as met by a suave ing min, soliciteus te serve him. II atu Mr. Wentwortb,\u003e' uaid [ph, expeting the Ptanet man te preperl iurpreuaed. 1Yes ir,\" uaid the elerk, \"what i I do for yenf\" el received this note f rom T'he me.t to-day,» said Wentwerth, pro- ünug thre mysterionu letter. Tire rk red it through, and hLi. man- ,echanged et once. 'DeligrLed te meet yen, Mr. Went- rth,\" 11. exclaimed, \"irow can we e tact is,\" b. stammered, »oe mucli trouble I would adiu loo a bte [rigenl b eeatfaer.»terh 4\u003cCertainly, Mr. Wtitwortii,\" b. said, -~ I have ne deulit tiiet rail be ar- raxiged. If yeu'I*1 bc geodl Ceneu)lgir te taket a sqeat and wait al few oumerti 1 will ýjpeek te P1r. Adam\u0026\"ý. Wentworth séat do n rir a win- dow and tht, petite younig moari dIIUIp- peared into an inner officv, Iii a frw moments hoe returucvd witli a ill packet of manuaci,,(rip)t. 'The(ýre yeu are-, P1r.Wewoh, lie said, handing hiim thtw utory, -f suppose yelininust think pretty highly of tiret., Wentworth said nothing, but bow- ed his thauks and reached rallier eegerly for the manuaiijcript. Then lie tnrned te the wliidow. took oee glance at the- firet page and stertcd lin disbelief et bis ownl eyes. It lva u i ii liandwvriting. le sat dovri with hi. b[Lck t4\u003e tiie obliging clerk, and. withI the meinu- script on lus knte, lookedl at it aga. There wa. ne doulut of it. Either h. lied penned those paes or the other Ralph Weutworth carried out tii. duplication of persoualities te the. absurd length of duplienting hi. hendwriting. Witi bis hirain lin a whirl of amae ment and a rather crespy feeling ln his ejuine tellung hlm tiier. vas u ome- Lhing uueauuy about tiie affair, Esipli looked for litti. peculisrltie b. knew bis handwriting poseod-ii crss ing of \"t's\"nd the makiixe of final \"d's\" and -e's. \" Tiiey vere ail tire. Beyond Lbe ahadow of doulit h. lied vrlttu thre tory. But 11ev? Uixder vhat supen prize story-he vi. lied neyer in bis life vritteii a loUter moeo than throe pages lin lengtht H.w ha4. eaddrs leaving tb. afig1rtestimrsonn i \" Wel, 1et' soe vbat it. about h. said to hiulf snd wth a etrng quit. as thug e vere aommoe eW to the \u0026istpage ofthe ansrp",
         "TIIE CANAIAN MAGAZINE Meved,\" read s foilowa; Dr. Chester slowly stirr-ed h~is cof- t.ee and remained silent go long that Holebird, sitting opposite humi at tiie table, playfully snapped hiia fngers te bring him baek toe arth. Co ernile, do.,\" lie mait, \"tàis wori't do. Wak. up. What were yen dreamling of? Semne fair charmer of ti. pati\" Se ..aylng he filleti a tiny glu with brandy sn ud he thi. deenter tomward his cemnpanion. Wlth a start the dector lied renacti blmself tromn his reverie and, sighing deeply, rubiiet hi. eyes s thougi lie would bruali away the. inerlres that b.d enthralled him. \"Ilolabird,\" .e sali, etter a moem- ent, -thie Itii. th nnlversary of the affair that gaddened My wiiale lite, eut short my career asa physieien andi made me what yen have founti me-- purpos(,eea rovinç speudtiirift without su ambition in life. \" - And what wu. tbis affair that lied se dileastrous a termination 1 \" asketi Holabird llgiitly. He b.d net zi.ted the. mrlous tone in wiih the. doctor \"Te eat of y wife, \" said Dr. Chester gravl. \u003c'Your *iiatl\" h. demanded sit-. tiug up guddenly aud staring et hif. frienti. «'When diti you have a wlfetr H. broke off anddenly wlien lie mew the srleneneu of the. doctor's face, sud then added: \"Iý beg yeu r pardon, doer. 1 amn s fool, I might hve known that aine. much of\u003cyour pasthlfe is unkuown to me tiiere miglit have been-\" Dr. Chiester raiseti his hem!. - It' all right, Tom,\" h. said, \"uer. i. ne nesti of any apolqgy. It iz a ehapter in my 11he that bu. been dlo.sd se long and at which so few ef my friends have even lied a glimpe thet yen coulé! net b. .xpec- tsd te know aything about t. bIthe cirele in *hich 1 have moveti for thie last t.n y.arsuIpassa behelo!. I am better satified tat t is s It saves me the pain of making expiant- tiens. It prevents the. re-oeniiig of the. olti wotind. Wiien 1 met yen a few years age 1 saw ne reason for msking anl exception of yeu and let- ting yen lcnew tiier. lied been a rom. anc. andi a tragedy in iny lit,, \"But as our acquaintanve ripeneti aud w. grew dos;er and eloser togeti- .4: I have trequently been on the point of telling yenu tiie stery. To. niglit, the. anuiversary ot Mildred'a desth, the mod is upon ine agein. I have theuglit et it ali day. That wu why I wss se jpreoccupied et dinnor to-niglit. Had 1ne determineti te tell yen the. story I would net now have mentioed the. suhjeet whici lias been ever present iu miy mind for more than a deoade ef years.\" -Wliatever yen say, docter, I shail, of course, regard as a sacreti couid. enoe,\" aiti Holabird aolemnly. \"I knew that, Tom,\" sait Dr. Chester warmly, \"or I would still re- main silent. \" He peured out a glus of brandy, tonsed lu off andi began him @tory, to which Holabird liisteued witii sbsorb- ed interest. \"Wlien the. World's Fair w.. at ite heiglit lu Ckloae,\" began Dr. Che. ter, \"I1 came here trem New York -s a pleasure-seeker. I was wesltliy, hap- py and independent. Atter gradua- tien from two of the. big medical achoola iu New York 1 rapidly ac- quireti a large practice, andi ita re- strgglngyoung physciane *ho hati attendeti the. medieal ellege wltli me sud whms Uines lied net talion iu snch pleasant places. \" Until Icame te thie Wrld's Fair I had neyer Ieoked on a womn witk more tha -asn iterest. By smre chance I lisd escapeti the usaa juve- -ilv far .ruhwihms",
         "THE MYSTIFICATION OF WENTWORTH shool friends, invited nme to spend an evening a1 hie homte. That night tiie whÔle eourse of my lif e was changed. The. womnan whomn fate, had re.served for mie was there. Site wus hi.4 siter, MiIdred Atherton.\" Dr. Chester paused Wo pour another g1a of brandy, and Ilolabird relight- .d bis cigar. \"I wvill not bore you, Tom, with a deoription of her beauty,\" the doctor went on, '.or of mny enciiantmnent vhien 1found she %vas disposed to look uipon me with favour. Enough to gy liat after a brief and somiewhat im1petuonus courtship M1ildrvd eonsen- ted to b. mny wife. Before the elose of the Expoition-less than thre montls after I first saw her-w. were married. \"Of course, 1 waa supreiney hap- py. 1,1ke a boy on his fire-t holiday, 1 lanned a lengthy bridad tour whielh imoiluded nlot only the. tiaditional swing around the cirele of the great .asterni cilles, but a week of perfect rt mnd quiet at may father's farmi in central New YorÛ. M1ildred waa9 delighted. Travel was lier hobby, but, pesdas sh. was by the novel aiglits of the. seacost cities, she was even more èiiarmned withh e unusual sur- roundings of the dear 016i farn I had fiways eailed 'homie.' \"Reared ini a eity, and knowing ntigof the delights of country ifmy bride revelled in the. peace- ju deligiits o! the. farun and its sur- ronndings. Chiefly she loved the. old well--my boyhood 's friend. Night after ululit, hanging on my arm, sh. would strôil down the shaded walk to the old mossy well, and, leaning over thc eurb, watch the bueket as I snt it dowxi, down, until it plunged into the. ice-eold water. Then, with Uoie of childiali deliglil, site would wMteh ils aseent until, brimming with thdcear water, il rested on tiie earb. Thon she insisted on drinking froin the b)attered old bucket, declaring tha a upor a glaus took away the. fehesof the. water, and in Ibis I \"Wel,~ at sat th. weeýk on thp farin was over and we camne hiome Wo the house I had ordered prvpared for miy queeit in (hivago. Everything was as I had drcd.Nottingii wam a 1. ing Wo make the litt!. home a mniniature palace, and M1ildrèd waxas- dolighted wvith it sa.4 hagi brenl a evw dityv bi.- fore wviîi the homnely eomfortsagiti rudeà surrouindinga o! the farihonse. - But before a week was out I ai%% a change in r my girl--tii(. firat ahadow Ihad ever seenl u1pon 1wr brow. I noticed liaI she iaýeeme worried aind abstractvd when ah.r thought I1a not observing ber, and whviu i qe ioned her ahi- inu.iste-l dii- w.. iRot wvorried by atiything ini the wofrld., She strove in eir.y way Wo alla'y uiy anxiety, buit, (ilp iqte lier bieat efforts, I saw thatIlier mental trouble iucres.- ed. sitix e h would, Kit Ftarinig out of thi. windlow as thiouigi sh. w.r witliessxnig soin(e greal ,ataïtrophe in the street, and wheul 1 smugbt an, ex planalion ah. lsuighed4 at mv inquirie.. and a8sur.d meu nothing wam wrong., -At firut 1 ascrib.di il all lu net. vouaneman sd hys.teria and I applied ail mny professionial \u003eýkiil W it nmn the case, But as th. da. went by site grew more and more worried, and aI lenglu, on. night. ah.e adijtd flie was soine mysterions trouble- with ber throaî that wa8 amxinivg lier. With ail my feara aroused i at once moad. a Most minute aitd wearchiiig examina. lion, but at it8 close I wai. forced to eonfess myselif bafflied. I couldg midi abaolutely nothing abuornmal--noth- ing liat should have givt.in m ifr. the. leait trouble. \"I tried Wo explain to her that ber trouble wa.. pur.ly imnaginary and advised a change of sçene, to gel ber mind on other thinge. I planned a trip Wo Cuba for lhe w-inter, but sh. responded apathetieally*N and aeemned to grow more wornied and abstrae.tedl. \"The. mental strain began Wo tel1 on lier appearane. Her sprightlineoe was all gone. Sh. was paleý amil lan- guid, with a, weareýd look in lier eye eonstantly, exeept wh.u \u003eah. strova tii",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE banish it while talking with me. 8h. toôk no intere8t in amnythiing-thea- tres, society, drives, bookâ-ail were put asid.. I grew alarined lest what my profe.sional training told me muet h.e imagination should develop iuto a reai malady. \" One night as 1 was droppmng off te aleep I wss startled to observe that Mlldr.d appeared to be treinbling b.- side me. 1 turned and saw that mixe was in a paroxysm of fear, aud that botix ber bauds were clutchinf at lier thro*t. Springing from bied Itiirned upthe ight and begged lier to teilme .htha tartled ber. Iii whispers ah. finally told me the awtul fear that b.d been elutehlug bier heart with a band of l.e. 8he belleved tiiere was som.tblng An ber throat and she b.- Uee t wasf alive,\" Holabird started from bis chair, staring et Dr. Chiester An borror and amasement. \"Alive t\" h.e repeated. \"Y..,\" said the. doctor, \"tbat was bier ever-present nightmare. 1 wua in desipair. Ail niy arguments, al My seieutifie explanation, were of no avail. Little by litti. ah. told me bow the Tbing telt, tb ber dis- ordered imagination. At flrst, mii. said, sh. noticed a slight tickling sen- sation in ber throat and trled te re- moe At by coughing. Wben sbe eougbed it w'ould disappear, but after a tiim. At was preent again, aud sorne- times in a different place. At the b.e- glnng her nervousneos ws eaused l.y fear that mii. was beeoming ill- devéloping Borne throat or lung trou- ble that xnigbit become permanent. But one alternoon, wbule ah. waa lying on a eoueh, the. borror of her life came upon her suddenly. \"8Sh. feit the. Thing inoving in ber iuto another room, feUl upon ber kneu,ý and prayed. Tii. sudden action broughit relief, for, when ah. waa able te coilect hier senses and fix tbem upori the, horror, the Thing had gone. There wau no mnovement there. (REven after that my professional training scoffed at her story of dles- pir. I could net bring myseif to be- leethere was anytbing in the. case but disordered nerves and an over. taxed brain, and I prescrib.d the. pbysician's only remedy in sunob au emergeney--change of air sud of seene. I dropped everytbing and took bier on a long tour, but I ight as weil have remained at home witb lier. The. Thing traveiled with us. \"lb neyer left lier mind for an in-~ stant, and at night mii. would stirtie me by elutcbing my arm suddenly, grasping et bier tbroat and whiser iug that it was there. I begau to e bier mimd would give way uinder the strain, and after oui' returru home, te satisfy myseif and leave no means un- tried, I summoned in consultation two of the mnoat noted physicianq in the. coumtry. I told them everytiig, and begdtbem, as brother practitionera, te give my unfortunate Mildr.d the. most eare.ful and painstakiug examin- ation possible. \"'At its close 1Iwas as much i n the dark as ever. Dr. RLupert and Prof. Hlathaway agreed there waa notblng -absolutely notbing - about rny wAfe's tbroat that ihould caus. any sucb hallucinations, and theii' jndg- ment coincided wltb mine. tbat the,",
         "THE MYSTIFICATION OP WENTWVORT11 \"Dead,» repeated Dr. Chester quiet, ly. \"I called for help and dispatched usrvants for Dr. Rupert and Prof. Hathaway. When they came I had given up hope and was sitting like a statue, staring at the dead face of my wjt.. Both physicians made a brief examination of the body, and after assuring themselves that Mildren was dead, led me away te another apart- ment. I wua eaim, but it was the, calm ot a da7ed mnan, and the two dee.- tors decided te leave me alone. \" For an hour I st there, atunned and motionlesg. Then I was seiwld with an insane ides that I could yet riisuitate M.%Ildrd-that hoe was not gone, that there was still ife rusiad to the room where she lay and Dluwg myseif upon the body, in an agony ot grief, my face preaed agpinst her beautiful white neck. As 1 lay there my numhed senses were uddenly startled into activity by gemehingwhich perhaps appealed principaly te my trained protessional sene. Her throat beneath may cheek vns threbbing with faint, regular pulsations! \"Instantly I arose and stared at the dead face. There was ne hint ot lit.. I applied my ear te thehbeart. AlI ws stil and pulseless. But when I $laeed rny ear directiy upon the spo on Mildred's neck where I had frtdiscerned the movement I again disoerned a rapid, rhythmic pulsa- tion l 1 I shouted àloud for help, and vlan a servant came ini, trembling, I get 1dm for the two doctors, who vere smoking andi talking in an upper rom. Barring the door behind the. çaping servant I teld the physicians of ydiscvery. In amnazement they tidteexperiment, and eacii dis- tntyfeit the movemnent. Prof. Hatawy looked at me rather peint- -Ife nodded and se did Dr. Rup-rt. I liesitated a moment, lI de net objeet te an examin- atiou,' I sakd, fer 1 tekt I wax on the threshold o! a solution et the, mystery\", but 1 will net b., presnt i wili leave it ini your baudis.' I hurri.d out et the. reem, and i n hait an heur Prof. lHathaway saught mie eut. - cileiter,' h. maid, 'the, exam1ni at;on is over.' - What didYeu dot' I asked, hait fearing We learn. - 'W. madie a amail incision in t h, throat where t1Le strange signm et lite developeti,' ha nid. \" 'And yen tound-- V' I demnan- dcd. -\"'This,' hereplied, hlding forth on his hand the. Thing tii.: had houn- deti xy Mildred te the, grav- amall, green water-4izard.- \u003c'Whatt\" cri.d Ilelabird, aprng. mng up, \"alive?\" \"Alive,\" said Dr. Chester. *The poor girl had undoubtedly swallow- ed it inembrye while drnking atthe olti well on the tarmn, anti it h\u0026d Iived and grown in ber stomarèl.\"- \"Anti that,\" said Hlolahird, with starting eyes, \"wau the. Thing-\" \"Which cost ber lite,\" omludmt the deetor, -that's ail my story, Toni. Pass the. brandy.\" The. thing waa poeltively uncauny, anti it waa a solemn ani rathur scar.d face Wentworth presenteti te the. clerk wh.n lie banded back the mxanuscript. \"Find what yen want.d, sirl\" asked the elerk bnlghtly. \"Ohi-r-ai-es, 1Itouifld t, stammered Wentvorth, - it'* ail right, thank yen. I'm very mtaeh obliged for yotar kintinesa.\" \"Net at ail. Corn. ln aai, air,\" saiti the. clerk affably. Wentwerth stammered oehg incoherent and8 stumhled out etfithe office in.a daze. Theii. w fs gettng ossesio ofhim.Wha di it all meant he auketi himse.lt for the. hundredth time. There wasno qne",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE tion now that the chuck wa. intended for hini-that he and no oCher Raipli Wentworth lied won the. prirw. But how had it happenedl Unablo to frame a logical answer te hi, own question, he reaehed the street in a direamy, unbelieving state of mmid, and lnâtlnctively turned the. righit corners and dodged the. vehleles until h. found himself st hie own deor. Hlis valet, quiet, imperturbable Johinson, admitt.d hlm. Johrison took hie hat aud coat and deftly wheeled an eaay chair te the. fire. Wentworth wateied hlm abgently. Sudduly an ides struek hlm. \"Johinson,\" h.e exolaimed \"have yen ever seen around lier. a long euv.lepe-osie of the. mort they call dunet envelope-I mean one with aziythng init. Big sud bulky, yen Ilis valet studied a moment, while Wcntwortli watohed. hlm auxiously. \"Yoit mean 11ke thiq, air?\" ho aaked, going te a cabinet aud produe- ing a paeket o! long envelopea. - Yes, yes, \" said Wentworth eager- Wy, \"that'. the sort. Did yen ever notice eue of thoa. wlth auything in 1I thlnk 1 did, air,\" said Johnson. \"When?1\" demanded Weutwerth. \"How wasitf What did you do with \"The. one I saw 1 mailed, sir,\" said the. valet, \"I hope there's nothing ' aied?1\" echoed Wentworth, \" to whom? H ow did you hasppeu te mail itit\" -I don 't reinember nowv how it was addressed, air,\" said Johnson, \"but I remember one mnoruing 1 fond oe ef those big envelopes with a lotter lu it ail sealed sud addressed and stamp- Kd on yonr desk here, and 1 mnailed it. You always leave any mail here for me te drop lu the box if you have been writlug lat. nt niglit, air, you know.\" \"Tes, yes, 1 kuow,\" said Went- worth eagerly, \"but how do yen hap- pen to remember thia apecial lettert» \"Well, sir,- said Johinson, -it lied three or four stamps or) it and il wus so big snd bulky and heav.y. gir, tbat 1 sort ofkept itin mnd. 1iue-vtr had a letter like that here beforo, sir.' Wentworth was paeing the flo\u003eor ex- citedly by that tiniie. The truil wua growing wariu. \"Now, Johinson, try and thinik\", he commauded, \"eau 't yon remeruiber wbenl it wau you fourid that letter h.,.,7\" \"FI' a2imost Positive, sir,\" said has valet, \"that it was the licit mioruiug after you eame home so late froin Nfr. Holroyd 's heehelor dinuer, sir.\" Wentworth suddcnly eMaed pacling the. floer, and clapped hia livids to- getber with a inighty snmavk. 'Ti\u0026t'S it,\" he cried xtdI \"that bachelor dinner bring-i it \u0026,Il back to me. That's wbiert, 1 hetard it. By George, that's right. l)o(-* Bald- win told thie story. That's the- very aYs ir,\" agreed Johnson, who had been watchlng hie mnaster 's antoes in sotue àlarm. Wentworthi stared at hlm as thouglibh. had just be-omp aware of his presenco lu thv rooin. \"Johnson,\" he said udnlplac. ing both hands on the alilders of,. hie servant, «\"did you see me when came in that nilhtý\"' \"I did, sir,\" eaid Johnson simlyI. \"\u003cTell tiie truth now, Johinson,\" voinmanded Weultworth, was 1 drunrk?\" -No, sir, \" answered the valet, \"I should say you were a bit exceited, sir. 1 helped you off with your dlothes anid you weut riglit to bed, sir, inside of flye minutes. \" Wentworth stared at the floor a long tinie, and thon bis face slowly eared. \"By George!\" lie inuttered at length, -1 got uip lu flie niglit and wrote that in my' sleep! \" \"Yes, sir,\" said Johnson, \"what will you wear tus afternoon, sir?\"",
         "CAP ROUGE, FROM THIE LOOK-OUT 1ISTOKt CAROLKjGiE Q. THlE St. Louis Road, leading out froin tiie eity of Quebec along the. higii shiore of tiie St. Law- rence, cornes te a sudden end at the. Cap Rouge, and a long hli street dipi down into the. village 1eneath tihe red cliff. Across the. bridge over the little Cap Rouge river, whieh after wan- dering tiirough the uarrow valley, here meets the, tide ef the. big river, the house-bordered rod contiues mitil the. opposite height is reaciied, tisat of St. Augustin in the next par- jobs. Imoôking down, eue sees eiiurcii, convent, aud clustering cottages. Looking off, one sees the xnile-wide St. Lawreuce flewing between iiigii- wooded shores that must have lo\u003c\u003eked the saine te Tndian or voyageur pad- dling uilently by ini eanoes as do to,- day pasneson great ocean liuera. * \u0026irc/z4i. NO more beautifuil or pearefut spot than Cap Rouge eau b, fouind in al) the Domninion; the stirriig evtti of early history have left no traces, no scars, and no tail siiaft of stone or bronze recorda tiiern, as might well bc expected wiien we realiz. that we stand on the spot where the. int at- tempt was made to eolonize North Ainerica, altiiongh St. Augustin. in Florida claims the oldest permanent colon y. That the. promiontory' . now the city of Quebee, should have been the. choie. of Champlain wau certainly as great a point of interest for the, in- faut eolony as it la to-day for the pic- turesque old French Cauadiau elty. Quebec boldly faces ail *ho sal up the, great river, anid very bl\u003cêak an~d highi the, gray rock inust have seemed te those on board the sniÀIl ships n bigger than our most insignificant . ......... ...... - C\"",
         "Ti. t0LL.-ATE ANI) BRIDGE, CAP ROUGE THE BACK ROAD, CAP ROUGE",
         "HISTORIO CAP ROUTGE TUE COVE, CAP ROVGÉ AN OLD HOUSE AT CAP ROUGE",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE MENS HUTS ON A PINE RAFýT AT CAP ROUGE modern sailing craft. No doubt to Jacques Cartier the little cove of Cap Rouge looked a more snug spot, at the first break in the high shore line above Quebec of the western end of what now appears like a dry island, as if in ages gone by there had been water on both sides of the high and narrow land, where to-day there is a big swamp below Ste. Foye; then the up- lands again, and the background of all, the Laurentian Mountains. After Cartier's two voyagers of discovery, the King of France with great floursh of titles, proclaimed for the New World a viceroy in Jean Francois de la Roque, Seigneur de Roberval, Lord of Novembeque, who was also to be his \"Lieutenant General of the Armies in Canada, Hochelaga, Saguenay, Newfoundland, Belle Isle, Labrador, The Great Bay, Baccoloes, and Cap Rouge\". This grand order for a colony was given in 1540, but such trouble was found to get anyone to compose the \"Armies of Canada\" that the most desperate characters were liberated from prisons to take their chance of life or death on the hazardous expedi- tion. What with the difficulties of procuring men, ships, and supplies, it grew too late in the season to get up the St. Lawrence. Jacques Cart- ier was then put in commission as Captain General and Master Pilot to go with Roberval; but the Viceroy still delaying, Cartier started out alone, in 1541, and finally reached Cap Rouge, where he moored his ships and unloaded two that were to be sent back to France. Knowing every inch of Cap Rouge ground as I do, it is almost like look- ing at a picture, to read of the com- ings and goings of Cartier's little band up and down the cliff, on the point of which they built a fort, while below in the valley they cleared en- ough land to sow a few vegetables. Roberval did not arrive, and the win- ter must have been terrible, so that I",
         "HISTORLO CAP ROUGE at the opening of navigation Jacques Cartier saw nothing to do but return te France. On the outward voyage h. met Roberval, who ordered imi to go back again. With the winter's ex- perieneu ail too freish, Cartier refus- ed te obey, and as the easiest way of ending the argument, slipped away the first dark nighit, with ail sals set for Franee. Roberval continuied on Up the St. Lawrence, te fouind hia colony at Cap Rouge; and, being better equipped thasi Cartier had been, ha started at once te miake more comnfortable quarters for the winter. Another fort was built, dcscribed as «beautiful te look upon and of surpassing strength within, with two corps de logis, and an' annex of forty-five by fifty-flve feet in length, eontaining kitchen, offices, and two tiers of cellars. Near thera lie buit a bakery, a miii, and dug a well. Glose beside his ships Roberval built a two-story boeuse, for the provisions of whieh lie was te kilow the Iaek, aithougli a rotiple of shipe were sent at once te France for more and the colenisti put n a strirt allowance, France ?'ritma wa te lie the namev of the ceuintry, and Cap Rouge was te be known as Charles- bourg Royal. That they hiad an appalling tinte among theinsgelves- niit well b. ex- pected froem the bad chararers rlos.l en te conte eut, and oe man nan.d Gaillon was hangedl for rolbbery, whiler others were chaincdil and a womian whpeda a commein sol '\u003cau the7 couldl ]ive in p ansdqieea, as the old cheilrof flic volony puts it, Scrv-arried off fiftYpele When the spring came Roberval fol- lowed Cartier and retuirned te France. Fer sixty-five years Canada was forgotten then Chamnplain ramie te Qudlice, in 1608. In the old records w. learn that a road was eut eut te Cap %o1$m as early as 1638, and a few families set- tled in the sheltered valicy, wIhere RAVENSCLIFFEý\" CAP ROUGE",
         "THE CANAI)IAN MAGAZINE they, took thieir chiance of Indian raids, 'J'le life of Cap RZouge frei thait period waq just thiat of aMY littie parish unitil the droad e! Eng- lishi invaision, 17759, mnade flc lifVe of Cap Rtolige a m1ilitary olutpost o! great imiportance ; for IecriWolfe, repulsed at. ever-y aitticmpt te lanld his troope bclew Quiebec, made a bold miove, sud passing the eity one flood- tide, neblorcdl off Cap Rouge. Several feinte were made te test (le ltoitrgaitiville,'s streugthi, sud], find- ing Cap Rouge too wvell guarded, knowledge. was gaiiued of a psth lead- îng up) frein wbat bans sinee been knowu as «Wolf c'a Cove\" te the Plains o! Abraham, outside the old Nwilledl elty. Fýreinth Uiark sbadow e! Cap Rouge, Wolfe's treope were rowed away te victory when dawn broke of ther glorions l3th of 'Septeni- ber, 1 75). Wbhile Qiuebec, theli key o! the situa- tion, was in the bands et the Eng- liebh, the euirreuinding eeuintry was estili caipable o! supperting the French troopu, asud again, in the, following SPring. Cal) Rouge played an iinport- aut r6le, when Levis there rallied him amriy, msrebed on Quieec, and would 11ndoub11tedily biave retaken thc eity but for the tiuiely arrival of Euglisb shipm. Onc mnore flic French retreat- ed across flic littie valley ot Cap Rouige, neyer te returu, sud the eoun- try grew aeceustorned to English mile. .Wbeu Uic Ameriease carne under Arnold. te besiege Quebec, they first took Cap Rouge and Ste. Foye, and during Uic winter feraged ail about the neighiborhood: even the sunnuer house o! Govcmnor Crsanalié was total- ly at their merey, aitheugli an old cairetakeýr tricd to dIo ber abare in de- feuding ber master'. property by eoaxiug a party of looters down to the wine ecîlar, wherc she would have trapped themn, but for Uic eudden dis- trust of the Sergesut. The story is told by a young soldier named llenry, who afterwards becamne a 1 liitedi Staites judige. .Sinoe thev repulse of the Amnericang iu 1776 rio enemty bas possessed our heights, andl the itur u eliffs, eeve(rln miles f rom thc city, becaiine the favourite renidez-voiês of Qeees and weliv meiýrehiant.q bitllt homes whose beautifull Iawns overlook thic S-'t, Ljawrenee(. The ceves below were flic seenies of great lumber shipping until the trade bias dwindled dowu to a raft or two a ycar, and the rietous gangs of raftsmen no longer makc the elîffe ring with their wild songe and shouts. Whebre, Cartier,-; and Rober. val's qbips were wintered, a shipyard, liounched a brig namied the \"Ca p Rouige\" wvhieh sailedl safely to British Gujiana. Artiste have painted our beautiful, views, and anthors written of our hiistory or found characters for tlieir beoks among our simple habitant folk, as did 'Sir Gilbert Parker. Those wbo are mnore seientifically ine.linied cari read of the great trestie across the Cap Rouge valley, or of the St. Law- rence Bridge being rebuilt after the first terrible disaster. The bell% of St. Nichol's eliurch, on the very cdge of thc opposite shore, eorne faintly or elearly, solcntly or gaily, across the water, aud our ovu village belle rnùe answer at the saine heurs of the ringing of the Angelus. The St. Lawrence iu ail lta phases is part of the very lite of Cap Rouge: at night it beeomne a mnysterious thing like smie great ereeping creature, while in roonhight trom the elife, with only the murmur of the pine trees, the river looks like a beautiful. dreani, and if frein eut the darkneas a lazy square-sal bâteats drifts into thc rnile-wide baud ot liglit, and a enateh ot meug floes Up to us frein morne lonely bâteait-man. wýe hold our breath as if, withi tlwe songe endiug, the whole scene weuldj mielt away.",
         "AN lNPER1ML PAUGETER £3v Sthd \u0026a'y \u0026oddard W IIEN kind fate sent Mr.Fit-z- Gi1bbon, then widely known aa \"eLally Beiirar,\" to the coronation of Edward VIL., it thrus9t honours into bier biands. Sh1e was the only womani cor- respondent in the press gailery on that historioal occasion, and va.s the ouly diret Caniadiani eorrespoiudent sent Wo the coronation by any netws- paper in the Domiînion. Later, iii the official history of the event, lier let- ters were the only ones îneutioued. Again, at the coronation of King George and Queen Mary, Mrs. Fitz- gibbon wss a special correspondent, and thus litlds the distinction o! be- lng the only Canadisui womian corre- spondent who lias been at two corona- tions of JClngs of England. These two visits to Englsnd led to mnany others, eaeh onle of which, belped to, forge a strong link between Canada and the 'Mother Country, be- cause being a keen Canadian, Lally Bernard could not refrain fromn tell- ing the Old Country people about the hroad sud wonderful oolony acruss the Atlantic. She spoke on tle public plat! ormi and in private, and wrote tlll bier name became as well known iu IEng-land. as in Canada, and always hopr theme was the Domînion.- She undertook Qoverneut ork the way of speûking mud writinig, sud1 siso did the sanie kind of work for the canadian Paciie -ai vy But orle o! lier boste is that, ahe rieer took, inoney or transportation frm Pither source, beasas sbe nalvely puts it, \"if I did I viould not say Juat wbhat I %wantod tn anld be freet in ail vas\". in 1900 Lilly Bermardl waus senit W the West to Nvrite what she eotild about the, great Doukhobor immiiigraý- tion to Caniada at that timie. qlhe wýenL to Winnipeg, and expeeýtedý that in the inmmigration sheds thiere die would findL out aH ship needed. This peculiar people. eevr proved to bie more faacinatingz than sime hiad anticipated, and in order tW gain all the K-rowledige that qhe re. 4ILiried, there was notb ig for it but to follow themi fartlier waarThiua she did for three months, and even at the end of 'that tiie alie fouud it rnost difficaît to tear herseif away from thein The troubles and trials o! thoe wonderful people bore se lieavily on lier feelings that when slie rtre to Ontario alie deterniined to hielp thiem in some way if at ail possible. Whule in Hlamilton she liappened to",
         "TUIE CANADIlAN MAG,\\AZINE attend a Meeting of tbe Local Counil of Woinen, anjd soieorne, seeing lier, atikcd hier to miy soimcthing about hier trip. 'She feit it was lier opportunity, and ah. sto\u003ed for mnore than an hmur before those woiien, and with tears streamning down bier cheeks she told t hem match o! what she knew. Wormanly mymnpathy wais quick to re- spond, and tliere wevre neot mnany dry eyea in tiie hon.se that. afternoen. Riglit thevre be(ganl the envourage- ment of Douikhobor Industries in Canada, industries whicb to.day are widely kinewn, and until lier return to the. West a few months later, Lally I3ernard 's borne becamne a depot for patteruas, suggest ions, modla, and even per.senaI nida for the. Doukiieber wemeun, The.\" ah. took back te the people, and brightened the ]ives of Ille women ca epecially, by helpinig them te (Io work which in gomne cas they band neyer hoped to do again. Voliig her Imperialigm by plat- form and peu, Lally B3ernard hma doue mnore for Canada than miost peo- ple realize. Rler speeial aim bas al- waya heen te bring thoughts and words ixflo action. And it was while visiting in Britishi Columbia, several years ago, that a plan which had al- ways been in lier fertile brain, becamne so insistent that it would net b. held hack any longer. Accordingly, when shortly afterward sh. waa again in London, England, 8h. laid bier plan before Lord Stratheena, who heartily endorsed it at once. 8h. had tbrouigh keexi observation always thouglit that the. sister ef the mnan who cornes te Canada to carve ont lif. and fortune should (if ah. cornes along, tee) receive a fair chance toe ope with conditions which are in the average case at lest very differ- ent from condition-, in the Old Coun- t ry. Rer idea was, therefore, te found a hestel in a lik. climat. te England, if possible, where weinen could corne and for a amaîll fee learn beow to beeome Canadian housewives. Queen Mary beard e! the project and becaine se, ruch interested in the idea that she requested that when the hostel should be fouinded it sheuld h. in the. namne ef bier eorenu.tion. In Vancouver MNrs. Fitz-Gibbon feund what shev deemned to b. the. ideal spot for bier pet schemne The climnate, peo- ple and conditions in general semed te b. jugt wbat was eedved. 'Se the. Queen Mary Corenation Hlostel waa feundcd last year, this being made possible tlireugh the genierosity of the late Lord Strathcena. Mrs. Fitz-Gibbon considers that the founding of this hostel is really ti. eulminationi of ail that she bas ever said or written. Iler. the East, is brouiglt into the. envirouiment o! the, West, and Mrs. Fitz-Gibborn's strong doctrine o! ever levelling up and net dewn ia being put into active prac- tice. In this home girls and women, upon payrnent of a smail fee, are taught te becorne competent bousewives, not along deniestie science linea, but aleng what Mrs. Fitz-Gibben censid. ers In b. goed, practio.al, homespun lUnes. The pupil is taugiit te use an ordiinary steve, and burn wood in it as well as coal. 8h. is taught te go eut and split the wood for bier fines, sud ofteutimes six. lu allewed te find nothing but wet cedar, whieh aie must cut preperly in order te get the. dry heurt. Close by the main bouse and on tihe 8ame property there la a real Western shack with a comnion little cooking stove, and ordinary boeuse- hoki paraphernalia. Her. the student learnis practically by actual experi- ence just what se would have te do if ah. lived in sueli a house, miles away from everybody, with only lier ewn reseurces to depeud upen. A delightful incident la told o! a yonng woman trausperted te Canada because she aud ber brother weie aloe in the world. He had a f airly gond pesition, but sh. had never been talit te do anything, mucii lesa heusework, or te know it had te b. done, ber position in the Old Couutry havîng been that ef a daughiter ef a ~1 I",
         "AN IMPERIAL DAT'01TER proeeaional man. In Canada she boarded ini the saine lieuse with lier brother, thougli as a matter of tact tliey saw littie of each other. One day the girl met Mrs. Fitz- Gibbon, and reeognizing thre great heart of the 'veman, explained that ab. 'vas idie, lonely and unhappy. Mrs. Fitz-Gibbon persuaded lier to take a course at the hostel, whicli sire finally did, te the disgust of lier bro- ther, who liad hils doubts. Hew that girl did have to work! Every day ot the first six 'veeks alie determined would be the last. But oomehow alie kept on till barnit flug- crg, a scerched face, spoiled feod, crisped cakes, balky fires, ovens that would net reniain hiot, and mucl like diseouragements and discomtorta be- camne things et the past. When she emergeýd a qualilled housekeeper, she wanted te take a position. Again the bread kuewledge ot Mrs. Fitz-Gibbon camne te the res- eue. The -girl 'vas advised to per- suade lier brother to take a flat. Atter much persuasion this vais done, aud then lite really began for those twe youg people. The brother eutered into the spirit et the thinig and soon became very entliusiaatic as well us appreciative et the new order of lîv- ing. It liad neyer occurred te that girl that she eo'uld keep lieuse for her bro- ther, anawer lier own door beill, do lier owu lieuseliold lauudry work, take parcels tromn tradespeople, and do al the things that a Canadian housewite ean sud dees do, and still keep lier diguity aud spliere. But Mrs. Fitz- Gibbon sliowed her that it eould lie dune, and Canada deesm net to-dayv bold a more happy Or more tranisformed girl tlian this one. This is onily eue Of nallY aueh cases in whieli Mra. Fitz-qrillbon bas been able te set tire riglit feet ou thP right pathway. fil the( hestel, Mrs. Fitz-( ibbon lias had but one motte put up,) ari it in eliaravteriatie. It is: ,qTnke Your F'ences\". This hlostel, be it known, ia the( euhl one ut its kind rii the 'vend, a tact which shows that tire Lally Bertiard ind(ividulalty, lias byv ne0 means evapl. orated with the yeana. Outside the intereat slie týakPn in the hostel. flic van lias given lier a splen- did chance Io 'vork eut ai11lthe lm- perialiamn t11at lias flot liad au\u003e\" pre. vienls ouitlet. Slhe lias erganized the Admirai Jellico Cliapter ot thi. 1)\u003eallghtor, et tire Empire, with one liundred and five memibers Lately sh e lias beeni very busy organixing groupe ot work- ers te assist ln eolleeting for our men impriaoned ini Germnany, and as usqual ia tlirewiug ail lier 'ide expcrlenve aud atinring personality inito the work. Lally Bernard's writlng la lwrgely- taken up along the lUe ot Imperiai. iamn these days, and mucli good she in doiug in that 'vay. But writlng for lier heloved publie is utill strong lu lier heart, se that those of us 'vho re- miember, admire aud 'vial for more reading from lier virile peu, 'viii yct have inauy eppontunities iu wvhieh te renew acquaintances by thc prlntcd word witli \"itz-Clare,\" \"Oitoy. enine?» and «Mango 'Meredith\".",
         "THE DANCING BEAR MAN J45Sri5jorîe CookU L IZE'TTE, seizing a mlomnet when.'b er tep-mnother had gone out to the dairy, lolled ini the kitehien doorway and looked longing- ly acrosa the daisied fields to the suinny bitte river, wishing with ail lier hieart that Rhe were only a summner visýitor nt Ste. Clorinthe and could idie as ibe pleased all the day long, Bbc wvs tired of work. She hated settingz the. long tablesi for tihe exact- ing Eýngliali ladies, whio came back year alter year Wo Mmne. Duifour's ad- mnirable pension. 8h. hated waitinig on them and riuming in and ont of the bot kitehen with plates, ini re- sponse to their endlesa demands. Site was tired of making up their roomz with the thorougliness demanded by lier step-motlior, snd very tired of fetching them sufflict hot water to satisfy tiiem. One wonld think that once a day miglit b. enongli, added Wo tlieir unaccounitabie habit of dipping theinselves daily in the sca, but it neyer was. On the. slightest prooa- tien they cailed for hot water, and some of tliem even drank it J Lizette was tired of the Englislh ladies and tired of being ordered about. She was, above ail other tbings, tired of lier step-motber's voice, wbich broke in upon lier idle moment now with a sharp repri- mnand and sent lier sulkily back Wo lay- ing the spoons and forks and glaises on tbe dining-tables. Victorine, a great beavy eonntry-girl, was slowly putting down the plates. Mmie. lufouir buistled about lier kitchien, oeeuipied, as wvere miost of the. other womien of the. village towards inidday, preparing dinner for lier ladies, who wonld sooni be eomning up tîred and hnniigry from the beach. Myne. Dufour's house was famnous for its excellent mneals, and madam p)ridled hierseif greatly on titis and on a repuitation for even more spotleR perfection of houise-rîeaning titan lier tîciglibours. Site was aware tbat shc was deseribed by thein as u~ne vraie vieille fille, and the f aet that this was truc added to lier zest to outdo cvery- one else. Sb. had been a vieille fille ini ail respects for a geod forty-eight years before slie married thc venf Dufour and took over the manage- ment of his family and his summer pensionnaires ini an extremely cap- able mnanner, witliout losing any of the ebaracteristies that lad belongcd to ler former estate. The step-children were ail married and away now but Lizette, thie yoning- est, aged sixteen, and Lizette à Fer- dinand had been the most troublesome of the. lot. Witb Lizette she had neyer got on, and sbe liad brougît lier up on incessant slaps and scoldings, quite unconscious that jealousy iay at the bottom of lier harshness. As a baby theo \u003cchld had constantly re- minded lier that site was a vieille fille, aithougli a married wonian, and thc supple, vivid beauty of thc growing girl, whiel drew the eyes of the. vil- lage youth irresistibly, angered her",
         "DrauÙ'q by J. HLbMr Beyjiw In the miMde ut the gr.oup stood th di. - m 517",
         "TUF, CANADIAN MAGAZINE stil more by its contrast witi lier ewn gaunt snd aolitary girllieed. Mme. Dufour was not otherwisc an iinjuat womnan. Ferdinand Dufour, her liusbsnd, sincerely enjoycd lier aoclety and noever feit the rough cdge ot lier tongue. Uler neiglibours re- speeted ber honcsty and capacity and lier alit inspired meanness, but for Lizette Éhe neyer had a fair word. \"Be quiek tliere with tihe tables!» Mine. Duf our called shrilly. \"Vie- terine, put out the dlean serviettes to)-day--those with the red border, stuipid, fromn the shoîf 1 Ljizette, corne and becat up mny eggai while I tidy my- sclf -bête comme ses pieds, cette fille- 'a.»1 Lizette took the yellow basin and pewter fork that lier step-motlier thruist into ber hands. and st\u003eod in t he doerstep, beating vigoroualy. Suddeniy ibe stopped and liatened, gazing eageriy up and down thie sun. uLy wliite road. tund the turu camne a littie group of eilidren skipping in tlie dust, then st-ime eider people, ebiefly men aud boys, and the souud of a voie sing- ing. Blie sitared excitedly, then gave a 1 ittie jump. «MaIman, Victorine, here's the. danc- ing bear inan!»- alie called. «Oh, in se gladi I lioped lie\u003ed cerne back. lIcre lie la--le vila-le domspteur d'\u003c\u003erç!» Victorine ambled te, the deer, but Mine. Dufour drove thein side forth- with. \"'Back te your work, lazy goed- for-notlilngl Any excuse, any idie vagabond will take yen away frein that, of course! Go on! lil have ne crowd colleeting about my door 1» alie cried. \"I icill see liim,» said Lizette, jerk- ing lierself free frein ler step-moth- er'à bard grssp and escaping again te tlie door-step. The crowd came nearer, the bare- foot children kicking Up the. fine white duat in a cloud in front, sud ln the mnldie of the greup of men strode the. bear-tamer, carrying a spiked taff aud leading a huge, shaggy, brown bear on a chain. He pauaed lu the centre ef a triaugular bit of green grass, directiy in front of Mme. Dut our's kitelien door, sud blew a hlast on a brass hemn slung round bis neck. Ris followcrs began te seat tliselves in a circle round hlm, the chidren swarming Up the gallery. Others camne running down the road te sec, the women even leaving tlieir kitdcns. And middeniy the Engli8h, ladies and diildrcn began te appear frein the beach, the ebildren sbonting witli deliglit. Mme. Dufour, grcatly cnraged, stcpped te ber door te erder the vaga- bond showiuau off. \"Not liere, net lier. 1\" she slionted barsbiy. The. dancing bear in was tail sud sliglit aud bore evident marks et pic- turesque vagabondage. He had ait olive-eoioured face sud briglit dark cyes of almost liquid melancholy like a dog's, but yet with human, hidden laugliter in tlieir dcpths. H. wore a loose bine blouse sud baggy velvet trousers, sud lic pullcd off bis old vel- vet hat sud atepped forward, smil- ing a geutle, depreeating smibe. \"If yen will permit me te show my poor Ruflue on the grass, Madame 1\" lie said. «W. have becu se much in the. hot, dusty road. The perforin- suce la net long, sud we ahallinot de- stroy the grass in suy way.\" ~The Engilali ladies added their en- treaties, sud Mme. Dufour was fore- cd te consent. The bear-tamer wait-. ed for a few moments like a berri sbo'wman, while most of the village assembled, flnging a humorous remark te the eliildren or young lads, aud more than once sweeping hla keen smiliug glane over Lizette. She stoed agaiust thc wall ef the cottage, slim in spite ot the big bine- checked apron that envceped lier, with the sun talling ou lier ahining hair, ber face flusbcd with a cid's eager expectation of a treat, watch. ing everything h. did. Once the year before sh. had seen him, and had",
         "THE DANCING BEAR MAN watehed the anties of the bear with the unthinking rapture of a cbld, but now her gaze fell on the domp- teur hujuacif. Every time his daring glane met hers, a queer littie shud- dering tbrill went tbrough ber. «ýRufine, salinte the ladies!\" The bear drew its clumsy bulk up- right and raised a huge paw to ils head, jerking it stiffly down again, like a military salnte, to the huge de- ligbt of the littie boys. \"l'on père et ta mère sont ir les msontagnes,\" sald the dancing bear mani in a soft sing-song voire. \"Fais comme ton père et ta mère!\" The bear reached to, the extreme Iongtb of bis elhain, then faced his master and advanced slowly and war- ily, watchlng bis face and growling. The bear-man raised a short stick to his shoulder like a gun. \"Ton père et ta mère sont sur les montagnes,\" h. chanted. The bear growled and sprang, he affected to shout, and the massive dxiaty creature rolled over and over on the grass. Lizette was breathlesa. Rufine shouldered his stick like a musket and marcbed tc the sound of the bugle. lie said hMa prayers and then ho danced while his master sng a little refrain in a soft, mon- otonous beat over and over agamn: 1-es pastilles sont pour les jeunes filles. Les bonbons siont pour les garcons, Rnllne turned his great body round and round ln an abmurd travesty o! dancing, grotesque and pathetie. \"Embrassez--moi!» called out the daneing-bear mani suddenly, and the beau' opened his sbaggy arma and re- ceived bis master into them. Lizette gave a piercing seream and shrank against the cottage, letting the yellow bowl slip out of berflingers and roll off »the giallery, the batter màking a streamn down the steps. The bear-nian emerged safely froni the capacious embrace, Ruline dropped fatiguedly te bis four feet, and the crowd elapped and sbouted. Lizette leaned against the wall. The bear-main picked uip ther bowl and handed it to hier with a simile. «You are afraid of myv Rififi-,\" bie said in his soft voire, URUlt b. ia net dangerous, M adi o I-e11e ind il the bowl la flot even crared 1' le looked at bier withi a danitgtron.g se! tness lu hii, glance, then witb a flourishing bowv he wvent round wlth his old velvet biat. ILe thanked everybody witb bis gracions flaahing sinile, and then led bis great hrowni becar thudding piitienitly down thie rond. Whecn the E'nglishi ladies hand goene in, ealling to Victorine for bot watrr Mme. Dufour qinddeinTl% euffitd lier step-daug;hter'-, eairs. \"Carelesa, stupid littie iier!» she raged. «Throwing myv goodj food] about because you have attention, only for amusement. and eyes only for men-even goo4.-for-.nothinig animal tamers. thieves maet 1ikely!I» Lizette eseaped luto *thQ dinlng- rooni with blazingz red ebeeka and wet angry eyes. A sudden thougzht, flashed inte bier mind. 8h. woiild run after the bear-man and se an- other performane. She wam net go. ing te be scolded and made te work for ever. Victorine rould do lier l'est to wait at dinner without lier, for once. 8h. would go. 8h. djidnj't care wbat happened. She snatehed froin the. table mne nf the vases which it was ber duty te keep filled with flre-w.ed mnd gold- en-rod for the ladies, who seemed to think that sucb things added te the. pleasure o! MNme. Dufour's good meals, and darted paut bier step- mother down the road in the dires. tien the dompteur had taken. 8Sh.e was psesdby adegire to see th dancing bear man again, te meet the strange bright glane that made ber velus run quieksilver, te beau, the. soft foreign voie that lingered 11ke a charm lu hem ear. Sh. saw the performance througii at the post-offiee, and \u0026gain two miles farth.r on lu the. field of \u003coId Bap-. tiste, and l'y then nothlug oecupied",
         "TIJE-' (ANAD)IAN MAGAZINE lier md exepIlte amusement o! dadin own the, sunny rond with Ilhe villaige stragglera, and the excite- ment o! feeilig the domten S e upon)i lier. Sheg hid thle va.e beinid a hiedge, and let care fly to thle winds. The whole long. hot aftornoon she followedg the dancing bear manii through suni and dust, watching bis war getieesawitli Ruiirne, and Ilstening Io has singing voice, kuow.. ing thint lie lookod for lier every tinte he bew Ibiq buigle and folund lier lun- muirprised. And while sli. laughced aloud like ai happy child at the clum- sy anties o! tlie bear, mIme was thril- ilimg liko. a wvoman drawn more swif t- ly thari she, wants inito tlle mnysterious fuiture,. By muaset alie waa ten miles front homte, and shte knew bis naine and sorne o! lia history--Riémi Arel o! the Midi, twenty-aevn years old and o! Ille saine profession as his fathier and hie grand!ather, a dompiteur d'ours, whiehlie flunig to the erowd in a joking speech while hiseoyes were fixed on lier. Cxraduially the crowd fell off, and as they neared tlie village o! CJap de la Vitérge, Lizette renlized with a sliock o! awakening that she was alone on a lonely road, and that tlie village lights mea:int that it was late. She feil back !rightened aimd irre- solute, and Ruflue and bis master dis- appeared from view. Lizette beganl to\u003e feel tired and liungry, and] was surprisedl hyv sudden ehame. SIte was a long way fromn home. SIte had fol- lowed a vagabond boar-tamer about all day like an idle girl wlio lias no self-respect. Now sIte must flnd lier way bciin the terri!ying dark alone somiehiow, sund face lier step-mother'sq rage. Thle cheerful note of the domnp- teuir'a bugle sounded tliree tintes, and Ljizette !olded lier arma across the log fonce and laid lier head down, eobhing ont loud like a cbild. The lovely, foolieli day was over, and the thrilling sweetness o! it had meant nothing, nothing at aIl Ail that 1%aai ted lier as eolding and Shamle. SIte heard a fontstep) and turned to run, to fmd hernseif face ta face witli the vagabond Slie hiad followed ail day. Ife arried al paper parcel and 8poke at once willi great chIeerfuil- nees, as if it were the iost natural thing in the wvorld to flnd lier there in tears. \"Mh! one ie hungry and tiredl na- turally, and One mluet eat,\" hoe said. \"Ruifinie is eating in the village, and our supper 1 have brouglit omit bore. Lot uls sit dowl et oce Mademlois- elleLtteamesOn. They st dlown against a bank o! grass, sud lie opetmed hie parcel dis- closing solid sandwichies o! bread simd mneat. Lizette saxik down wvith a sigli o! com!fort, sud munchieled quito lisp- pily, sud the dancing bear man scVarcely stopped chattering about hiiesl! sand his advenitures, sud made lier laugli omit loud once or twice. Then they mat stil for a !ew min- utes, tiil ho jumped to bis feet. \"And 110oVw I muat, sve Mademloiselle on bier homneward ws.y,\" ho said, \"anmd return to see wbat the inquisitive people have dpne to my poor Ruifine.'\" Tliey walked a littie way ini the dusk, with thie distant sound o! the tide flowing ont iii their ears, sud the salty atoll o! wet beadi anmd aoaweed mingling with the warmo breeze blow- ing acros the daisied fields. Then tliey stopped and looked at eaeh other, Lizotte waiting sud tremnbhng, sud the dancing bear mani with a kind\u003e o! wonder sud longing that held bld- don lfires. \"You have given me nothing yet,» lie said, laughing a littie. '\u003cYou put notliing in my bat, Little Nameleas- One, thougli I held it ouit to yen t» Lizette bluabed, hadf-startled. \"I have no moneyv, sIte !altered. \"But take bis-freta Lizette.» She whispered ber name. SIte slipped off a little silver medal that sIte wore beneath lier drese, anmd gave it tÂ\u003e bit warm fret lying on ber neck. Ho kissed it sud put it gravely in~ bis po\u003c*et, still looking at lier.",
         "THE DANCINGl 10EAI MAN Then he put bis, arins round lier very lighitly, and benit lier fact baek, te inake lier look at imi, and spoke in a voice of deep compelling gentie- nes, very low and sof t: \"But give me somrethiing that will bring me back to you, my littie oe(,, fromn the ends of thle earltb.\" She ]et him hold hier, and lie kissed lier tillilher veiris turned Io quicksil- ver and flarne fromi the divine fires in hbis, Then lie let her go, and she ran, rail, ran down the loinely road. The summner visitore weut away, and the -village began, to resumie its ordinary life. The mon were off at far-away farins, and tlie womnen made grand ménage in their housce, scrub- bing flours and wàils and ceilings as if tlie Engliih visitors liad liad the plague, wa8liiig tlie catatoigne car- pets and sheets and blankets and loek- ing Up tlie unuscd rooms in their houses Mme. Dufour and Lizette ,and Victorine were liard at work tuiruing out tlieir rons, airing and beating, \u003crmd appraising damage to chairs and tables and carpets. Lizette worked se well that lier stepinother liad no fault to find witli ber, and hiad to fait back on tlie dreadful scandai of the day alie liad sliaxneIess1y followed the vagabond bear-tamer and brouglit disgrace uip- on the naine of Dufour for ever. Lizette said notbing. hi lier secret heart that hiot and dusty summer day, the fatigue and fear of lier Ionely' walk bomne, tlie subsequent disgrace, remainied a hlf-forgotten background for a sort o! leaping deliglit tliat she could only let herseif tbink o! wlien ilie was alone and free. Then she remembered tlie colouir of sky and field and liedgeruw, the sound of the tide, tlie sound of a singing voice. .She could lit ber eyes and sce the danicing bear mnans strange cyes very near lier face, and liear the magie of bisi compelling low words, and liold herself still ini the sliivering eestacy of lis holding. October drew to, its splendid close, and thougli Lizette looked every day up1 and down tlie w1lit ruad, no, easi ilystollngVagabond camle in silht. Lizette was Su quiet that N11e.C Dii- four began to tik tuit slhe was be- Pomning permnanenly. docile, wheu one day slie feul into disgraoe again. Mme. Du four retuirning late oine afteru*ony froin a d]ay spent wlith a sick neiglibouir. fouind Uete drenim- ing witi hier elbowq on the kitehen table, unwaslied pots and pans ail round lier, the store out and Uircan- cd, and eve(rythinig a slmlovenly mud uintidY als it (eoufld wel bx. Mn ber imii nictdate kitcen. Sie stoodl looking about lier in petri!yvingy furyv. Whait if a neiglibour had liappened to coic in, and had accu sucli a state of a.!- fairs? Woffld Oie ever have held up bier liead agzaitf 'Why did the good Cod affliet lier witli sncbi a good-for- notliing littie sioven of a atep-dauitgi- ter ? \"Lo(-ok at mny kitchen? What bave you. been doing, 1 ssk youV'\" ah. cricd. Sh. whirled lier to bier feet. and simook lier violently. «ct Onut My aiglit, I wilI do0 my own work-mentetuqe, paýressew., 1-0L- 6S8\"She shook hier alzain. aud opening the door tlirust lier down tlie stepa with sueli force tha.t 1,izette feil hl!-wvay acrous the madl. She picked berseif up witb angry teans smar.ting in lier eycs, and rau uincer- tainly on, beginningz to ery lilyi witli the pain of lier twisgtedi arîn. Pre.- sently alie feUl inito a walk, sud lier sobs grew slower. Shle lifted a corner of lier apron sud wviped( lier eycu. Round thie turu o! the road by ii., clump of rowane still Ponwred 'withi their scarlet bunche,; came an, easily-- strolliug vagabond. She gave a iie gasp. \"0li !\" shie said reproaelifillly, -j was eryin)g,» «'For me?\"\u003e said the dancing bear mani, laughiug a littie. A liglit came into lier eyes, aud col- ouir flooded lier checks,. \"No,\" she said hurricdly. -Not for you. Where is Ruflue. And wby linve you come baek ?»",
         "THE CA;NAIAN MAGAZINE \"Ruifine is well,\" said the dancing bear man, \"And I have corne back b.- cause u;ometblng brought me back, though 1 hadn't got quite to the end of the world. 1 have corne back for you. 1 want youi to sing for mue and dlance for mie and Iaugh for mie- never toe ry for me, my littie 14iz- ette.» Suddenly lie took lier iu his arme, and spoke in the voire that stirred al the Ionging and imiaginationi of ber hepart. '\u003cWill yen corne with me?» h.e said. \"Away from tbe bouse where you are made toecry, away to my country where yen will b. happy and gay aud beloved Y Dewn tiie roads of the world, with uiy heart to shelter you? Coen ow. Don't b. afraid; you wou't have to cry or to fear. And in the. summers we can corne back.» Lizette loeked iute bis strauge eyes and yivlded te bis arms as in a direami. Rlis look, bis soft, odd voie mnade realty very far off and faiut. Duity, kinsbip, everyday life became sbadows, nothing existed but the streng-th ef bis arms. holding lier, nothing ctdled or compelled but bis foreign, low vwords. She put eut lier hands, with suin- ing eyes. \"Yes, yes,» she breatbed. She must go, shie must go new. She must dIo what he wllled wlierever, wben. ever hie speke. She was lis absolute. ]y. She must follow down the moails of tlie world. Tt was rnany summners later. Along the suiny road iu dust and surishine came thiree figures. The man, bearing evideut marks of pic- turesque vagabondage, led a mas8ive brown bear on a (,hain, and blew a blaat on a brase hemn that lie wore slung round his neck. An old sun- bumut draggletail of a woman foilow. ed a little way behind. The village assembled te see the performance, and word flew frein neiglibour te neigbbour: \"C'est Lizette àI Ferdinandi T'iets. donc la voir! Ah! Mon Dieu! Crée.-!\" they said. \"And she looks happy!\"»",
         "photograph bji rourles of the Ciiwuonil ',orthern \u0026Wwgsay MOUNT CAVELL This magnif6oent peak in the Cav.adian Roekies has bon reiamed so that it ray stand as a nionument te the Enrli'sbI nurse whcl -a shot bv the Grrmans 5-523",
         "1 lit HUMOUR \u0026 PATHOS OF SLLPERFLUIIS A Nattractive rntod of helping thie Red Cross Society bas been usied at Victoria, Btritish Col- uimbis with resuiltq flhat have been at once hurnorous and patthetie. It ec- curred to soixueone that if thic people of Victoria wvould give a portion of thrir suiperfliious goods a place of sale couild be founid, and likewise buy- ers. Aeerdingly. the plan was an- nouinced te the people by letter, and every letter carried withi it a post- card. On the posteard %vas printed: 1 wish te give.................. Pleasfe collect at. .... ........... A littie boy wvho had heen repri- maanded hy his grandrnother, no douibt with very good cause, got hold of the posteard and filled in the two blanks with the words \"Grandrna» and £once\". Serne people seem te have a weird idea of helping the Red Cross. It is mest extraordinary, but even if they really want anything they would rather pay double the price'for it at a ahop, and it seetus impossible te rea- son with thern, Enter a lady, very well dressed. The Lady: \"Il want a prarn, and 1 have corne down te buy at the Super- fluities Sales, because 1 want te help the Red Cross.\" The Red Cross helper: «Tes, mad- arn, we have one. 'Will you corne downstairs and 1 will show youiT» They go diownstairs. \"iiiow mlich V\" \"Si dollars, mdn. \"Oh, that's far tee mnuch. 1 van't pay thant; I- want te hielp the Red Cross. but 1 can't pay m -Tore than four dollars. Why, 1 can get a new oe exactly like this at the store for twelve dollars.\" \"Weil, this is just as good as new, we eould perhaps get more than six dollars if we put it on any auction sale.\" \"So you migbt, but at a sale there miglit be any arnount of people wmnt-. inig the sanie thing. 1 shail go round te the store and buy one there if yen\u003c wilI net sel it te me for four dol- lars\"' \"Biit yen will have te pay thern twelve dollars! Why flot buy the smre thing here for six dollarsT\" i'No, one expeets te buy cheap at a sale like this, a Superfinities Sale, 1 want te help the Red Cross Society, but seerningly yoii won't let me do Happily this lady, it lias been found, is the exception, for on more than one occasion, however, people have corne te the store and said they had hought sernething at the Anýc..",
         "TUE HUMOUR AND PATHOS 0OPUEF'UTE tion Sales, and consîdering they had brughit it too cheaply have paid set more mnoney. In the shops also, many timies, People have offered to pay a bigger pice than was asked. A bobbledehoy youth lounged into the. shop one dayt. Tlobblcd(ehoy youth. «How munch tbem skatest\" Lady Attendant: \"Seventy-flve cents, they are quite new.\"5 llobbledehoy youth: \"Why, 1 can buy themn iu a shop for two dollars, tbeY didn't cost you nothing. l'Il give yon four bits.\" Lady Attendant: \"No, the price is meventy-.flve cents.\" Hobbledehoy youth: «Well, 1 cafl it a beastly shame.\"ý The youtli departed. Next day he returned and said he wanted to lielp thie Red Cross, so wonld pay the seventy-1lve cents. Hie wus told that the skates had. been sold. Then he beeame indignant, said hie always knew this Siiperfinities business was a swindlc. Hie must have skates, and would now have to pay two, dollars.\" It seems hard for some people to realize that ail the workers at the Superflixities sales give their services free. One litti. gentleman came rn the sarly stages of the work and offered bis services to the Red Cross for that day. Anythîng Imom shorthand writ- ing to light porter's work. Hie lias never left us and lias worked steadily every day fromn nine o'clock in the. niorning to six o'élock at night. Hie loves the work, and we love him. 1 tink he must be the re-inearnation ci Trotty Veek and the Admirable Ciiricliton. Dear Motherly Old Lady, to Lady Attendant. \"Do you do ail this work fo\u003er nothing, my dear t\" Attendant: «Yes, aud we aIl quite oiijoy the. work We have made nearly flve thousand dollars for the Red erly old, Lady: \"But dou't they give you anything? No? WUl, Well' \\VeIU' Neyer mmid, mny deair. y'ou will get youir reward in liHeavenl.» Whien thi. gifts ofSprfnte wec being r(eeived( expert adlre wu ob)tinedtý fron Ille leading valuera in the eity as ta what prit-es sholild tu, -\\Ied it te Rrstdah thegre was a rumtouir that at solid milver tea Pser- vive h1ad beeni sold as aineltr. plated one for thre. dollars. Later it was fouind thiat six samail kqilver spoons hiad been sold as; eleetrn-plate for thiree dolrbut ais the. retail price of these six spoons iu scolid su.. ver was thrce dloll.rs and twety4vlve vents the. management resilized that at. the ilost theyv had not lost tile Red Cross Soeiety mucli, At the first sale lield it, wus impos- sible to soil that daRy ail the. goodai cataloguied, but the auvtioixeer staid lie would put up any partieular ar- tiele if anyone w1ahed to start it with a fair bid, There was a beautifull dreflng-aas, the. at price of whicli in London was forty guiineas. A young mnan wax very importuinate lu haviug his re- quest tW have this case put up) for aucttion. Rlis bid was thre. dollars, and lie would nlot go a cent more!i 0f course, there have be-en Rome bargains, and perbaps mistakes, but not many mistRkes. Wiiat wa tliouglit t. b. a silver gilt medal wa vainly offered for two dollars; it wua learned in time that there was more than twenty dollars worth of pure gold i it. Enter a coarse-looking, well-dremsd mn with a cigar stuck ini bis face. Nie walks te lady attendant standing by show-case. The Mani: «How mueh that te\u0026 coffe. serviceV» It weighed about one bundred ounces. Lady Attendant: \"The. viole tluug, complete witli tray, twélve dollars.\" Tii. Man.: «la it sterling silverV'",
         "TIuPE CANAPIAN MAGAZINE Lady Attendant: \"No, sur, it eau- flot bc ait tirat p-iceo.» Tire Main: \"H[umpir. Show me thiat ring. JTfow muir!\" TieMan: \"Is, tirat ai ruibyt\" Lady Attendanot: \"No, 1 arn told it ia reentutdruhy . If it was rol tir ruby% aflene wold ho Worthr 0une lirndred dollars. The diamonds, 1 arn told, are worthi twelve dollars whioleqale, and tire ring ie IS-carats go](].\" Tire man. after asking tire price of a dozen oitirer- thinigs, cxalmined al gold Iacquercd -Japanese cabinet, and tuirning ahriuptlv te tire lady, said: \"ILouk liere, I want to give somlething te tire lied Croiss 1oity will give yeui ten dellars fer tis cabhinet; I sulppose trat is net steýrling silver, re-constructed rubies, or solid gold.» \"No, aaid tlie lady, \"it la wirat is called a geld lacqucred cabinet, and le already sold for tirree iundredl dol- lairs,.» Tire man. witireut rcmoving iris cigar or iris hat, remnovcd binmseif. The above-mentioned cases are very exepioal nT ncarly cvery- case grent kiignues eiand consideration have been sirown te oui' lady irelpers. Little Old Lady : \"I hiave brought in ia few picces of Dresden dhiua I have fiad in mny posssson for fifty ycars. Tirey miglit feteir somettirrng.\" Lady AttePndant: \"Tirik youi ever se mir! , 1will give yen a reeeipt for thiemi What name, please T\" Litt1ge OId Lady, who looks like a piepe et Drcsdcn china hierseif: \"Oir, neyer mmnd tire receipt, thank you; 1 just want te help. 1 arn sorry 1 irave no0 roney te give tire Rled Cross se 1 thotiglit I would bring tirese. Tire china is good and, I tink, quite valuiable.\" Lady Attendant: \"I irope we siral ire able te get a big prie for tirem. Thank yen again o inucir.\" Little Old Lady: \"Oh, it doesn't matter wh*it prics you get. If it is only- a few cents it will be somiethiug, and wvill dIo somiething. Thank youl s0 muir, it is sucir splendid werk yeu are doing?\" There was one sweet-fated voung lady who carnle in every wveek and boughit someithinig to the vailue ef a dollar or al dollar and a hiaif. Ini thre course of covrainit came up1 that She waS In dlomlestie service anid spent her- savings ecd week in buyving somietinig frem tiie Sulperflilities Shop. Sbv said sire did flot partieularly want the things sire boughit, but she w,%anted te do lier share in hielping, and ait tire saine timie hanve some littie memniito that sire could always value, fot for its intrinsic worth, but for its associa- tion. A lady came into tire sirop a littie while ago and looked atl tire different gifts, and said to tire attendant: \"But yen don't mean te say tirat peoplee gave the.se tirings; and tirey are qite valuable. Tirey are not superflui- tics?\" Sire was told that mnany ladies wiro gave tirese presenits had not any money te give, but they wanted to make some sacrifice, and so tirey gave sometiug that tircy eould possibly do withouit. Perirapq they irad a sense of gratitude te the brave fellows figirting oui' batties and undergoing irardsirips on oui' beliaif. Perirape tirey hiad a sense of duty that tirey sirenld dIo tbirer share by parting with some of their valuables. \"f never tirougirt of it in thiis way,» saidl tire lady, and next rnorniing sire broughit in quite a valuable present. A stranger came into tire sirop oee day and asked te see tire organizer of tire seheme. He was very effusive iu iris congratulations, said what a splendid idea it was and irew weil erganized, but at tire finisir ire addled. \",Wirat a pity lt is that yeu have to publisir that rotten poetry about superfluities. Wiro writes iti»",
         "THE HUMOUR AND PATHTOS 0F SUPERFLuriTIEs The organizer had irnagined hie was an embryo, Kipling, and hand perpe- trated the doggerel himself!1 A sturdy littie chap, with his bright brown eyes lighiting up with the. tbought of duty, brought into the rooms ai toy gun. le Said, \"I've brought this for the soldiers at the front.\" .As ho was leaving the room hie out a very wistful eye at the gun, and I said to hirn, \"Well, sonnyv boy, you arc getting too old for toys now, eh, \"No,\" he replied, «'I like that gun; it's a wonder, but although. I arn toû young to figlit 1 amn not too young to give,\" and with a lust longing look and a grip of his under-lip he stalked off, wixiking away a tear. Two very flightily.dressed young girls came ini and were interested in~ the jewelry. They asked was it really truc that all these things had been given, and when they were told that iwas one said, \"Some people must bave more money than sense. Why, you eould go round to, the pawn-brok- er'. and pawn some of these things for twenty dollars.\" A gentleman stopped one of the superfluities workers outside the Club and said, \"I have just won a bot of ten dollars. What do you think of that ?y 111 think its a superfiuity. \"Right yo u are. libre it ia.\"1 This saie gentleman was indefati- gable bidder at the auctions. 1 knew hlm t. be a bachelor and only on a vigit to Victoria. Hie would bid for arrything frein a piano to a perain- bulator; there was no stopping humn. Considering his recklessness, he got off very lightly, but lie used t. fright- en mie out of niy wits. An amateur s.uctioneer was selling an old-fash- loned pianola, one of those you have t. puai' up against a piano. The bidding stopped with a stranger at about fifteen olars nsd wasv, about to be knocked downi when myi frionid eanme into the roomi sund wvithout tii. least kniowvlidge of wbhat waj beving oftered, started to bid. Ile rail tlic biddinig up to about fortyv dollars, a tip-top price. Then he tppd The hiddirig we'nt on1, am juat lit the last momnent uip pops myi frictig again. U'ltimaýtely the pialiola wvas iold for sixty dol1lars--to the stranger- Taking everything into considera. tion, wve have gzot spkn-tdid pices(1, aid are continuing In get theti. Tt is astonishingz how iiny straiigers corne to buy, and -when hi fcicurixs .,tart coin g to the city we 'shanl b., able to mnake quite a larwev -.ui of mnoney' for the lied CrossSoeti the people of V'ictoriai will onfly von- tinue to send their gifts. Tlii or- ganlization la quite simple. and the Superfluities Shiop is so wvell known that there ahould b. rio dliffi(uty in selling nything. If people only know thant their gifts wvill not 1w 401(1 nt. an absurd sacrifice we feel sure they will give more williitgly. One lady gave a Japanese, mrrcd wlucb waq sold on auction for twen- ty dollars. She was so plensei t the price it obtained that she thon gave goods that were sold for thyce hun. dred dollars. Another lady whose silver tea-met was sold for thirty-live dollars, i\"ext day brought ini some more pieces of silver. These were, sold for more than one hundred dôllars. A set of Shakespeare was sold for twenty dollar,;. The donor wus higi'. ly arnused with thec faet that thiese books had been kicking about ant at- tic for years, not supposed ta b. of any value, and was greatly pleased that through this medium lie had been able to contribute twenty dol- lars t. the Red Cross fund. A very large quantity of novelu wergven to us, and 1was told h the dealers that we should get prae-",
         "TIIE CANADIAN 'MAGAZINE tically nething for themn. At or- dizxary aiction sales they wvere zen- eraily put up in bunifes of about twelve books, and] fetchied about tweutty-flve, cents Wo flftY centa for the lot. A dleailer offered us toni cents fer the pick ef thicm, and I said I would censqider bis effer. Shortly atter- wards this dealer came( te mec highly lunaedns,, and said hio woild with- draw bis effer becaxise hle had seen a manti ic(kingm the books over. It ap- pears I hiad let al maxi take his choipe ofa dozeri books for the reason that ho was presentiug thiern W the Coun- valescent Ilome. Wo then set eut t4) sell the books iu our own way, aingly or in small lots. We sold thcmn ail and %Nerageti a price ail round ot thirty-two cents ench ! A little tellew who usod te cadi ro- gularly at the shop and ask, \"Are there lots ef superfootys comning it t\" I teld hlm a few days ago that I wss very sorry they were not ceming in as fast as 1 should like.» The bey said, \u003c'Tee bad, tee badi Do yen think yeu tell 'exm eueugh t Perliaps they don't kuew. Tell 'cm ail about our soldiers,-auid keep on Wotild that I had the power keep on 'telling 'exm\"! 1 should tell how- ever woil supplied the Royal Army Medical Corps may bc, that Red Cross work ia a message et love and svi- pathy, anxd that an opportunity la efYered through the Superfinities Sales, ot sending that message ofý love, by simply parting with sorme- tihing that is of ne inimediate per- sonal use, or ornament. I shlould tell them, how the de- manda of the Red Cross Sýýeiety iu- crease with every day of thie war. It la se littie te fisk, after ail, G i ve what you can do withoiut, That piece of silver y1ou neyer use, that trînket yeu neyer wear, that curio yoi dIo flot wanit-thaFt something that You real.. ly, honlestly, and conscientioliuly shouild not possess if by parting with it you eau dIo your \"llittie bit\". Yen do not mind parting with a superfliuity. It Îa aimply the trouble of bringing it down te the store. Dezena aud dozens ef times I have beeni told, \"I arn always intending te send yen dowu somnething for your Superlluities Sales, but I alwaya for- get, and I really want te help the Red Cross.\" Answer: «Why net really help by -rememb)ering 1» If it were euly possible Wo tell you the ueed of the Red Crosa-how much pain and suffering eau be savedi If it were only pessible te explain direct te every mani who haa net tlhe glerieu% privilege of talcing an active part lu the Empire's work how super- fluities cmx be put te immediate us. I eau juat liear the remark that weuld be made- «Good Lord, if I eeuld hélp our dear feilows at the front, yen may bave auything lu my house. De yen tbiuk 1 would keep any oue of these littie thinga I en if I kuew that by g-ving it I could alleviate the suffering and pain of eue et our meut Do you thiuk I would keep it? No; take anything, yeu want M»",
         "GLLiRCNT ev6NTS ~~0ônd5y \u0026ed.g/brd VIMRDUN, like Ypres, has paw;ed inito ilitaryv history. The big Germai' drive at the Fronch lines, with the eleilenit of surprise to the enemyV Si adva'ntage, has reduced the manhood1 of Germnany, by nal a quarter of a million inilitarv efleet- ives and] brouight nu comnpensating gain for this orgy of blood and iron. The Crownl Prince had long been comiparatively inactive in this regioni, but this irruption lias not w-on liimi the fine and glory whlich hie nlo dIolbt hepedj to grasp over the dead bodies ot a seientificallyý couputed( percent- aige of his effective forýes. Verdun has corne and gone and France lias rcsped a rieh harvest of (German dead -two hiundrcd thousand sonq of the Fstherlsnd who marched bravely \"in-. te the jaws of death, into the mouth ot heUl\", at the word o! command. Line after fine, regiment after regiment, wave atter wave of humans passcd frein lite to death with the sanie punctilious regard for appearances that in.rked them on the barrack square under the- eagle eye o! the nmilitary instrueor. Bravery is not the monopoly of any nation. Whuat- ever we may think ot the systein that drilled and trained them for the gladiatorical ring, or of the moral toue ot the Germian army, we must; take our hats off to the German sol- diers who mardi to certain death when the order to aldvanee rings eut.* if the -bravery of ber soldiers eoulci Gav Geriman her avt i onl sRA ]uedlut animail coutrage alnei,, avi 1iig uideýr 014e ladh of ail iron dia ciln.ilot enlougzli iii these1 days of acenilu8aueIlter, The AlIesa eulvbrave iii batt,ll l and , thjy pffl- se.s whIla1t th Ilenvelînyli' long ago intist h1avo (te batriecofdec tonf o!a as~rcduprioityi men andjj giuna. Verduin la another test of thei relative strerngths of the oppoaing armiiez, and Francev ellerges triumtiphant. Thev siit 1 th i nvew Francv s ainie throuigh the terrible n iighita suad dayu of guinfiro tlîat searched every foot of thie line, and when the end camne the Cermnan offensive was broken againat the steel waIl that harrtd theeey' advancve. Vednwasq the promise of aspring whichl has begzun auspiciolns. ly for theies While, thef Frenchu were beating hack the German offensive at Verdutn. the Britishi took sdvantage e! the concentration of G1erman t roops agaînst Verdun to rush the enemiy 's bines in the Ypres region and recsp- ture trenebes which bsd been lost several iionths previously. Aeord- in-g to the English Press the turnin\u003c point for the Britishi armies lias crne igt length. On Janusry 27th lest an Order in Couneil was puhbished which must have raused the enemy greater anxiety than sny-thiug that has transpired i Englsixd sinee con~. scriptien. was put into operation. The",
         "TUIE CANADIAN MGZN new Ordler in onilstalted that \"Ilthe Chief ut tile Imiperùdl GenUeral Staff shaIl, in addition to perforing sueli other. dut jes :1., may fromn timeig te timew ho aaaignied to hlm under te Order in ('ounciil daiod the lOth of Aitgiisl, 1901, btlw~pnd1 for issui- ing Ohe ordevrs of the (ïovernmiient i regard lt military' operaitigons- Ini tilt opinion of mihtar imn th1is aeinigly uniraportant reguilat ion makes(, ail fhe diffe-renve h)etw(en vie.- tûrY and dlefeat. Sirwi, 1904 the Bnr- tiali Armly has boen under dual con- t rol. Tlhe Secretary of State for War and the Armiiy Council hiveý been the reeponasible heaý'ds. Unider thi.s dulal sytm delays %vre uaodbe There waa nu iffitaI-y head t'O whîom the Armyy and thle euutryeuld look for efllilvy. The utao!the Chie! ut Staff wereu, ý,onfoulnd*d with the 17111101e11 of the Niiiiiter of War. Im- miediat'ely peeigthe war Lord -rnh ho 'was Chief et Sýtaff, re- aignled over events in Ireland, and hie stuecea\u0026sor had scarc.ely lime to assume hie new dulies whlenl war was declared. Thle whele subjeet la reviewed at some length by Generad O'Mdoore Creagh in the Iehruary number of Thtie - teentk Century and Af 1er. The re- organization of the Genieral staff un- der the( new Chie!, Sir Williamn Rob- ertson, i8 regarded by experts as a turning point in the war se far as Britain la cuncerned, \"Wayt\"arer,\" iii The L\u003cmidon Nation le not ta.r fromn the mark when lie says that one's view of the war briglit- ena in proportion as one looks at it thro~ugh the. eyea of soldiers on leave. They are almost unanimous in report- ing that surrenders o! Germains are fairly frequent, that the priaonera ex- hibit great wearineas of the war, that the homb-throwiug un which British soldier-athletes have beceme se expert caues serions lus3 and demoralization lin the German trenchea, and that the armny in general considera the Germain troopa inferior te our owýn, and bias ne doubt of ils power to dislodge them when the word is given. Re(portas of griat activity in Gennlan nalval ireaarc muretreuet The inlactiol ot Ille Germaniil 11% nVy leked up In the Kýiel Calial ls at last hvn ari eýffeet on Gerintin opinion. T I? Lrnlinr Tageblalt, whIieh eenl plublli.hod anl articlIe to slhuw that thie Germran liavy, by reminiing )Il the Kiel Canial, was doingý juast what il wvas buIilt for, bits 11(mW altered Ils t o ref. Il now remlarkis that ula O;ermiany'8i sea piowfr- has been ah- N1urd(ly ovrrtd emn ssea doge 1-annlot c-ontent! theiliselves mu11el longer wihi mlerel *y thwn lheir teeth\u003e. Tt fiurther adinita thait the British navy is flot a power toi b. seoffe'd at, but '-all thie saine, for our fleet to relmain inuelh loniger hidden éaway in the canal will sooin mnake it look idulu.If 18 better te dare andg die thani skulk lin safetY-, Lo-rd Fisher has again beeni aitltt,,d to the deliberations uf the Britisi \\Var Couin- cil. Ilis name lias been bandied about in the press lately, and ]in Parhiamient. Colonel Winston Churehill called fer his retuirn to the Admiraltyv. Chureli- ill's theatrical return from the trench- es to attack the administration of the navy under 'Mr. B3alfour was a pain- fui episode for his old friends. The, politieal correapondent e! The Werekly Dispatch, says that on their way back fromn Paria hast nionth some of the politicians who have been in France for a conference went ta the front, and held a consultation with Winston Churchill. The idea et an alternative Goveriment. consisting o! Mr. Bonar Law, Sir F. E. Smith. aind Mr. Churchill as the heavyweighits, stili survives, but neither Sir F. E. Smith, who suceedéed Sir Edw\u0026rd Carson as Attorney-General, nor Mr. Bonar Law, who lias greatly enhaneed his reputation by bis loyalty to the Coalition Ministry, la likehy te wreek his friture by retiring te thie cave of Adulflam with Winston Churchill. Circumstances have eonspired to revolutionize Britain, secially and pe.. litcally. 'Mr. Walter Lon, in an in- terview with a New York correspon.",
         "CURRENT EVENTS dent, mnakes some striking commenta on the efïect of the war on life in Enigland which will interest Cana- dians. To those who know EngIand what could more graphietally recall thie revoltition which war lias aceom- plislhed than Mr. Walter liong's as- sertion that whien pence is dee1ire(l \"Uice male domlestic will uitterly dis- appear. We shail no loniger sue ant able-bodied footmnan, capablle of iari 's work, handing round teacuips ira a drawing-room\". As to homie po1ities lie is equally einphatir: -l do nlot thinik we shall ever get back again to the Liberai, Conservative, even the Labour Plarty, in the. sense I have ai- ways known tliem during my tbîrty-six years in the. House of Comuions. Tiie recent association of the, leaders or the differeut p)arties durinig the. past elghteen menths lias undoutbte\u003cily aiteretd the atti- taide ef ail towards miany hitherto press- ing problemas. Worldnig together, men quickiy find how much tliey have in eom- maon. And, alter the war, we shall finci ourselves confrontedl with a new and en- tireiy different set of urgent questions wbu'uh will strike clean across the. ol\u003cJ party divisions. \"Moreover, I thin.k even our Parliamen tary system will have to undergo a chiange. Above ail, 1 think there wil be a general desire for dloser association with our oversea Dominions apart from the. feelings of gratitude we have for the, enormous sacrifices tliey have made for the Mother Country. For (ls we shail havTe te werk on dellinite Unes. \"But as regards the present, one thing la clear. W. have a Coalition Govern- ment, and we cannot have anything else bta Coalition. There le no alternative.,, One of the great surprises of the war lias been the Unity of spirit of the British people. Asked if this war la likely to leave a lasting. mark on the life and peuple of Great Britain Mfr. Long replied: \"Inevitabiy. Aiready fi bas prac- ti cally accomplished one great thing, in liatit b las almost completely broken down citass distinction. 1 doubt if the worlcing classes of ts couutry regard any more the. aristocracy as an effete race of parasites battening on their labours. Anid, un the other band, the. aria- tocraey more than ever before realizes the. magnificent qualitles of the Britishi workhingm;n, and wliaî the nation owe.ý to 11lm1. 1 thinik thet communie)i sacrjilceý lias brouglit ahi c1lasses. logethi-r lat a mariner thiat lias liot ,xisé1tI binc flic Napioheýoie wara. Th(, vommnon poril hsau ru iedl](e coutiiry« LIurthIe(rnLiIo re, ail our stndrd if life atre changinig, and inwst continui, Io chiange. The niatlin mlust go bjack te tii. simple lift,. to tihe lesu luxurlous miilhd or our aitcestors. \"LThs wair lui goinig te b, ti . great hevelier. Moiwy miust no longeztr bi, 1hw criterion of power. Wealthiiiui nui lanur be the proof of qiupriorlvy. Hienreforth the citizens of lts country ba.veI te pUll together. ~Araywe seu tue aigrisI 0f Ili., changeizt in living it (lie war hast Wrotlght. W,' have cliangedl ail our habits Iutn g u dlriiking. We no loniger beyexenlv cohsor expenasive c1ars. Tcmas wlîe tormerîy wGUld not go Io lnuivr atiliva Ritz unfless driven the'rclu Inis ewu car now couiittedly take's a penlny oýmnib)us. Anotiier mnari whu wouid neot lit, sccu smokinig anything but exesv lgarsl nuow walks tlii streets smiokingK s pipé:* The adN-anee Of the Plissisui armiy in Asia Minor wilt certaily imprnve the oiitlook of the Alles amoug thoge peoples whe were inliniied te thiuik that the ability o! the Entent. Powers to win the war wa-, dloIIt fui. The. Whole cainPaign O! the Rnl.:-ians ilu 'this quarter, faeed as it was with iau. merise diffleUlty of eountry sud( ah- normal wveather, reveals the newv Rn.. Sian movement as one that ulhle tairen seriously fite onsideration. The fact that the Turks have been driven from oue of thieir great strong. holds wvill circuflate axnong the East-. ern races in the eiurieus mianuer (bat sncb things do, by a methodj uuknow-n iu the West, and will couvey a geod impression. The flU of the' place is both lneideutally and direct]\u003e a blow to Germnan\u003e-, for it was reorgauized and rebuilt uuder the direction of Grermnan army engineers and manned with big Krupp guns. The fall of Erzerum should have a considerable effect ou the. British eam- paigu ini Mesopotaruja. From Erzerum ru ail probahilit\u003e- the Turk-, fartiier mmuth secured tuicir supplies, them. corning iu tihe firet instanee from Trebizoud. Erzerum ia thie capital",
         "TIE CANAUJAN MAGAZINEI of a vilayet with an area of 27,000 qualire Miles, and a population of 500,000, The town has a population of about 40,000 people, a.nd is irregu- larly bit, with narrow, dirty sitreets. The Mfoslemn element prevailq over the Christian, although Erzerum is the metropolis of the Armenian Ljhureh in communication withi Romie. The fail of Erzerumn had a marked effeet on the value of the Germnan mark at Axnsterdam,. There was a reord flU, froin 43.60 to 42.60, while F'reuch wnd English currencies main- taitned their former quotatioxis. Dutch financIviers are of opinion that the. mark will fauil heavily for smre time to couic, the revent rise having been puirely artificial, \"More houses and cities have per- iÈhed at the handa of mai than storrns aind eaLrthquaiikes comiinedi have dle- stroyed'. So wrote Sir John Ljubloek in ;The Use of Life\"'. MNesopotamia proves tie ruile. Babyloiiia and As- syria, now know-n as 'Mesopotarnia, were extensive and fertile territories and thickly populated thousands of years beore Christ. The splendour of their eitieýs and the higli culture attained by their people are now bur- ied in the manda, the ruina of ancient civilizations that reuiind the world to- day of the wcealth. and greatness thiat once made these waste bands fainous at a timne when Biaby.loiaý and Assy- ria divided wvith Eý'gypt UIc eMpir'e of the world. 'lhe only signsýý of the past duit exist t-a are iw iiin- Merise mounda1(l alonýg the coreiof the Tigris and the Euph rates. These mnond miark the grave., of anvlent cPties such ms Ur, Babylon, Nippur. Ashur, and Nineveh. Èxplorers have laid bare sorne of these oldl oiviliza- tioflis Wc van people thlese. ani- cient towns and cities once more and catch somnething -of th., socîId and poli- tica;l activities of those, intenscly iii- teresting tinica. The.se c-ivilizations3 madIe possible the glory tha.t was Greece and thea grandeur that w\"s Romie. -And now British and Russiani airmies aire rarch- ing over thie 4pots wýhereý B.ihylon anl Ninevehi once fiourished, and modern guns and high explosive ohisare ringing in the ear of the Turk the kuéli of his approaching downfall lii this birthplace of humnan history. And the stoical Bedouin sece ini thc coining of the Occident the end of his iioniatue existence, the re-peopling, ofMeo potaniia, the building up) of a new civilization on the ruins of the old anud the waste places once more blonfom- ing into a fruitful land.",
         "THE LII3KY TAB~LE CAN\\ADA IN FJLANDEI1S BY SIR MfAX AIrKIN, M.P. Toronto. Uodrand Stoughton. HVJEN ther Cnnadian Oovern- AImen appointed Sqir Max A itkin TVOfficii Observer at the Front, the average mran was inlndto th'ink thet it was a miearýin ere1y for a rieli mani t get near the Front wiUiout having to fight. The volume before us, however, shows us thait the ap- pointilent was accepted sýerîously, that it iinvolvedJ great responlsÎbÎxlty anid dlanger ind. furthermore, that; Sir Max Aitkirn was able to fulfi al its demands. For this volume, whîeh is the first of thep officiai1 story of the formation and operation of the Cana-. dian Expeditionary Force, is4 n ex- ceedinglyv able a.nd interesting ae- count of the great part the Canadians hsave played in thant part of the war that lias heen fought in Fianders. At the out set Siîr Max makes one observation that should be of peeuliar vaine to ail who oppose compuilsory military training in any form. Be observes that soute men, in doubt, have asked, \"Gan civilians, however brave and intelligent, be made in a few mxonths the equal of those i.nspir- ed veterans who are swarming in tri- umph over the battefields of Europe? Csn Generals and Staffs and Officers b. irnprovised, able to eompete with the scientifie output of the most sci- entifir, general staff which lias ever conceived and earried out military operations 1?\" As to these questions, Sir Max says. very pertinently, that the \"story of Canada in Flanders, however inadequately told, wi i ake it uIl csr eve 11t Wt S a sk theivl agaîi\". The book giVeýSa ivi ieture of the p)lan of vamýaiîg, nnald mnany a Canadlian, having read it, %%i l l have a comreensveaild initelligenit idlea of ho0W the Caaas Went 1111o lballt anrd hohyfogt Ve qutat a YOU mDuSt piCtur, Ille llritIshl alrml-y In thle field, sp)readi ojnt Ji],, a fanj. The, long. wavy oýdge of tle fanl Ili file Iln, Of m'On In tile flrlng trnhs Itht, Yory forefront of affairs, ortein wvithîn a .ston'e thirow of tile o]pposjlng \u003cJorlian ling,ý Bjor hudeaof yards, belid( thil irlng lUne lie the s3upport trinces. aiso 1111,4l witb men. Tie men ilu the firing ami support- ing tronches exchango place, overy forty. olght hours. Atr a four day,%' spoli gioe' ail retire for a four day,'« reet, fresth troops taklng thoîr places als thoy\u003e move out. At the, end of their four dayii' reat they roturn again t0 the tronchies, Ail rellevlng movoMeInott are carried eut ln the dark, te avoid the ouemyi's rife re Furtior back, along the, rua; of the fan, one finds the, headquartors of the, many brigades; belnd these. heaadquarterm of divisions; thon headquartere of army corps. thon of arioes-tho groupa becern- lng fewer and fewer in number as you recede, until, at the end of the, fan hiandin, on, reaches tie Genoral Hoadquartors. where the, Commander-in-Chief stand. wlth his hand ou the, dynamo whlci sonda Ils impuises through evory part oft he great machine spread elut In front. Frein General Roadquartors th. moyé- monts of the entiro Britishi army, or ratier of the, sevoral British arme are directed and controilld. It la a War Office in the field. wlth nwnorous branch- es closely ce-ordinatod ani worklng to- gother l1ke a single machine. flore la \u003cho oporations office, viiero plana of at. tacit are worked eut undor the, diroction of the, Commander- n-Chî, seuad is staff. Near by la tho building occupled by the, \"signais\" brancit, whieh wlth lis nervo systoni of tolographs, ephms and motor cycle dospatch ridera, la the",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE 11neditum of communication wlth every part of the flt-ld, and aIsce witb the base 0f supplies anti the War Office, of L.ondon. \"Signali\" carnies ils wlres to withia rille abet of thu trvncheki, andi eVery division of thie amjy ha. its owni fieldi telephlones fremIn bttUtllon heatiquarters to the flning line,. Close at haud la the offlce of tAie Intelli- gence branch, whlh collecis and coin- munîcates information about th(, enemiy frein every source fi can taep It receives andi compares reports of ttemt(,nents matie hy prisonert3, and iinteýrrogaLtea some pris- oners ltseif. fi goos througb documents, lettors, tiaries, olliciai papers, captureti la the field, andi extrftcts points from those. Itllet news fromr lit own agns-tl only your einmy wbo cala tbem sple. -about events that are hap- pening. or are likely te happen, behinti the acreen of the. enemty's lInos. At General Hleatiguarters you will finti the. tepartment of tbe AdIjtaint-Genieral, who lu remponaible for the wboleofe the arrangement s-keP.eping the. army ln the fid well suppliet wltb mon ati muni- tions of war, for tlie tratisfer ef aOI pris- oners 1tAie base, for the trial ef offonces againtit discipline, anti for the spiritual welfare er the troopq. Yroni a nelgbbourlng office- the. Quarter- master-General controts tbe niovementa of fod anti fotider for men anti hrers. andi ail other stores, other than actual muitionsq ef war. Stili another brandi bouses the Dlroc- tor-General of Medical Service, wbo supervises tbe treatinent of the woutiti train tho fieldi aid post ta the fieldi cloar- Ing station. front tbere ta the hospital train, andi thonco ta thve base boRp!tal fl F\"rance or Great Britain. The complote effieiency ofthIe mon Is largely due te the excellence of tbelr food. -The army 1., la tact, iiealtbier titan auy otber army that bas ever facet wai'. Typholti la almnost unknowfl. The amas- lng record ef hoaltii owes mucb to the sanltary precautions whlcb are taken. Oas of the meut remarltable of tbsse is the systein of bot batbs anti the steril- ising of clotblng. Batblng esztabllshments; bave, been put up lu varieus parts of the field, anti the largest of thoin la lu a building wbîch beforo tbe war was a jute factory. Every heur of the day successive companies of mon bave bot batbs bore. Tbey, strlp ta theo skIa, anti white they wallow la litge vats et bot wator tbelr clotbing Is troat- oti wlth 200 dogroos of lient, wbicb de- stroys ail vermixi. At fIrst the Bmail te'wns. the villages, anti the many farmhouseq anti cottages within easy reacli of tbe firing lino pro- vitiet ail the rest billets. A great maay mon are billoteti ln this way Btil. 1 found, for inatanlce, a company of the Territor- jala snutgly reating la a huge farin, the officera IIavýing quarite-rs in the farinhouse on the other aide of the yard; but re- cently a large nuiber of wooden huts bave been put up in varions placea across the couintryside, and hiere the mlen coule b)ack froni the trtzicheu to rest. Tbey are, tired wben they corne hoe\"but a souint sleep, a wash, a hearty breakfast, and a atroil la the freali air, out of range of the insistent bullets, have a magical effect. Iu the aternoon you find tuiem playing football as biithely as boys, anti those who are flot playlng atandi rouind and cbaff andi applauti. I aaw as many gaines of football one day. la the course ef a nmater runl behind the lnes, as one would aee on a Saturday aftertioon la 1hIngland, Every day brings its letters and news- papera-every railroaci bas Its little trav- elling letter off'ice sbunteti into a slding. Hoere the letters of a division are sorteti, They.,average more titan one letter a day for every man fl the field. That la an- other reason why the army ls la gooti spirits. No amiy l the world ever got so mucb nows from borne, so regularly and s0 qulckly. Besides tbls, drafts ot men are constantly belng sent bome acrosa the Channel-for live or seven days' leave. NEW POEMfS BY ARTHURI K. SýABÎN. Eat Sheen, London- Temple Sheen Press. ADELIGIITFUL book, even to handie. is this volume of hand. printed poetry by the authior of \"The -Wayfarers» aud «Five Poema'\u003e. It is fuil of sweet, thoughts and swet music. There Îa flot a jarring note ini the whole volume. The poems are without titie. We quote number twenty-three: One golden afternoon, beneath The odorous pines, upon a heatb Ringeti by gray distant lai, we spent, la lonely tremnulous content, With bearta too near our hanta, and eyes Growfl foarful in their dieep surmise. Arounti, the heather-bells wlth bees Were murmurlng; the murmuring breeme Moveti the dense bracken scarco at ail, Yet madie the pine bouglis rIme anti fait In hauntlng rhyn, monotonously, Lilce echoes of a far-off sea. 1 toit of heroes, anciemit gotif, Andi long.forgotten. periods,",
         "Hev sarlest mani, coxnmuulng, caught P'rom tbought for others pasalonate thought hisplring and cregative, tilt His hands, obedient ta hie gvIII, Had built a domed roof, ta fanm For loved ones shelter fram the storm. Then. boy lie taugbt the stubborn fle\u003c1 Tu underatand lits need, and yteld, Sweet food and raiment; boy he tient Uacii age bencath the wonderment Of Beauty, labouriug ta prove That all Lif e mIihtered, ta, Love. $iie told (ah, sad the. tale!) bow years Fer voinan brouglit grlmi pain and teara. Domcd roofs beneath a sky-dornsd sky, Loea bul1ded, ahsltered ber, to lie The. lonely vlctim of a strife WItb Death, for more than voman'a lte. Man, ever dreaming, talllng, saw In dreain and tol the sternal law, And for lis loved onges and is kîn We sbapcd the world tbey sojourned In. But vomnan by tierce sufferlng Aioe. ceuld ber great tributs bning To Lite, who tnuphed over ber, And ovar Loye, bis minister. And the vide, undulatlng beath Lay silent, s3lumbering beneatb Theo lits hot atternoon; and vs Lay allant, musing droasly. Nov bine hase on the bis gray-blue Was acattered sottly; one tank threv \"tg qulvsnlng napturous heant In sang Suddenly dowiiward; accu ths long sweet day toward Its clasing turucd. p)uaklly red the big sun bunned Aud vaulsbed. Then aur wny vs vent Hoeioard Iu tremulous content. IF A MAN SIN Jh .A. \u003cIX)Dy. Toronto: William T IT; y new Canadian novel reflecta the atmosphere of the Canadian north-w,ýesterfl frontien lite wîth what we tàke te be aceuracy and Sympathy. Net having known by personal ex. peiengce what the life on the Peace river and in . the Mackenzie 'Valley r nerally is like, we are compelled to judge by the varions impressfions pre- viously gathered, and by the consist- ent aind ConvÎnCing quality uto Mr. Cody's work, that hie descriptions are reliable. As to the story, it is ail very We11 for those ot a religious or moral- izing turn of niind, but even regadera Of this cIa.cs- urnat filnd it ifleuýg1it t4 regard1 the plot as lglal A younfg prea9cher, hain rcrniitted -a very serious fee-osris utt that Nli. Cody' dare, fot evenl Iinti at wlha't it waal-sdigraved lv tile Bsh op, b reaks thei hejrits of pla renta 1al\" fian(ee andý gocaý tg) tli fair north to repent alnd be forgouen.rl lie rtes3 eusa white g'irl byorphilned hyv acident in the, iorth, fromn a ite.b altong the Indians. goca. with lier to a filr-t rappinl'o -shanity-v, andl bringii her 11p a\"; hi]auher h affect lo1uatg relations btefl th two are gharml- igly port rayed. il, the( endl ),,y aIre forcedl to meýet white, pepl tan The girl mairries a young aada hero. and the. man llinds hisi former fianeee and miarries lier. il iq a sienjý pie book, alinoRt naïve, yet full of a sturdy and hiomly Cnadia love, ot Virtue. It la %wlîolesomle and inter- esting readiing. for Youiig oeea pecially. TRE FRINGE$ 0F THE PLEET By RUDYARD KwiuNq. Torote: Thie Mýaeniilllan] Colmpanly of Cania T IIS;litlebook, tu be 801d fer à the rnavy ut tu-day with file navy or a hundred years ago, %viien \"the. nur- ruw seas were full of single-ship ac- tions; mail-pae-ketq, West Country brige, and fat East Indiameon figzlit- ing for thieir own huiila andg ca.rgo..\" \"It vas a brutal age, miuisteredj te liy hard-fisted men, and vo had put IL a hun- dred decent yeara behlnd us wben-lt ail cornes back agaWn To-day tiiere are no prisons for the creva of merchantmeu, but tbey can go te the bottomi by mine and torpedo even more quikiy than tbefr ancestors vere ru iet Le Havre. The, aubmarlne takea the. place of the. priva- teer; the Line, as In the, 011 wara, le sc- cupled, boumbardlng and blocka*ling. eise- viiere, but the. sci-borne traMc mut con- tinue, and that la being looked siter l\u003ey the lineaI descendants et the, creva of the. long extlnet cuttersanmd sloepsand gun-briga. Tii. hour atruck, and they reappeared, te thec tune ef fltty tiieaaand odd mon in more thon two thouaand IBRARY TABLE",
         "THE' CANADITAN MAGAZINE @hips, or which 1 have seen a few hmn- dired. Word$ of command mnay have chaoLlgedj a Uittie. tiie toolB are certainly more, complex, but th(- spirit of tiie new crew4 who oeie te the oid job Is utterly uncliangedI. It la tiie saine tierce, hard- living, heamvy-haflded, very ounning service out ef whivb tii. navy as w. know it to- dayi was borra.» liv LAUICNCIi BINYON. b01(ondnEl kin MNathews. Tl'8 s ae chaste littie volumeý of ih8everse by unie 1010 always seomas te exrcise thoe real poetic in- stincet, whether hie take8 as his 811b- jiect at Vision of biondlon in tinie of poaco, or il, timle of war, We give an eXaIlinlel of the latter in \"The Zeppe- lin -: (lunsi far' ani near, Quirk, sudden. angry, Thtey startle thi. still street. Upturned faces appear, Ucors open on darkness, Thiere Is hurrylng of feet. Ami whirled athwart gicein White tingers of alarmn P'oint at Iast there Where iliumined and dumb A shape suspended Hlovers, a dernon of the Btarry air! Strange and cold as a dreain Of sinimter fancy, It charms 11ke a snake, P'olsed deadly in the gleamn, While bright explosions Leap up ta It and break. Is It terrer yen soek To exit lI? Knew thon Heart.s are here That the. plunging beak 0f night-winged muirder Strikes not with fear. Se mueb as It strings Te a deep elation And a quivering pride Thnt at last the heur brings For them, tee, the. danger Of those whe di.d, 0f those who yet fight Spending for oach ef lis Their glertous blood Ia the foreign night, That new we are neared te them Thank w'e GO\u0026. There are botter poemls, but theY are tooý long to quote. ',Felehinig the Wýoundýed,\" \"TIhe Ebb of War,71 , The Aritagon ist-s\"' and \" Ed~ith Cavell\" are ail vivid imipressions of the greatt struggle. FIELDS OF FAMýE IN E(LN AND SOLAI By J. B. WETrmLw. 'f oronto. The Maemillan Company of Canatia. APARTfro. ilsgenoera itterst: parisons are prone to b4 made, this book should prove to e oan excellent supplemnentary volume for use iu schools. It doscribes in a succinct. yet, interesting manner famous battle- fleldis sucli as Hastings, Flodden Fie](], Culloden Moor, Bannockburn, Marsten Moor. Mueh of the space is given to the warsoef the Roses and Io the great civil war in England. It begins with the hattie of Hastings aud ends with. the battie o! Culloden. There are numerous illustratio\u003ens THE BELFRY BY MAY SiNýcLÂni . Toronto: The Macmillan Company of Canada. ALR~EAIY the war is beiug used this iu not a novel based on the pres- ont great straggle ils climax 8s reaeh- ed in incidents based on it, It is a very long, novel, and while it seemas te drag in places one overlooka that iu view of the fine characterizat ions of Tasker Jevonus, the struggling, in- pudlent, yet enjoy.able Cockney. and Viola TIhesiger, a complex and attrac- tive heroine. But it lu lu the style of! the writing that itq appeal mostly lies. and the book will bo read and enijcyed for that, if for nothing else.",
         "TWVICE -TOLD TALC$ TÂImNa A RisK '«Ain't you rather young to be lef t in charge of a drug-store t\" \"Perhaps; what ean I do for you 1» \"Do your employers know ifs dan- gerous to leave a mere boy like you ine reof sueli a place?\" III arn eompetent to serve you, ma- dam.\" \"Don't you know you xnight poison smre one?\"' û,There is no danger of that, ma- dam; what ean'I do for yout\" \"'Think I had better go to the store down the street»\" 'II eau serve you just as well as they can, and as clieaply?\" I'Well, you may give me a two-eent stmp, but it doesn't look righi'- Toronto Mail and Empire. Dinali Snow was a coloured eook ini the horne of the Smiths. One morn- ing on going Wo the kitchen Mrs, Smifth noticed that Dinah looked as if she haad been tangled up with a road- roler. CWhy, Dinal \" exclairned she, 4.what iin the world lias happened to you?\u003eY ,tWas me husban' explained Dinah. \"He done went au'\u003e beat me ajr1f, an' jes' fo' nothin, too 1\" \"Again !\" eried Mrm Smith witli lu- easing wonder. \"'Is lie in the habit of beating youY Wliy dou't you have hlm arrestedl» '\u003cBeen thinkin' oh it several tirnes, mjss,»1 was the rejoinder of Dinait, 'q\u003eut 1 hin't nebal lad. no rnoney te LIFE Chiapter 1 'G-'lad to neet you.1» Chapter I1 \"Isn't the mnoon bdauitiful 1\" Chapter 111 teOozurn love wuzliu? Chapter 1V \"'Do you-ý Cil do-\" Chapter V «Da-a-da--da!la ! Chapter VI \"'Where the saulitii'. dinner?» -Chaparral. ARF1Ricx iTO PRamu A oung Ameriean artiat who han juat returned fron a six-months* job of driving a Britislh amnbulanve on the war-front in Belgiumn bringu thiia baek, straight front the trenehes: \"Quie cold rnorning a sign was puait- ed up abo've the Germait tréeh fac- ing ours, only about fifty yards awy, whieh bore ilarge letters the words. -Gott mitUsf \"One of OU? eockney lads, more of a patroit than a linguiat, looked at this for a moment, and thon larnp- blacked a big sign of his own, which he raised on astirk It read: -1\"We got mitten., tooP '-Ve Yorkc Evening World. PAR PitOM IT Dark Wayfarer: «Do., I know where de fo'th Nat'na1 Bank i.?1 Why, boss, I don't even know where i. de first naVuasl bank!'\u003e-Life.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE T.%KiNO No CFHAýNcxs A freekle-faeed girl stopped ait the. post.offlee- and Yelerd eut: «Aýnythingi for the Muirphys 1» \"\u003cNo. there ig flot.\" \"..\\inythiniz for Jane Mulirphy?\" iNothing.ý\" \"A.nythiing for Atin Muirphyl\" «iNo.\" \"Anything for Tom Muirphy?\" c'No'.e \"Anything for John MuItrphy ?\" \"No, flot a bit.', «ýAnythingZ for Terry Mrh? \" No. nior for Pat Muirphy, nor Denis Murphyv, nor Peter M1urphy, uer Paul 'Murphy, nnr for any MNurphy, dead, living, uinborn, native or foreigxi, clvilized or uineivilized, savage or bar- barons, maie or feniale, black or white, natutralized or otherwise, soldier or eitizen. No, there la pesitively noth- ing for amy of the Muirphys, either indlivîduauly, joinitly, severaily, now anld for ever, onie and inseparable.» Tiie girl looked ait tiie postmaster lu astoni0ihment. \"Please,\" ah. said, (cwiil yen see, if there la ainything for Biridget Mupy\"TtBits. TITE EXPERTS. ciThern Turks ia certainly raisin' al, kixids of taruation with the Ger- mana,\" said the 4Tall Thin Man on the car. \"They ain't Turks,\" aaid the Short Fat Maxi. c'Thunder they aiin't,\" said the Tall Thin Mn \"Nthey ain 't Turks,\" velun- teered the Conducter. \"They're Turkos. \" \"1What lu blazes are Turkoa if they ain 't Turks?\" said the. Tail Thin Man. \"They ain't neyer saw Turkey,\" aaid the Short Fat Main. \"They 're a wild tribe of Zouaves frem Zanibar.\" \"Anyhow,\" said the. Cenductor, 'lit don 't matter where they corne from. There are a lot of 'em. that ain'. goiug baek.\" \"llowý long is this war going to last?\" aaked,( the Fat Mani. \"l't iýs goCing te last, until sorneh]ody takes Pryzzezzezzem3d.v, and tak(e it goodl. T arn sure of that. Pryýzzezzez. zertnyl seemas to be the only thing they are filhting for.\") \"ic on-ly hope the Belgians will taka Moseow. 1 feel sorry for thexu folks, said the Conduetor. \"Yes, I hope they take it, tee. Anxd 1 hope they win out in Servia, 1 think the Belgiaxis ought te liek the. Serviants. I would lîke to see' ern lick sornehody, even if it '8 oflly the Eng- lish,\" said the Short Fat 'Mani. \" Me, too, \" said the Tait 'Ihin ri11an, \"but 1 don't think they got a look ini since the Russians took Ijiniiskiov- itchaninoskiavitch.\" \"WÇh e re in thunder is tha t place?\" asked the Short Fat Main. LIt îs a strategie position in Southesat Montenegro.\" \"Ah, that is where those negroes corne frorn,\" saiid the ,Short, Fat Mani. \"No, you honeheaid, \" said the Con- ductor, \"Ijininiskiovitehaninosklo- viteh is the capital of Bulgaria. Lt uised te be Sofa, but they ehainged it ta somethixig that would 8ound Frenchi because they are with the. Al- lies. Sofa wui tee easy. Anybody coulId fall on thait in a minute, so they gave it a nome nobody would dare taieki.\"' \"Well, ainyhow,\" said the Tal Thin -Main, \"my sympathies are al with the Swedes.\" \" Why, the Swedes aiin't li this war at al, \" said the Short Fat Mani. \"That'a why iny sympathies are wýith them,\" said the Tall Thin Mani. \"Us ainybody took Prezzezzez.. zemyl yet?\" aisked the. Conductor. \"Hlas ainybody took it?\" snorted the. Short Fat Main. \"Everybody ha took it three or four timea, but they ail gave it baick. They ean't telegraph home that they have get it and inake anybody underaitand wliat they have get.\"Y \" End of the line, a-1-i o-u-t, \" yell~ed the Conducer.-Tko Times.",
         "DO YOU KNOW ABOUT THE AD VAN TAGES 0F INTERNAL BATHING? THE, DANGERS OF AUTO-INTOXICATION EXI\u003eLAIN1ED lii theso days of super-activity in business and soeia1 life, when we ail -men and women-arc burni-g iup our vitality andi nervous force in thie endeavor to keep up with the taxiing paee. it is a welcome sign that men andi wornen are entering upon an era of common sense in the care andi pre- servation of their physical selves. Less andi less do the great mass of intelligent people place dependence on nostrumas andi drugs. On every hianti, often in our own intimaste circles, we witness convineing demonstrations of the uselessness of hoping for rei re- lief fromn sucli harmfully stimulating, unnatural means of combating the liundreti andi one ailments s0 commion. Your phy,ýsician will tel yoii, in case yoii have not yet realizeti it yourself, that probably fully 90%7 of the ills andi diseases from which we suifer are due to the clagging of the system by waste andi poiso-nous matter that ahÉouil rightly be eliminated immedi. ately if we would remainin 'health anti escape even more lastmg evils. By the way in which we live our livea, the demantis of unnatural con- venition, the forcing of our bodies to t'y to adjuist their activities andi fuine- tions to the cail of personal conveni- ence-the forming of unhygienic habit, in short-is yearly exae.tirig a terrible toil in suifering. If you are run down, tireti out, lacking energy and vmr; if your nerves are «ail gone\"; if you are bil- ions and headachy; if everytbing is, a burden and an effort ; if youir phyis- ical c'ondition tells youl ail toil vlain_ lyv that yuou are ev-en more serioul Y afrected' voil mlay hi, quite, sure that youl are pay .ing thie penalty . cither direetly or idrtyOf al sy stemn thati hias been isaagd You are no longer paying youirself dividenda in health; you have nug surplus in vi- tahity-you are exhiausting your cap- ital. And ail these thinigs becaius., you, like nearly v rye else, in a similar plighit, have paîid the lenst attention to. the part of your body that necida il mnost, for, as Profeawsor Metehnlikoff, the world-emninent swientiat, state4, it is the insidious, liealtIli-destroyinig, disease-breeding germas geýnerited4 il, thie lower intestines that are the ehbief cause of our premnature olti age, anti, of course, are responsible for the nany bodily disorders that, cause il, bY reason of the poisons that cause them to deteriorate, Yuur own physieian, wheni lie cornes to you in ilines, first miakesý sure, to thoroughly purge your -sys- tem (if the aceulaýtetiwateh knows hce annot help von intil lit, hia- done so, juat as, he knows that if you hi kept yuour intestines hyieni-ii i(,ally clean there wotild have bcvin no neei for his services. Andi that is why the internai bath is the natural, the logical, the ideal wvay to eliminate this waste mnatter. andi by eliminating it remiove the source ofmost of our ill. It doemnot",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE drug youir syatem;. it igt not a violent, sy- stem..racking thing, b)ut a pleasur- ie, svienitifîe, efficient adaptation of a cuirative method that is as old as civilizati\u003en itself. Tt corrects, the very conditiong that give. the hlood al ehnsto absaarh thes poison-,. Tt kpayoi vIean inside by remnovinig waste Tinatteýr, prevents the biood fromn havinig a chance to carry themt ta the organs and ti'sues of the body, infecqtitig them and starting that lowering of hodily efllciency and vigor whichi maktlesý us4 miserable and unhilappy. aven if it dloes not pave the way for more serions i11e and diseases that endaniger life itsoif. This imiproved system of Internai Bathing is natturailv a rather diffi- cuit sulbjeet to caver ini detail ini the public press, buit theýre, is a physiciani wha lias malle this his iife's studyv and work, who bias written an inter- esting book on the subjeet called. \"The( _What, the Why, the Way of Internal Bathing.\" Thiis hie wiil send on request ta anyone addressing Charles A. Tyrrell., Room 531, 257 Collage street, Toronto, and men- tioning that they have read this in The Caniadian Magazine. Like ail really worth-while things, the initerniai bath is as simple as nature's processes always aire. YVou wiil find, in its use a new freedomn from the effects of druigs that at bast cant buit teniporarily' , and then only partly, aid natuire in freving the, sys- terr of its waste. Tt is above ail lse thorouigh and rational and right. and in accord with the laws of health. And it is somethinig beyvond even this. Tt is the mleans of keepIinig youir body at par even whent yon are not sifer- ing from any particular organie dis. case. It enlables youir systemi to do its wvork fiilly and freely unmder al conditions. Lt is a wonderful tanýie- a tonic that braces withouit atca sthilation or any harmnful results. It keeps von free fromi the risk of disease that gets its start fromn ac- cumuiilated wa.ste; and by keeping the intestinal tract aiways hygienically denprevents the blood fromn ab)sorb- ing poisons that otherwise reach cvery organi of the body throulgh the c1(iclation. Lt can neyer becomne a habit, something one cannot say for dIruigs. What the internai bathl ha done for so many thousands of grate- fui men and women it can do for you. We believe you will be interested in readïng a more thoroughiy discussion of the subjeet than is possible or ad- visable here.",
         "CANÂDIÂN MÂGAZINE ÂDVERTI8ER Except 'ln the boUtle--- o!You cannot get real I3ovril except ini the Bovrit N o bottle. Bovril Îs so strong that it cannot psil be manufactured in cheap cubes. It takes the beef of a whole bullock to make a dozen boutles of Bovril. Add Bovril to make your cookery more nourishing and to save butchers' bis. But it Mut be Bovril. M~ Delicjous and A4ppetizin IngersOil Pimento cheese Cons;ste of Inper. soi Cream Cheeft Very peing In akae Iç and 15C. Ask Youw Grocer Iizgerwoi Inger*ollGreen Cream CZheese Cbie Ch.e --à superioT to n rnr gebol ma nesnd is' LihlIy .eonomioel. deliciqus. lu packiages 15C. ma 25,- la packages 15.",
         "'4 CNADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTIc;FP Hýer Second Childhood vr ~ atîng the simple, nutritious foodls that keep the mind buoyant and the arteries soft and pliable is the NO surest road to the bounding, ex- ubeurant health of children. You can postpone Old Age through the constant com- panionship of children and through eating the simple, natural and well -cooked Shreded Wheat supplies in well balanced proportion the greatest amnount of nu- triment with the least tax upon the digestive organs. It contains ail the material for replenishing the dail waste of tissue and at the same time supplies a laxative element that keeps the colon decan. A food for ail a ges-for babies, mothers and grandmoth- ers-for invalids and ath letes-for outdoor men and indoor men. B.lug ready-cooked and ready-to-soerve it is easy to prepare wlth Slir.dded Wheat a deli- cloua, nourshing meal in a fgw moments. AI- waya best the Biscuit in the. oven t. restoe its criapnes. Serve witii hot or cold milk, addiug a littis creamn and sait. Delicious for any neiga with sliced bananes, baked apples or oter fruits. SMade In Canada by flac Canadian Shredded Wheat Co., ILimited, Niagaira Falla, Out. Toronto office, 49 Welington Street Est 24",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVtERTISLn Wofth Looking Into!1 The choice of a table beveragze frequently bas much to do wîth the health and happiness of a family- both chaidren and grown-ups. Somne persons seern to get on with tea and coffee for a time, but ithey both contain a drug, caffeine- frein 14 te 3 grains to the average cup-which generally gets in its werk sooner or later. Those who desire te play safe with health wiIl do well to quît both te and coffee entirely and use Instant -Posà%um, This famnous pure food-drink is made frein wihole wheat skilfufly msted with a s;mallportion of wholesome molasses. Postuin has, ýe celer and aroma, and a deficlous, snappy flaveur, and is free \u003emn the drug, caffeine, or any other harniful element. There are two forme of Postuni. The original Postum CreaI jet be weil-boiled. Instant Postuin requires ne boiling -a level Lspoenful in cup with hot water malces a delicious tale drink- Ldy instantly. The cost per cup is about the sarne for both formes. '\u003cîThere's a Reason'* for POSTUJ! Canadian POstuma Ceal Ca.. Lt\u0026 r~doO Windsor, Ont.",
         "CÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTIS3ER CA R K'S S PAGH ETTI1 -.mm--e,-,WITII TOMATO SAUCE AND CIIEESE A highly nutritious and partie- ularly appctizing dish. Bc sure when ordering spaghetti to specify CLARK'S and keep your mnoney during War -Time circulating in Canadian and BRITISH- channels. W. CLARK, LIMITED9 MONTREAL",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE AD)VERTISER 2 QUAKER OATS PREMIUMS Uive Plats, We are offéring many premiums to Quaker Oata inra Jewl S.ilver Mlate, Jewelry and Alumintun Cooking tesjA A1-minm 1irular in each package îist-ales theni, This takes the place of larige advertising. aknt givra ail the savlng teyou. luc I cpcaecntis0ecuo. I:acth 25r. rouirdc package coutai rs tw %vo coun r \"Each co, lion has a merchandise value, if 2, t,, appyI ,on anry premýiumii. WVe niake vrry attractive, vy\u003e To Màke Folk\u0026 Love Oats Better Ta Reve.l in This Vb.j..od This is to mnothers, who are anious toý make a dainty of this energizing oat The way is this : Get the large, white. luscious flakes. Get theni unmixed witl %ma-1 1er flakes, for 1ittie cats lack flavor. , Serve none but Quaker O-ats. On sorte oats Nature lavishes enjioymfen6t. Some oats iii the saine field She megloctu, We pick out those favored oats for Quaker, discarding ail the reat, OnIy leni pounds are obtained froin a bushiel. Rt is Worth thie pain% get these queen oats. It brings a double welcome to this spiit-giving dish. And you pay no extra price. Quaker0 QaUNlts A I the Littie Grains OmItted Some things wve know, and some we de~nt But we don't lcnow why the.\u003e so excel in v1m- ow, about oats. producing poner. W. know the\u003e' are rich in phosphorus and In this respect, for ail t.e aKes, omIq hiav. 'ithin, the brain and nerve constituents. stooti supremie. And oats wili alaabe th, We know the\u003e' are 7.5 per cent energy food, king food wvhere vitalit\u003e' is prized. il 15 per cent nitrogenous. And thai two That's whv we urge tbis meLbod of making r cent la minerai foodi we need. oats delighdil. R.fguksr Package, 1lOc Large Round Package, 25c E-xcept in For West s.éeogh. Ont TA.Qukr asQupny.- NEW ROUND 25c PACKAGE .owe lxlim3ut a niew large package of Quaker Osta. It ta a round package, inbect-p\u003c.x%£ A pema\" àl until the 'tflake is utd. This package cont.j,,s twôo ptemlunî copon. witha meca m aio c ,rice2,ý.,. We stilI cotinue our large 3cpckag with china. MAlo out 10c package. LU",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTIBEB A simpl,. sale n~d effetil' utmert, no i g dIgu. It i. à 1§O0N to suffeçus frorn Athm. Thi. ai, -0ylb atw -I-1w. 11NsPired vitl rv.ry br If I n % brrathlg e-asy-o, tii. sre .11dtsa ut11P thi og, sufi resqtfil aig[hts. CrwoI.areI.e ili bnnua ompieaiIk- of \u0026r let F.vcr and MW'a1ev anid m kaiu .i~n he teat. mient 4! lipqt\u003ci., Calasb.st recornimeuâA ion i. its «) ýea \"f auoesfl rn.Sead us prst.1 fo, Desript il, 1 kiLet. For Sale by uili Druggist. Try Cresolue Antlsestic Tiitoat TaébIets for the i1r rtttd Uwoa. ýoempose off sippcry 1-a bark, ioc sgrand Cislt. They c- t barm You. Of -or 4uggit orff rita us, If) cets inI tainp% The VAPO-CRESOLENE Co., L..ming-MiIIeà Building, M\u003cntr.laI, Canada. Il I IlMy baby was so sick that both she and 1 wete almost dead- my mother prevailed oin me to use your- Mn. Winslow's Sootming Syrup She had raised her chîldren on it. My baby is now doing welI, sleeps as sound as anyone, is cuitting ber teeth and she and 1 are both comfortable, MRS. LUELLA KEILLIHIER, Woodlilndci Califoria. Soething Syrup For Claildren Teethiu.g :11ISOLD EEYHR",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISKR, To Military Tailors K ham-ki Clo t h For Servîce Jacket Riding Breeches Army Greatcoat British Warm The stock we carry in Khaki Cloths includes A the weaves required for British Army Offlcers' Uniforms. Fine Worsteds, Cheviots, Whipcords, Bara- theas. Bediford Cords, Mettons, and Frieze manufactured by the most reliable makers, and lines that we know to be correct in shade and mnade to stand wear, Also Shirting Flannels and Cotton Ducks and Drilla. Officers Caps Sam Browne Seltz Fox' Puttees, Leather Leu\"\u0026n Buttons, Badges Braids, etc. SENO FOR CATALOGUE AND) SA MPL\u0026 S OF KHAM2 CLOTHS Nisbet \u0026 Auld, Liniited Toronto Ontario",
         "CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVEBRTISzER J The War tax on corsets adds nothing to, the retail price of a D) \u0026 A or a La Diva Corset because they are Made-n-Canada-But, about fîfty cents, out off every dollar paid for iuiport.d corsets, now goes for customns duties and profits on th.nx, which add nothing in corset value. 245 RUY MADR4-!CANADA CORSEbTS\" Mâde by tii. Do~ n Cornet Cimpan). one of the. best equipped Corwrt fictoric, in thie World. IF BABY IS UNDER-NOURISHED GIVE HlM ROB IN SON'S PATE'\"NT\"' BARLEY le your baby peevtsh and irritable? la it under-weight and flot gaining strength or weight? Is it reatless at ntght, constantly crytng¶ and unable to, retain food? Any ofthese symptoana would indicate that baby ta flot gettin the right food. There te nothlng bet- ter to nourish and strengthen your children than Robinson'a \"Patent\" Barley. It ia easily digeated aund read- ily asmilated. Read what Mrs. Moore of Yew Tree Farx, Fleasenhaill Suffoflk, England, says about her boy (whoae picture ia ehomwn), \"He was brought up enttrely on1 COW'B milk and Robixiaon's \"Patent\" Barley until lie Nvas 14 months old.» Send loday/or aisr invaluaMle lite bookIet, entitied \"lAdvice to Motkmr MAGOR, SON \u0026 CO., LIMITED, Sole agents for Canada 191 st. P\u003eaul Street Woit 30 Church Street, Moeitreai Toronito",
         "CÂNÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERtTlI;P\u003c 8 NOW MARMALADE!. It's the season for Bitter Oranges and Grape Fruit. Make your Marmalade with St Lawrence Granulated Pure Cane Sugar \u003eBeing absolutely pure it assures best possible resuits and removes ail risks of fe rmecntation. GA tu ,lm E Upon request we send excellent orange and grape fruit ffl marmalade recipes and 30 marmalade labels for borne ;e-Address ST. LAWRENCE SUGAR RERINERIES, UMTED, MONTREAL.",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER A11G l: JJ IDFor Social Pay TGOLD 5O OIht t.g EXES Akr-Cu.h\" FhE.I Ch\u0026~ I.d.us 50 e cfDiS *B 1IYELE PLAYING EARD\u003e \"^DE: ir CANADA CLUB I For (oneral Play T IN STAMPS aflo hi ult. 1 X., TrORONTOCANADA. CASH for WASTE ýPAPER VOL' WI1,1, CET THE HIGHEST PRICE BV USING A CLIMAX ALL STEEL FIREPROOF BALER Kcep yoiir place neat and tidy and reduce your fire risk. So simple, any boy cati operate it. Vfade in 5 sises. Send for \u003eP*es CLIMAX BALER CO. HAMILTON, ONT.",
         "CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE AD)VERTrjiiu No-Not This\"9 Puffipd WLeat\" Every child bas dain1tie, -she ,IiN- likes to share. You did and we did. Chiidren alwvays wvill. And in every homne that serves Puiffed Wheat, that dainîy is among~ Iheni, We have often wvatched it. With a great big dishi, and apalgeIln waiting, one hattes to share a Laste, F1aJ1Ky, Flavory Bonbons These bubbles of wheat look and taste like confections,. Cbildren love io gat themn like peanuts-carry them in bags when at play.' Adding creamn and sugar makes a breakfast dish W-ith wbici niothing else compares. And they are about as delicious as a good-night dish, tlo.ated in bowls of milk. Another pleasant fact is that at any hour one may eat his fil]. F-or thescti, crisp morsels are simply whole wheat puffed. Every food cel! bas becrn C\\- ploded. So, beyond ail other grain foods, Puffed Wheat casily dg~s It is quite a mistake to be sparing of a food so fascinating and %io hygienic. PuffedWha 12e Puffed Rice Wes 15e These are the foods in which Prof. A. P. Anderson solved the pr-oblem of perfect cooking. in other forms these grain foods are cookeci or baked or toasied. Tht,5 part of the food celis are broken, but rarely more titan balf. Ini Puffed Grains alone is every food celi exploded. Over 100 million steani explosions are caused in each Puffed Grain. Thus every atn of every element becomnes available as food. Your doctor will tell you that wheat and rice, in every way%, are besi whegi served in puffed forma. 1%. Quakear Ots 0 m p ny PiETERBOROUGH. ONT. SASATON KAKZSS IM1AAOr s8~",
         "84 CAN;ADI\u0026N MkGAZINEB ÂDVERTIBER \"OSCO\"t1 FiIiîng Systems Effic*ncy is the kcynote of present day business. Your business canoot bc conducted efficiently if your filing and record kecpitg systems are inadtquate. Modern, down-to-thc- minute, simplified filing miethods and devkces are the\u003c tangible evidence of \"OSCO\" Office Systems in Baniks, Manufacturig conceras, Insurance Companies, wholesale housca and retail stores ln cvery center in Canada whcre business is transacted. Write for system booklets and catalogues Our Ows Stores: Mnatreal, Ottawa, Raillai. St. John,. Winnipg, Leginx, sw..o.nCagmry AKER9 OF MON ORAGE FILIN\u0026 CAO/HEr Off k. Speddty Largett NG\u003e*Ts of Piig Deviceg in Wi BrWAs Elapirc Home Offices at Works - N.wmaroet, Ont.",
         "CANÂDIÂN KÂGÂZIE ÂDvERTEitT ~~/ Cover your buildings with Ccrtain-tecd. it lid, smoot]h-surfaeed, Permanent roof, herproof, easy tu Iay, and cheaper than i, galvanized iron, etc. ced for 5,10o r 15 years,accordîng to ply Thiis is a real guarantce, backed by thet ng eoncern in t he world. Don 't coifulqc I with eheap ireadey roofing sold by il. ced txoin your local dealier, whnim you kilo, upon. IL wvill rave you moltnqy il In \"\"Ic . M Sold by 90ood dealers \u0026Il over Canada, at erai Roofing MfgS-. Co. i 'a largast manufacturar# of ino and Building Fa para. c than haif a Cen- of Quality is be- every package of 'fNSON' S Corn I Starch' RM AIways order b-- the name BENSON'S ini order to get what you waut. Practie\u0026ll *v.ry grocer lut RM Canada h\"las ESON'S My Pet Endcd This Way 1W'iUe,, bpearJt 1, 1 had a corn whl ch batliered me for years. It upoiled a hured eviznge Notlalug in aay life had yielded uh aura of pain. I did wbat all do -pared it. daubed it. But I caused more soremens th\u0026* I saved in pain. And the. cora remaiae. Then I read of Blue-Jay' On. alght I applied Il and the pa forever Stopped. lu tvo days I remove4 it, and the. corn was goe. Never since, beIieve me. have 1 jet a corn ache twlce. No frlend of mine nov ever hanua corn 1 told them \u0026II of Blne-Jay. It hau nere fjde4 1 kon it cannot fa'il- No.' 1 write tbju te ~t ew.r-Y voZA11 that cornu axe out-of-date. -?a. Pain sud. inaenaa witb Blue-.J'y. And the corn Zoo d4bamý, Once prove ti n o iiI l\u0026 efo cornu as u, An itL WHWrtw. Try this way tngt 15c and 25c at Druggfst, BAUKR \u0026 BLACK, Ciago and Nev York Mlakeru of Surgleuj Dretin. etc- Blue=jay Ends Cortis",
         "16CÂNADIÂN MÂQ(AZI.NB ADVEWU3ER THAT'ï S THE POINT They h.at ÂLL the roonis ALL the time No coki cornevrs or draugbty hallwvays. Every part of the bouse is loept equally comifortable and cheerfuzl. The Keýlsýey la the heater lIat. gives large volumes Of warMe pure, freshi air, rallier tIa. at sma,,ll qutantity of dry superheated atir. It is easily and econornically nianaged and is gas, snmoke, and dust proof. Flowers thrive iii the homne heated by the KELSEY the sanie as they do outside in the summer. The air is heated b-t net enougb to take the moisture out of it. Now 1.1the tim. when you are uing your hivsace, to conalder your heating arrangements for next ywa. If you will a.84 us a c\u0026rd, we wili ,sd you fu Information about the Kesey system. THE JAMES SM ART MANIJFACTURING CO., Ltd. WINNIPEG, MAN. BROCKVILLE, ONT. THE Underwood T ypl«ewriter has won t~he lughest award for mechanical excellence at ail the International Expositions (includ- \u003c ig the Panama-Pacific.) It has won also, ail wodld's champion- ship contests for speed and accuracy. The present record of 136 net words a minute for one hour's writing was made on the Underwood in October, 1915. United TypewTiter Company, Limited Umlew.. Bildling 135 Victoria Street, Toironto",
         "OANÂIIA MAOAMRN ADVEITMS 41 M - 4 - ,IZ~7. 4 OLO CHum TOBACCO is the \"chum\" of more pipe smokers, than any other tobacco smoked inCanadaj ~~\u003cRYODY SMOK V a",
         "sa CANADIAN MAGAZIE ADVEBTISER",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE Book on DOG DISEASES. and How to Feed M. CLAY GLOVER, V. . 118 W. 31st Street N.Y- U.S.A. READ THE VERTISEMENTS CANADIAN MAGAZIN igp abreast with the «eW Ideas and m. Tbey mr not caly lntretint mtiv. teai certain ptoducts accept the cture?'s riust and writc for fullcr . tion. It vii py you. ADVERTISER a CENUINE DIAMOUIS WriWWkfoew4ipw JACOIS. oft h. f 15 Turn. u. TOONTO Cm, MAIL COURSES In AccountIng, Suning, Illus» tratingg Sten@rsphy, Sbher Story Writing, Jouraaus.m, and ~Ignlh ar Igiven unclsr the botresult pr.oucng oembl tions S4The ishauw Ooueesc so ale n any coMure cloi wiII b. malsqI onqut Wrfte to 895m7 Vonge etet Trno M wa\" YouweMtheBeuL M",
         "mu ~ (JANÂDrÂN MAGA21NE ADVERTI8ER When the peky shade won't woe'k Yo anb s u is ta at FREIE Valuale1 book '\"How to shorn Shade Roller. JiartshoTfl Cet~ the Best Serwle nproved Rollers 'nove quietly and' fror your Shade JioliLrs\", 8w1d sinoothly Et a toue)\u003e, and stay right for it today and Iear wftî where 7011 Jeave them. Co5t a few to look when I\u003euymg jhd ýe cetmore buto,howmulObetterI for this signature: Stwart Hrtho rkCo.I De~pt T oot ouIt",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Canada's Greatest Piano Tone Quahiy-Deicacyv of Toucl-Ee of Adion-hese *te especfally marked i the GERHARD HEIuNTZMAN CANADA'S GREATEST Intelligent piano selection w-ill do0 well to corisider thoroughly the perfected mnechanisni which makes this piano action so responsive. The novice, with the many necesaary hours of practice as well as the experienced player, will appreciate how much less fatiguing the action of the GERHARD HEINT'ZM\\AN is than that of other pianos. We will explain this detail to, anyone desirouis utf knowing a piano froni a practîcal standpoint; the illustrated bookiet gives fullest particulars. send for it. GERHARD HEINTZMAN, Limited 41 WEST QUUEN STREET SAEOmIV HADîLTON PLATS ýl-. Tr. iS. DESNMé4, Co., DeOIL TE!Y MUR11E ETE EEIEDUL I CHAU114U COLUIF0 w-f C. 11. - -\". A.k to ffl, -a b.Y Ait f =0te fS 25c. as FRAZER A TONON70 n vw'\"'\"'",
         "I.- 42 CÂRÂDIÂN MÂG\u0026ZUiE ÂDVEETIBE1 PIMzed equafly la houpital and home, because uo other Col les là at onice no rich, so strong, s0 delicate, and no unfallingly good. In X, 1 and 2 pouixi cans. Wboe-ground-pulvred- \"loFine Gr.uad for PoOaS. £RAE \u0026 SAMI ONITMEL",
         "CÂNÂDIÂN MÂGÂZInE ÂDVERTISER ta The nionthiy waite oflaaern alone would long \u0026go hv ie you the convenience and secunity cil a worth-wlule garage ail your owu. No more reuit paying. You'ieth garage boss and put the resit back into your own pocket. PUllS PERFCTUU make it easy to owzi a garage yoult be proud of for years te tomne. Made of sheet metal and in sects. ît Îs absolutely firepro\u003ef and easy te erect yourself in a kew short houri. Artisic inesin tkey home. Made invaron tsa n sies f si any car. Wky not end the. wa.te of garage rent tody, by getting one of t\u003eese practical and duable Pedia, e G a et Wrie sw for the. Perfect Garep THE PEOLAR PEOPLE LIWITED F,..ts6lshd 1841 FiiaOffie mmd Fmcto.mmimwm Ont. Takme the hard worlt out* of WVVashday his MAXWELL \"*HOMIE\" WASHIER takes al lthe back- Ireaking work out of wasbing. Just put lte clothes in. he wasber does thte work-easier and better-in less (htan lf the tihne. Delicate fabricu are washed and cleanedjuat as eusily and well au blankets, table-cloths or sheeta-uto tearing oir wearing. asHOME' WASZKtR _j. light, ni-demm and --y . nni.g. Encloo-ed gear. make il mafe mon peratot The. OO.'qit m. the. liii uake tii. Co,-er lf tctod of bt quality Cprm., andi han'dmç,ucy aI.st on .igef awf Hm. Waser at your D.a19.s, .vWwt t. u St. pagw.oo twS I il",
         "44 CANADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER TH ÏINK ABOUT IT! MAKE YOUR PLANS EARLY * FOR YOUR ISPRING FISHING TRIP Th Gran Tri BaiWaï Siste. Reachesal[1 the resorta in the. \"Highlands of Ontario \" where big catches of game Bash are aaaured. THE KIND YOU CATCH AND WHERE I I THEY ARE CAU6HT MUSKOKA LAKES-Black Bass, Pickerel, Salmon Irout. KAWARTHA LAKES-Speckled Trout, Black Bass and Maskinonge. LAKE 0F BAYS-Speckled Troixt, Salmon Trout and Black Basa. ALGONQUIN PARK-Speckled Trout, Black Bass and Salmon Trout. TIMAGAMI-Black Bass, Lake Trout, Speckled Trout. LAKE NIPISSING-Black Bass, Masklnonge, Pickerel, Pike. GEORGIAN BAY-Black Bass, Salmon Trout, Lake T±out, Plekerel, OPEN SEASONS Black Bass-lune l6th to Deceinber 31at. Speckled Tromt-May ist to September l4th. Salmon Trout and Lake Trout-November 6th to October 4th following yrear. Maskinongc-Jufle l6th to December 31st. Pickerel-'Say l6th to April l4th the following year. Writ t th ftUwig Agents fo _full particulars-Howii#t gr theru, map, rates, etc..; C. E. HORNING, Union Station, Toronto, Ont., or J. QUINLAN, Bonaventure Station, 24ontreal, Que. G. T. BELL W. S. COOKSON Pameger raffc MaagerGeneral Pauenger A.gent Montreal, Que. ote;,Qe",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 48 NEW ROUTE Coast to Coast Service Toronto to Vancouver Via PORT ARTHUR, FORT WILLIAM, SASKATOON AND EDMONTON Connectons at Winnipeg Union Station for Calgary Prince Albert, Regina, Brandon, sud \u0026Il important po\u003eits la W.tern Canada and the Pacifi Coast LEAVE TORONTO 10.45 P.M. Monday, W.dus.day, sud Friday ALL moDgERN XQUIPMENT RELIAULU EXPRESS SERVICE Through tickets to ail points, and berth reservati ons from LclAgent Or write to Generat Passenger Dept., 68 King St. East, Toronto, Ontario, or Union Station, Winnipeg, Manitoba. GET MADE IN CANADA GOODS SIMCOE PHOTO ALBUMS Interchangeable Lae SES To ?revent BOU1'iD INWALRS AN»SEALTrainsickneu a Nausea BOUIND I WALRUS ND SEALbesueto rmuber \u003extu uta big baqa à i'h\u003c GRAIN LEATHIERS, FLEXIBLE asbreW Sa EJOVERS. Rcqbd~~Iya ~~M ~4 Every Voeleter of 3»pu Skob nrequko».pnal srlttccTLjýn11 n Brown Bros., Lid efradif-2 bu $0 bxfo ý Simcoe aud Pondi Stresta TORONTO",
         "16 QÂNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVEBTISER \"JULIAN SA LE\" l'le naine behind the goods, is your guarantee for the quality RlIT-HITE' WARIDROBsE Sonuch of the pleasure travel being on this side of the water during the f war time emphasises ail the more the b utility of the \"Rite-hite\" Wardrobe Trunk as the indispensible travelling requi site. Il AIl the good points that could be concentrated and con- served into one bit of \"Iluggage \" would seem ta be included in this most warthy trunk. Ç Greatest in capacity. Most perfect in appointinents. Most generous in convenience. Fine in appearance, and of great strengtti. \u003cJWe have a very comprehensive bookiet on the \"Rite-bite\" Wardrobe Trunk which you may have for the asking. Prices are $25\u003c\u003e to $90~ The Julian Sae Leather C«\"d Co., Ltd. 105 King Stroe Woet, Torouto",
         "CANADIÂNî MAGAZINE ADVER1TIBER 57-9 Granvile Street -Halifax, N. S Our nue boe%\u0026fat \"Wint.r i the Wet Ludim,, tf interestilg. Sen'd for il.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER r- J 1c For WINNIPEG AND rV*rANC''OU VER LEAVE TORONTO 6.40 P.M. DAILY VIA THE TRANSCANADA, Trhrough- equlpment including Electric L4Uhed Corn- parlment Observalion Car, Standar'd and TouribE Sleepeurs, Dfrsfng Car, Firui-class Coaches **The frequeaxt C. P.R. Service passing through the Busi- arms Centre of each City is an asset to thie Traveller.\" Pailicidars front a CaadEan Pacifie Tiket Agent W. B. HO ARD District Pasenger Agenlt, TORONTO",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 0",
         "CAINADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTIqER Tele-npho-mne- Wants-, W. can take care of your Telepbone Wants whether they are for service in the City, Rural Munlcipality, Departmental B3uilding or Resîdence. We rnake everything in the Telephone line- msake it in Canada-in Toronto. THE PREST--PHONE Is the newest thing in Telephon. Systems for insid. private service. It wlU operate up to one hundrd telephones wlthout any girl operator, giving qulcker, more accurate and efficient service than van b. secured by any other telephone system. Our No. 5 Bulletina tells all about it and may b. had for the asking. WrIte us8 if you want any telephone service and we wlU b. pleased t. give yon our best advlce and recomiuezdation, Canai Indsusnis.t bsIupboue Cool LtI 263 ADELAIDE ST. WEST, TORONTO",
         "CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTIER Wagon Shop That Became the jargest Automobile Factory in the British Empire 0 aai ,¶Otons cf bras. ek t 0S\u003e a the efittre oui\u003cput 119 uvwall i~~ emi od50g uvtýehue oi tohLrntu 13. the town of Walketvllc. Ontarlo was a concetai called dte Wýalkervlle Wagoni day when business was flot riishing. the. gev Gordon NI. MeGCrevor whd t gtroil. h.- could walk ron isiL it ýuf aerlrc tta tinte thnt tus4 a few yearM, develop, into the. largegt Iant Llie Empire havlng a Iloor acmageofOe e fert andr inaking 3 timeq asq many c-a tutornobile. factory in the. Blrtlsh Empire. coe. tu puiL. e efforts of M.r. MeGregor andi hii, ana. 15. thus wagon 8hop has4 bren turned ito 1 plant at Ford City. Ont. today lu one of the industrial siiow p\u003elacLas I~highst palid automobile meçhankcs in ýho put titeir beut loto the . iuilding uf a wor ita way, into the. contidence of thie undreds of machines deulgnud hl- Ford Ch ame aarvels of the industriel world. tern woulut do the work of ant odinary lecoemcnyin.:weekormo. But hecause ci fr zdCa the amk Pt busy the Caadan Ford car i. bon eery thme rin are buuily enigaged! in msikins aduti. h uc1iof cars mal krep p... wlth Te bee as been a tinir ginc. vaàr Ln\u003eg of mettewlerenot.at wrk xpandin\u0026 lie puv.. plant sand you wiii sec tva mon- -pwe gs engn. WVhat a conitraet to whe th fator poervs, deriveut Imm ies lieat t mutinent plant, Vanadium ri xpenive aut lest of steeKs lit lieat- wd wray. Ho1 re eadhi steel part is \"pec fer the 14re98 and t siain it vili ha%-e ta e shop coatain a\" upwo.deful uiglit- Thege are long soya of very expeim ylinde\" at one timel Adanotiier that at once in a cylindeir caetlng front sid, pi. Itarvelou3 speed and qually marvel- is the bandsau. office building in hichi vrksern are employeti. in ail the,. are htpl daknn of the Catadia Fot l uure i Canada. Few productm ae Lay 00 trictlY \"Made in Canada as te at thi mens to Camdlan lndistiy when Il immens@ Purcbssei as 28.000 tons cf Motor Company Ford, 01 7Ms 7Ml",
         "52 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTIBER",
         "CÂNÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVEWRI8ER Neyer Before Sueli an Instantaneous Succesa Ne,%,er before lias ai) automobile succos, Il le large ofoub for Ill, wboqýj Cfs*l% been so rap i, so definitt and $ s weeping. -moderatly pwlced. wltbjth, lb. 'h T'he $850 Oveiland bia madie history. It th' matlyoouatm maintola marks the entrac of a new automobile bit of 1h. b.ý,ut quafty ilit.iuýrlm %,lu-a a ompjete in every reBlpect at szzappy. qlstila and ýp-edy'-4 omi apiewhich was hithorto thouglit inipos- Inu shr ,eI t atsoe.rIt Yst er. laa poerfî uv Oxmple of what our large prk\u003eue1tjo, en- Yether itis-a pwerul liv pasener abjea us to do. touring car compj*te for only $850. ut C.orne. copi10.o ,0 ; WiUlya$Ovoerimd, Liuited, Head Office and Work@, West Toronto. Cada.",
         "84 OANADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISSER Metal or' Wood bolesorne Ckea liness MADE IN CA",
         "That Well-to-do Feeling IT'S Big Ben for thema who likes to kick off the covers before the Iast cail for breakfast. Who enjoys a splash in the tub -a comfortable shave-a hot breakfast - and a minute or so with the family. It's Big B3en for the man wbo lîkes to take il easy on lthe way to work- t,, know the welI-to-do feeling of ample lime. Who likes t0 have a little while io himself to set things right belote tack. jing lthe day's work. I La Salk strt 1 d 1a.1 1u . , Z I f . I l t , pV lu 1 1 4t dlidi. a1 i.he'sf1 *, Itath ki A I i LZ 1 k nanu iintiî aI Sleaýd1% rti tixe V m îe orlIMC I vtl lenfl lotn. F 'ý- kg t t\" 1.,1. a Western CIock Çà III.U.S. a",
         "r q y 14DS ieiieCoL rD rlot A Strength ad Long Life Breakfast Sous fruit Grapo-Nets wîth Creaux Soit boiled egp Souse cirsp tat Cup of weiI-made POSTUM. Thaet enough until n000. Surpri.ing how weII-Ied and comfortable onie cao be on such a breakfat. There's a ]Reason\" for Grape-Nuts The OrýginaI and onIy Be'ware of I\"MittoS Soid on the Ment, MINARD'S3 LINIMENT A TOILET TREASURE Murraj \u0026 LaUMWS FLORIDA Wlthou excepbao the .' best and most popula Tollet Pertume made r the. ath It la oollmg endi reviving; en the Handkeroh1f and for gneral Toile\u0026 une Il le de.laghtfol; aîter ShaViug it le slnîply the. vory bess ,.t'Obthing te m-. Ask your Druggis for nt Accept no Subitue I. .1 FINE FURNITURE Needs care and aittention to keep àt beau- tiful and new Iooking. Be careful of the polish you use. Do flot take chances. Use (Made in Canada) Use it on ail furniture, woodwork and tloors if you would have tlîem admîred. It dusts, cleans and polishes at the saine time. It renloves all dirt and scum and leaves that bright new looking appearance so much desired. OrdeIrom ou dealer 25c e $3.00. CHANNELL CHEMICAL CO., LTD., 369 Sorauron Av. Toronto, Ont."
      ],
